Social Security Programs Throughout the World: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 This publication is substantially based on information collected and summarized by the International Social Security Association.
Social Security Administration Office of Policy Office of Research, Evaluation, and Statistics
Preface This issue marks a the Social Security into a four-volume dedicated to one of Americas.
significant change in Social Security Programs Throughout the World, which Administration (SSA) first published 65 years ago.
The report is now divided series and will be published in 6-month intervals.
Each volume will be four geographic regions: Europe, Asia and the Pacific, Africa, and the
The information contained in these volumes is crucial to our efforts, and those of researchers in other countries, to review different ways of approaching social security challenges that will enable us to adapt our social security systems to the evolving needs of individuals, households, and families.
These efforts are particularly important as each nation faces major demographic changes, especially the increasing number of aged, as well as economic and fiscal issues.
Social Security Programs Throughout the World is the product of a cooperative effort between SSA and the International Social Security Association (ISSA).
Founded in 1927, the ISSA is a nonprofit organization bringing together institutions and administrative bodies from countries throughout the world.
The ISSA deals with all forms of compulsory social protection that by legislation or national practice are an integral part of the countries social security systems.
For the first time, the research and writing has been contracted out to the ISSA.
The ISSA has conducted the research largely through its numerous country-based correspondents, as well as its Social Security Worldwide Database and a myriad of other types of data that must be drawn together to update this report.
Members of the ISSA's Information System and Databases Unit analyzed the information and revised the publication to reflect detailed changes to each social security program.
Social Security Programs Throughout the World is based on information available to the ISSA and SSA with regard to legislation in effect in July 2002, or the last date for which information has been received.
Questions about the report should be sent to Barbara Kritzer at ssptw@ssa.gov.
Corrections, updated information, and copies of relevant documentation and legislation are also welcome and may be sent to: International Social Security Association Information System and Databases Unit Case postale 1 4 route des Morillons CH-1211 Geneva 22 Switzerland This report is available at www.socialsecurity.gov/policy.
For additional copies, please telephone 202-358-6274 or e-mail op.publications@ssa.gov.
SSA staff members were responsible for technical and editorial assistance and production.
Barbara Kritzer served as technical consultant and provided overall project management.
Emil Loomis designed the report and, with assistance from Karyn Tucker and Karen Morris, produced it for publication.
Sherry Snyder edited the report, with assistance from Celine Houget.
Laurie Brown prepared the Web versions of this publication.
Susan Grad Acting Associate Commissioner for Research, Evaluation, and Statistics March 2003
Contents
Guide to Reading the Country Summaries Sources of Information ..................................................................................
Types of Programs Employment-Related ....................................................................................................
Universal .....................................................................................................................
Means-Tested ..............................................................................................................
Other Types of Programs .............................................................................................
Format of Country Summaries Old Age, Disability, and Survivors ..............................................................................
Sickness and Maternity ...............................................................................................
Work Injury ..................................................................................................................
Unemployment ............................................................................................................
Family Allowances .......................................................................................................
Tables 1.
Types of social security programs ..........................................................................
2.
Types of mandatory systems for retirement income ...............................................
3.
Demographic and other statistics related to social security, 2002 ..........................
4.
Contribution rates for social security programs, 2002 ............................................
1 2 2 3 3 3 7 10 12 14 16 18 20 22
Country Summaries Afghanistan ...................................
27 Armenia ..........................................
29 Australia ........................................
33 Azerbaijan ......................................
39 Bahrain ...........................................
44 Bangladesh ....................................
47 Brunei .............................................
49 Burma (Myanmar) ..........................
50 China ..............................................
52 Fiji ..................................................
56 Georgia ...........................................
58 Hong Kong ....................................
61 India ...............................................
65 Indonesia .......................................
69 Iran .................................................
71 Iraq .................................................
75 Israel ..............................................
78 Japan ..............................................
83 Jordan ............................................
89 Kazakhstan ....................................
91 Kiribati ...........................................
94 Korea, South ..................................
96 Kuwait ............................................
100 Kyrgyzstan ....................................
102 Laos ...............................................
106 Lebanon .........................................
Malaysia ........................................
Marshall Islands ............................
Micronesia .....................................
Nepal ..............................................
New Zealand ..................................
Oman ..............................................
Pakistan ..........................................
Palau ..............................................
Papua New Guinea .........................
Philippines .....................................
Saudi Arabia ..................................
Singapore .......................................
Solomon Islands ............................
Sri Lanka ........................................
Syria ...............................................
Taiwan ............................................
Thailand .........................................
Turkey ............................................
Turkmenistan .................................
Uzbekistan .....................................
Vanuatu ..........................................
Vietnam ..........................................
Western Samoa ..............................
Yemen .............................................
109 112 115 116 117 118 123 125 128 129 131 135 137 140 142 144 146 149 152 155 158 161 162 165 167
Guide to Reading the Country Summaries This edition of Social Security Programs Throughout the World marks a significant break with previous editions.
It now comprises four separate volumes-- Europe, Asia and the Pacific, Africa, and the Americas-- that will be published on a rolling basis between September 2002 and March 2004.
The combined findings of this report highlight the principal features of social security programs throughout the world.
This guide serves as an overview of programs in all four regions.
A few political jurisdictions have been excluded because they have no social security system or have issued no information regarding their social security legislation.
In this volume on Asia and the Pacific, the data reported are based on laws and regulations in force at the beginning of July 2002 or on the last date for which information has been received.1 Information for each country on types of social security programs, types of mandatory systems for retirement income, contribution rates, and demographic and other statistics related to social security is shown in Tables 1­4 beginning on page 16.
The country summaries show each system's major features.
Separate programs in the public sector and specialized funds for such groups as agricultural workers, collective farmers, or the self-employed have not been described in any detail.
Benefit arrangements of private employers or individuals are not described in any detail, even though such arrangements may be mandatory in some countries or available as alternatives to statutory programs.
The country summaries also do not refer to international social security agreements that may be in force between two or more countries.
Those agreements may modify coverage, contributions, and benefit provisions of national laws summarized in the country write-ups.
Since the summary format requires brevity, technical terms have been developed that are concise as well as comparable and are applied to all programs.
The terminology may therefore differ from national concepts or usage.
survey conducted by the International Social Security Association (ISSA) under the sponsorship of the U.S. Social Security Administration (SSA).
This information was supplemented by data collected from the ISSA's Developments and Trends Annual Survey.
Empirical data were also provided by numerous social security officials throughout the world.
(For a listing of countries and jurisdictions, see page 2.)
Important sources of published information include the ISSA Documentation Center; the legislative database of the International Labour Office; and official publications, periodicals, and selected documents received from social security institutions.
Information was also received from the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development, the Asian Development Bank, the World Bank, and the International Monetary Fund.
During the compilation process, international analysts at both SSA and the ISSA examined the material for factual errors, ambiguous statements, and contradictions in material from different sources.
Types of Programs The term social security in this report refers to programs established by statute that insure individuals against interruption or loss of earning power and for certain special expenditures arising from marriage, birth, or death.
This definition also includes allowances to families for the support of children.
Protection of the insured person and dependents usually is extended through cash payments to replace at least a portion of the income lost as the result of old age, disability, or death; sickness and maternity; work injury; unemployment; or through services, primarily hospitalization, medical care, and rehabilitation.
Measures providing cash benefits to replace lost income are usually referred to as income maintenance programs; measures that finance or provide direct services are referred to as benefits in kind.
Three broad approaches to coverage provide cash benefits under income-maintenance programs; namely, employment-related, universal, and means-tested systems.
Under both the employment-related and the universal approaches, the insured, dependents, and survivors can claim benefits as a matter of right.
Under means-tested approaches, benefits are based on a comparison of a person's income or resources against a standard measure.
Some countries also provide other types of coverage.
Sources of Information Most of the information in this report was collated from the Social Security Programs Throughout the World
The names of the countries in this report are those used by the U.S. Department of State.
The term country has been used throughout the volume even though in some instances the term jurisdiction may be more appropriate.
1
Employment-Related Employment-related systems, commonly referred to as social insurance systems, generally base eligibility for pensions and other periodic payments on length of employment or self-employment or, in the case of family allowances and work injuries, on the existence of the employment relationship itself.
The amount of pensions (long-term payments, primarily) and of other periodic (short-term) payments in the event of unemployment, sickness, maternity, or work injury is usually related to the level of earnings before any of these contingencies caused earnings to cease.
Such programs are financed entirely or largely from contributions (usually a percentage of earnings) made by employers, workers, or both and are in most instances compulsory for defined categories of workers and their employers.
The creation of notional defined contributions (NDC) is a relatively new method of calculating benefits.
NDC schemes are a variant of contributory social insurance that seek to tie benefit entitlements more closely to contributions.
A hypothetical account is created for each insured person that is made up of all contributions during his or her working life and, in some cases, credit for unpaid activity such as caregiving.
A pension is calculated by dividing that amount by the average life expectancy at the time of retirement and indexing it to various economic factors.
When benefits are due, the individual's notional account balance is converted into a periodic pension payment.
Some social insurance systems permit voluntary affiliation of workers, especially the self-employed.
In some instances, the government subsidizes such programs to encourage voluntary participation.
The government is, pro forma, the ultimate guarantor of many benefits.
In many countries, the national government participates in the financing of employmentrelated as well as other social security programs.
The government may contribute through an appropriation from general revenues based on a percentage of total wages paid to insured workers, finance part or all of the cost of a program, or pay a subsidy to make up any deficit of an insurance fund.
In some cases, the government pays the contributions for low-paid workers.
These arrangements are separate from obligations the government may have as an employer under systems that cover government employees.
Social security contributions and other earmarked income are kept in a dedicated fund and are shown as a separate item in government accounts.
(For further details on the government's role in financing social security, see Source of Funds under Old Age, Disability, and Survivors.)
Universal Universal, or demogrant, programs provide flat-rate cash benefits to residents or citizens, without consideration of income, employment, or means.
Typically financed from general revenues, these benefits may apply to all persons with sufficient residency.
Universal programs may
Countries in Asia and the Pacific that Responded to the Social Security Programs Throughout the World Survey Armenia Australia Azerbaijan Bahrain Brunei Burma (Myanmar) China Fiji Hong Kong India Indonesia Iran Israel Japan Jordan Kazakhstan Kiribati Korea, South Kuwait Laos Lebanon Malaysia Micronesia Nepal New Zealand Pakistan Palau Papua New Guinea Philippines Saudi Arabia Singapore Solomon Islands Syria Taiwan Thailand Turkmenistan Vietnam Western Samoa Yemen
2 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
include old-age pensions for persons over a certain age; pensions for disabled workers, widow(er)s, and orphans; and family allowances.
Most social security systems incorporating a universal program also have a second-tier earnings-related program.
Some universal programs, although receiving substantial support from income taxes, are also financed in part by contributions from workers and employers.
Contributions are assigned to an employee's individual account.
The employee must pay administrative fees for the management of the private account and usually purchase a separate policy for disability and survivors insurance.
Provident Funds.
These funds, which exist primarily in
Means-Tested Means-tested programs establish eligibility for benefits by measuring individual or family resources against a calculated standard usually based on subsistence needs.
Benefits are limited to applicants who satisfy a means test.
The size and type of benefits awarded are determined in each case by administrative decision within the framework of the law.
The specific character of means, needs, or income tests, as well as the weight given to family resources, differ considerably from country to country.
Such programs, commonly referred to as social pensions or equalization payments, traditionally are financed primarily from general revenues.
Means-tested systems constitute the sole or principal form of social security in only a few jurisdictions.
In other jurisdictions, contributory programs operate in tandem with income-related benefits.
In such instances, means- or income-tested programs may be administered by social insurance agencies.
Means-tested programs apply to persons who are not in covered employment or whose benefits under employment-related programs, together with other individual or family resources, are inadequate to meet subsistence or special needs.
Although means-tested programs can be administered at the national level, they are usually administered locally.
In this report, when national means-tested programs supplement an employment-related benefit, the existence of a means-tested program is generally noted, but no details concerning it are given.
When a means-tested program represents the only or principal form of social security, however, further details are provided.
developing countries, are essentially compulsory savings programs in which regular contributions withheld from employees' wages are enhanced, and often matched, by employers' contributions.
The contributions are set aside and invested for each employee in a single, publicly managed fund for later repayment to the worker when defined contingencies occur.
Typically, benefits are paid out in the form of a lump sum with accrued interest, although in certain circumstances drawdown provisions enable partial access to savings prior to retirement or other defined contingencies.
On retirement, some provident funds also permit beneficiaries to purchase an annuity or opt for a pension.
Some provident funds provide pensions for survivors.
Employer-Liability Systems.
Under these systems,
workers are usually protected through labor codes that require employers, when liable, to provide specified payments or services directly to their employees.
Specified payments or services can include the payment of lump-sum gratuities to the aged or disabled; the provision of medical care, paid sick leave, or both; the payment of maternity benefits or family allowances; the provision of temporary or long-term cash benefits and medical care in the case of a work injury; or the payment of severance indemnities in the case of dismissal.
Employer-liability systems do not involve any direct pooling of risk, since the liability for payment is placed directly on each employer.
Employers may insure themselves against liability, and in some jurisdictions such insurance is compulsory.
Format of Country Summaries Each country summary discusses five types of programs: · · · · · Old age, disability, and survivors; Sickness and maternity; Work injury; Unemployment; and Family allowances.
Other Types of Programs Three other types of programs are mandatory private insurance, publicly operated provident funds, and employer-liability systems.
Mandatory Private Insurance.
This type of coverage may have been introduced to substitute for, or to complement, social insurance systems that are mainly pay-asyou-go (PAYG).
Private insurance is funded either through mandatory employee contributions or a combination of mandatory employee and employer contributions.
Old Age, Disability, and Survivors Benefits under old age, disability, and survivor programs usually cover long-term risks, as distinct from short-term risks such as temporary incapacity resulting from sickness and maternity, work injury or unemployment.
The benefits are normally pensions payable for life or for a considerable number of years.
Such benefits are
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 3
usually provided as part of a single system with common financing and administration as well as interrelated qualifying conditions and benefit formulas.
The laws summarized under Old Age, Disability, and Survivors focus first on benefits providing pensions or lump-sum payments to compensate for loss of income resulting from old age or permanent retirement.
Such benefits are usually payable after attaining a specified statutory age.
Some countries require complete or substantial retirement in order to become eligible for a pension; other countries pay a retirement pension at a certain age regardless of whether workers retire or not.
The second type of long-term risk for which pensions are provided is disability (referred to in some countries as invalidity).
Disability may be generally defined as longterm and more or less total work impairment resulting from a nonoccupational injury or disease.
(Disability caused by a work injury or occupational disease is usually compensated under a separate program; see Work Injury, below.)
The third type of pension is payable to dependents of insured workers or pensioners who die.
(Pensions for survivors of workers injured while working are usually provided under a separate Work Injury program.)
Coverage.
The extent of social security coverage in any given country is determined by a number of diverse factors, including the kind of system, sometimes the age of the system, and the degree of economic development.
A program may provide coverage for the entire country or some portion of the workforce.
In principle, universal (or demogrant) systems cover the entire population for the contingencies of old age, disability, and survivorship.
A person may have to meet certain conditions, such as long-term residence or citizenship.
Many countries exclude aliens from benefits unless there is a reciprocal agreement with the country of which they are nationals.
The extent of employment-related benefits is usually determined by the age of the system.
Historically, social security coverage was provided first to government employees and members of the armed forces, then to workers in industry and commerce, and eventually extended to the vast majority of wage earners and salaried employees through a general system.
As a result, public employees (including military personnel and civil servants), teachers, and employees of public utilities, corporations, or monopolies are still covered by occupation-specific separate systems in many countries.
In many countries, special occupational systems have been set up for certain private-sector employees, such as miners, railway workers, and seamen.
Qualifying conditions and benefits are often more liberal than under the general system.
The risk involved in an occupation,
its strategic importance for economic growth, and the economic and political strength of trade unions may have had a role in shaping the type and size of benefits offered by the particular program.
Groups that might be considered difficult to administer--family workers, domestics, day workers, agricultural workers, and the self-employed--were often initially excluded from coverage.
The trend has been to extend coverage to these groups under separate funds or to bring them gradually under the general system.
In some countries, noncovered workers become eligible for the right to an eventual pension if they make voluntary contributions at a specified level.
Some systems also provide voluntary coverage for women who leave the labor force temporarily to have children or to raise a family, or for self-employed persons not covered by a mandatory program.
Some developed countries with younger programs have constructed a unified national program, thus largely bypassing the need for developing separate industrial or agricultural funds.
Most developing countries have extended coverage gradually.
Their first step toward creating a social security system has commonly been to cover wage and salary workers against loss of income due to old age and, less commonly, disability.
In a number of developing countries, particularly in those that were once British colonies, this initial step has come via the institutional form of provident funds.
Most provident funds provide coverage for wage and salary workers in the government and private sector.
A few funds have exclusions based on the worker 's earnings or the size of the firm.
Funds that exclude employees with earnings above a certain level from compulsory coverage may in some cases give them the option to affiliate or continue to participate voluntarily.
Source of Funds.
The financing of benefits for old-age,
disability, and survivor programs can come from three possible sources: · A percentage of covered wages or salaries paid by the worker, · A percentage of covered payroll paid by the employer, and · A government contribution.
Almost all pension programs under social insurance (as distinct from provident funds or universal and demogrant systems) are financed at least in part by employer and employee contributions.
Many derive their funds from all three sources.
Contributions are determined by applying a percentage to salaries or wages up to a certain maximum.
In many cases the employer pays a larger share.
The government's contribution may be derived from general revenues or, less commonly, from special earmarked or excise taxes (for example, a tax on tobacco,
4 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
gasoline, or alcoholic beverages).
Government contributions may be used in different ways to defray a portion of all expenditures (such as the cost of administration), to make up deficits, or even to finance the total cost of a program.
Subsidies may be provided as a lump sum or an amount to make up the difference between employer/ employee contributions and the total cost of the system.
A number of countries reduce or, in some cases, eliminate contributions for the lowest-paid wage earners, financing their benefits entirely from general revenues or by the employer 's contribution.
The contribution rate apportioned between the sources of financing may be identical or progressive, increasing with the size of the wage or changing according to wage class.
Where universal and earnings-related systems exist side by side, and the universal benefit is not financed entirely by the government, separate rates may exist for each program.
In other instances, flat-rate weekly contributions may finance basic pension programs.
These amounts are uniform for all workers of the same age and sex, regardless of earnings level.
However, the self-employed may have to contribute at a higher rate than wage and salary workers, thereby making up for the employer 's share.
For administrative purposes, a number of countries assess a single overall social security contribution covering several contingencies.
Benefits for sickness, work injury, unemployment, and family allowances as well as pensions may be financed from this single contribution.
General revenue financing is the sole source of income in some universal systems.
The contribution of the resident or citizen may be a percentage of taxable income under a national tax program.
General revenues finance all or part of the means-tested supplementary benefits in many countries.
Contribution rates, as a rule, are applied to wages or salaries only up to a statutory ceiling.
A portion of the wage of highly paid workers will escape taxation but will also not count in determining the benefit.
In a few cases, an earnings ceiling applies for the determination of benefits but not for contribution purposes.
In some countries, contribution rates are applied not to actual earnings but to a fixed amount that is set for all earnings falling within a specified range or wage class.
Qualifying Conditions.
Qualifying to receive an old-age benefit is usually conditional on two requirements: attainment of a specified age and completion of a specified period of contributions or covered employment.
Another common requirement is total or substantial withdrawal from the labor force.
In some instances, eligibility is determined by resident status or citizenship.
Old-age benefits generally become payable between ages 60 and 65.
In some countries, length-of-service
benefits are payable at any age after a certain period of employment, most commonly between 30 and 40 years.
Reflecting public pressure to lower the age limits, a major policy issue in the 1970s and 1980s was the age at which retirement benefits first become payable.
More recently, several countries have increased the age limit for entitlement, due, in part, to budgetary constraints.
Many programs require the same pensionable age for women as for men.
Others permit women to draw a full pension at an earlier age, even though women generally have a longer life expectancy.
Although the norm has been for the differential to be about 5 years, there is now an emerging international trend toward equalizing the statutory retirement age.
Many programs offer optional retirement before the statutory retirement age is reached.
A reduced pension, in some instances, may be claimed up to 5 years before the statutory retirement age.
Some countries pay a full pension before the regular retirement age if the applicant meets one or more of the following conditions: work in an especially arduous, unhealthy, or hazardous occupation (for example, underground mining); involuntary unemployment for a period near retirement age; physical or mental exhaustion (as distinct from disability) near retirement age; or, occasionally, an especially long period of coverage.
Some programs award old-age pensions to workers who are older than the statutory retirement age but who cannot satisfy the regular length-of-coverage requirement.
Other programs provide increments to workers who have continued in employment beyond the normal retirement age.
Universal old-age pension systems usually do not require a minimum period of covered employment or contributions.
However, most prescribe a minimum period of prior residence.
Some old-age pension systems credit periods during which persons, for reasons beyond their control, were not in covered employment.
Credits can be awarded for reasons such as disability, involuntary unemployment, military service, education, child rearing, or training.
Other systems disregard these periods and may proportionately reduce benefits for each year below the required minimum.
Persons with only a few years of coverage may receive a refund of contributions or a settlement in which a proportion of the full benefit or earnings is paid for each year of contribution.
The majority of old-age pensions financed through social insurance systems require total or substantial withdrawal from covered employment.
Under a retirement test, the benefit may be withheld or reduced for those who continue working, depending on the amount of earnings or, less often, the number of hours worked.
Universal systems usually do not require retirement from
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 5
work for receipt of a pension.
Provident funds pay the benefit only when the worker leaves covered employment or emigrates.
Some countries provide a number of exemptions that act to eliminate the retirement condition for specified categories of pensioners.
For instance, the retirement test may be eliminated for workers who reached a specified age above the minimum pensionable age or for pensioners with long working careers in covered employment.
Occupations with manpower shortages may also be exempted from the retirement test.
The principal requirements for receiving a disability benefit are loss of productive capacity after completing a minimum period of work or having met the minimum contribution requirements.
Many programs grant the full disability benefit for a two-thirds loss of working capacity in the worker 's customary occupation, but this requirement may vary from one-third to 100 percent.
The qualifying period for a disability benefit is usually shorter than for an old-age benefit.
Periods of 3 to 5 years of contributions or covered employment are most common.
A few countries provide disability benefits in the form of an unlimited extension of ordinary cash sickness benefits.
Entitlement to disability benefits may have age limitations.
The lower limit in most systems is in the teens, but it may be related to the lowest age for social insurance or employment or to the maximum age for a family allowance benefit.
The upper age limit is frequently the statutory retirement age, when disability benefits may be converted to old-age benefits.
For survivors to be eligible for benefits, most programs require that the deceased worker was a pensioner, completed a minimum period of covered employment, or satisfied the minimum contribution conditions.
The qualifying contribution period is often the same as that for the disability benefit.
The surviving spouse and orphans may also have to meet certain conditions, such as age requirements.
Old-Age Benefits.
The old-age benefit in most countries is a wage-related, periodic payment.
However, some countries pay a universal fixed amount that bears no relationship to any prior earnings; others supplement their universal pension with an earnings-related pension.
Provident fund systems make a lump-sum payment, usually a refund of employer and employee contributions plus accrued interest.
In programs that have mandatory individual accounts, options for retirement include purchasing an annuity, making withdrawals from an account regulated to guarantee income for an expected lifespan (programmed withdrawals), or a combination of the two (deferred annuity).
Benefits that are related to income are almost always based on average earnings.
Some countries compute the average from gross earnings, including various fringe benefits; other countries compute the average from net earnings.
Alternatively, some countries have opted to use wage classes rather than actual earnings.
The wage classes may be based on occupations or, for administrative convenience, on earnings arranged by size using the midpoint in each step to compute the benefit.
Several methods are used to compensate for averages that may be reduced by low earnings early in a worker 's career or by periods without any credited earnings due, for example, to unemployment or military service, and for the effects of price and wage increases due to inflation.
One method is to exclude from consideration a number of periods with the lowest (including zero) earnings.
In many systems the period over which earnings are averaged may be shortened to the last few years of coverage, or the average may be based on years when the worker had his or her highest earnings.
Other systems revalue past earnings by applying an index that usually reflects changes in national average wages or the cost of living.
Some assign hypothetical wages before a certain date.
Alternatively, others have developed mechanisms for automatic adjustment of workers' wage records based on wage or price changes.
A variety of formulas are used in determining the benefit amount.
Instead of a statutory minimum, some systems pay a percentage of average earnings--for instance, 35 percent or 50 percent--that is unchanged by length of coverage once the qualifying period is met.
A more common practice is to provide a basic rate--for example, 30 percent of average earnings--plus an increment of 1 percent or 2 percent of earnings either for each year of coverage or for each year in excess of a minimum number of years.
Several countries have a weighted benefit formula that returns a larger percentage of earnings to lower-paid workers than to higher-paid workers.
Most systems limit the size of the benefit.
Many do so by establishing a ceiling on the earnings taken into account in the computation.
Others establish a maximum cash amount or a maximum percentage of average earnings set, for example, at 80 percent.
Some systems combine these and other, similar methods.
Most systems supplement the benefit for a wife or child.
The wife's supplement may be 50 percent or more of the basic benefit, although in some countries the supplement is payable only for a wife who has reached a specified age, has children in her care, or is disabled.
It may also be payable for a dependent husband.
Minimum benefits are intended to maintain a minimum standard of living in many countries, although that objec-
6 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
tive is not always achieved.
A maximum that reduces the effect large families have on benefits is commonly used to limit total benefits, including those of survivors, in the interest of the financial stability of the program.
In some countries, benefits are automatically adjusted to reflect price or wage changes.
In other countries, the process is semiautomatic--the adequacy of pensions is reviewed periodically by an advisory board or other administrative body that recommends a benefit adjustment to the government, usually requiring legislative approval.
Disability Benefit.
Under most programs, provisions for disability benefits for persons who are permanently disabled as the result of nonoccupational causes are very similar to those for the aged.
The same basic formula usually applies for total disability as for old age--a cash amount usually expressed as a percentage of average earnings.
Increments and dependents' supplements are generally identical under the total disability and old-age programs.
For the totally disabled, a constant-attendance supplement, usually 50 percent of the benefit, may be paid to those who need help on a daily basis.
Partial disability benefits, if payable, are usually reduced, according to a fixed scale.
The system may also provide rehabilitation and training.
Some countries provide higher benefits for workers in arduous or dangerous employment.
Survivor Benefit.
Most systems provide periodic
children's allowances.
Many countries fix a somewhat higher age limit for orphans attending school or undergoing an apprenticeship or for those who are incapacitated.
The age limit is usually removed for disabled orphans as long as their incapacity continues.
Most survivor programs distinguish between half orphans (who have lost one parent) and full orphans (who have lost both parents), with the latter receiving benefits that are 50 percent to 100 percent larger than those for half orphans.
Special payments are also made to orphans under the family allowance programs of some countries.
Benefits are payable under a number of programs to widowers of insured workers or pensioners.
A widower usually must have been financially dependent on his wife and either disabled or old enough to receive an old-age benefit at her death.
A widower 's benefit is usually computed in the same way as a widow's benefit.
Many systems also pay benefits to other surviving close relatives, such as parents and grandparents, but only in the absence of qualifying widows, widowers, or children.
The maximum total benefit to be divided among survivors is usually between 80 percent and 100 percent of the benefit of the deceased.
Administrative Organization.
Responsibility for administration generally rests with semiautonomous institutions or funds.
These agencies are usually subject to general supervision by a ministry or government department but otherwise are largely self-governing, headed by a tripartite board that includes representatives of workers, employers, and the government.
Some boards are bipartite with representatives of workers and employers only or of workers and the government.
Where coverage is organized separately for different occupations, or for wage earners and salaried employees or self-employed workers, each program usually has a separate institution or fund.
In a few cases, the administration of benefits is placed directly in the hands of a government ministry or department.
benefits for survivors of covered persons or pensioners, although some pay only lump-sum benefits.
Survivor benefits are generally a percentage of either the benefit paid to the deceased at death or the benefit to which the insured would have been entitled if he or she had attained pensionable age or become disabled at that time.
Survivor benefits are paid to some categories of widows under nearly all programs.
The amount of a widow's benefit usually ranges from 50 percent to 75 percent of the deceased worker 's benefit or, in some cases, 100 percent.
In some countries, lifetime benefits are payable to every widow whose husband fulfills the necessary qualifying period.
More commonly, the provision of widows' benefits is confined to widows who are caring for young children, are above a specified age, or are disabled.
Lifetime benefits are ordinarily payable to aged and disabled widows.
Those awarded to younger mothers, however, are usually terminated when all children have passed a certain age, unless the widow has reached a specified age or is disabled.
Most widows' benefits also terminate on remarriage, although a final lump-sum grant may be payable under this circumstance.
Special provisions govern the rights of the divorced.
Age limits for orphan's benefits are in many cases the same as for
Sickness and Maternity Sickness benefit programs are generally of two types: cash sickness benefits, which are paid when short-term illnesses prevent work, and health care benefits, which are provided in the form of medical, hospital, and pharmaceutical benefits.
Some countries maintain a separate program for cash maternity benefits, which are paid to working mothers before and after childbirth.
In most countries, however, maternity benefits are administered as part of the cash sickness program.
(Benefits provided as a result of work injury or occupational disease are provided either under work injury or sickness programs.
Details of the benefits are discussed under Work Injury.)
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 7
Cash sickness and maternity benefits as well as health care are usually administered under the same branch of social security.
For this reason, these programs are grouped together in the country summaries.
An important reason for grouping these numerous benefits together is that each deals with the risk of temporary incapacity.
Moreover, in most instances, such benefits are furnished as part of a single system with common financing and administration.
Most countries provide medical care services for sickness and maternity as an integral part of the health insurance system and link those services directly with the provision of cash benefits.
In some instances, however, maternity cash grants are covered under family allowance programs.
Occasionally, medical care services are provided under a public health program, independent of the social insurance system.
Where this dual approach is followed, it has been indicated in the summaries.
Where health care is dispensed directly by the government or its agencies and the principal source of funds is general revenue, the cash benefit program usually continues to be administered on an insurance basis, funded by payroll contributions, and merged in some instances with other aspects of the social insurance system such as old age and disability.
However, countries that deliver health care primarily through private facilities and private funding are also likely to have developed separate programs.
Where the social security program operates its own medical facilities, both types of benefits are usually administered jointly.
Benefits designed to assist in the provision of longterm care, often at home, are generally supported by a special tax.
Benefit levels are normally set to the level of care required.
These benefits may be payable in cash, as care services, or as a combination of the two.
Coverage.
The proportion of the population covered by
may be permitted to affiliate on a voluntary basis.
In several countries, higher-paid employees are specifically excluded from one or both forms of sickness insurance, although some voluntary participation is usually permitted.
Many countries include pensioners as well as other social security beneficiaries under the medical care programs, in some cases without cost to the pensioner.
Elsewhere, pensioners pay a percentage of their pension or a fixed premium for all or part of the medical care coverage.
Special sickness insurance systems may be maintained for certain workers, such as railway employees, seamen, and public employees.
Where medical care coverage is provided through a national health service rather than social insurance, the program is usually open in principle to virtually all residents.
However, restrictions on services to aliens may apply.
Source of Funds.
Many countries have merged the
financing of sickness programs with that of other social insurance benefits and collect only a single contribution from employees and employers.
More commonly, however, a fixed percentage of wages, up to a ceiling, is contributed by employees and employers directly to a separate program that administers both health care and cash benefits for sickness and maternity.
Some countries also provide a government contribution.
Where medical care is available to residents, generally through some type of national health service, the government usually bears at least the major part of the cost from general revenues.
Qualifying Conditions.
Generally, a person becoming ill must be gainfully employed, incapacitated for work, and not receiving regular wages or sick-leave payments from the employer to be eligible for cash sickness benefits.
Most programs require claimants to meet a minimum period of contribution or to have some history of work attachment prior to the onset of illness to qualify.
Some countries, however, have eliminated the qualifying period.
The length of the qualifying period for cash sickness benefits may range from less than 1 month to 6 months or more and is ordinarily somewhat longer for cash maternity benefits.
Usually the period must be fairly recent, such as during the last 6 or 12 months.
In the case of medical benefits, a qualifying period is usually not required.
In instances where such a requirement does exist, it is generally of a short duration.
Most programs providing medical services to dependents of workers, as well as to the workers themselves, do not distinguish in their qualifying conditions between the two types of beneficiaries.
A few programs require a longer period of covered employment before medical services are provided to dependents.
sickness programs varies considerably from country to country, in part because of the degree of economic development.
Coverage for medical care and cash benefits is generally identical in countries where both types of benefits are provided through the same branch of social insurance.
In a number of systems, particularly in developing countries, health care insurance extends only to employees in certain geographic areas.
A common procedure is to start the program in major urban centers, then extend coverage gradually to other areas.
Both cash sickness and health care programs may exclude agricultural workers, who, in some countries, account for a major proportion of the working population.
Where a health insurance system (as distinguished from a national health service program) exists, most workers earning below a certain ceiling participate on a compulsory basis.
Others, such as the self-employed,
8 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
Cash Benefits.
The cash sickness benefit is usually 50 percent to 75 percent of current average earnings, frequently with supplements for dependents.
Most programs, however, fix a maximum benefit amount or do so implicitly through a general earnings ceiling for contributions and benefits.
Benefits may be reduced when beneficiaries are hospitalized at the expense of the social insurance system.
A waiting period of 2 to 7 days is imposed under most cash sickness programs.
As a result, benefits may not be payable if an illness or injury lasts for only a few days.
Similarly, in the case of a prolonged inability to work, benefits may not be payable for the first few days.
Under some programs, however, benefits are retroactively paid for the waiting period when the disability continues beyond a specified time, commonly 2 to 3 weeks.
A waiting period reduces administrative and benefit costs by excluding many claims for short illnesses or injuries during which relatively little income is lost and can also help reduce the potential for the inappropriate use of the system by workers.
The period during which a worker may receive benefits for a single illness or injury, or in a given 12month period, is ordinarily limited to 26 weeks.
In some instances, however, benefits may be drawn for considerably longer and even for an unlimited duration.
A number of countries permit the agency to extend the maximum entitlement period to 39 or 52 weeks in specific cases.
In most countries, when cash sickness benefits are exhausted, the recipient is paid a disability benefit if the incapacity continues.
Cash maternity benefits are usually payable for a specified period, both before and after childbirth.
A woman is almost always required to stop working while receiving maternity benefits, and usually she must use the prenatal and postnatal medical services provided by the system.
In some countries, cash maternity benefits are also payable to working men who stay home to care for a newborn child while the mother returns to work.
Cash payments may also be available for a parent, usually the mother, who is absent from work to care for a sick child under a specified age.
The proportion of earnings payable as a cash maternity benefit differs considerably from country to country but, like cash sickness benefits, is usually between 50 percent and 75 percent of current earnings.
However, in a number of countries, maternity benefits are set at 100 percent of wages.
Benefit payments usually start approximately 6 weeks before the expected date of childbirth and end 6 to 8 weeks afterward.
A nursing allowance--usually 20 percent or 25 percent of the regular maternity benefit and payable for up to 6 months or longer--may be provided in addition to the basic cash maternity benefit.
A grant for the purchase of
a layette--clothes and other essentials for the new-born baby--or the provision of a layette itself is furnished under some programs.
Finally, a lump-sum maternity grant may be paid on the birth of each child.
The wives of insured men may be eligible for this grant.
Similar benefits may be provided under the family allowance program.
Medical Benefits.
Medical services usually include at
least general practitioner care, some hospitalization, and essential drugs.
Services of specialists, surgery, maternity care, some dental care, a wider range of medicines, and certain appliances are commonly added.
Transportation of patients and home-nursing services may be included.
There are three principal methods of meeting the cost of health care: direct payment to providers by the public system or its agents, reimbursement of patients, and direct provision of medical care.
These methods may be used in different combinations and may be varied for different kinds of services.
Under direct payment, the social security or public medical care system pays providers directly for services.
Patients usually have little or no direct financial dealings with the care provider.
Payments for care are commonly made on the basis of contracts with service providers or the professional groups representing them, such as practitioner or hospital associations.
Remuneration may take the form of a specified fee for each service, a capitation payment in return for providing all necessary services to a given group of persons, or a salary.
Under the reimbursement method, the patient makes the initial payment and is reimbursed by social security for at least part of the cost.
A maximum is sometimes placed on the refund, expressed as a percentage of the bill or a flat amount that can vary with the nature of the service as stipulated in a schedule of fees.
The ceiling on medical bills can be placed on the provider when presenting the bill or on the patient when applying for reimbursement.
In the latter case, the patient may be reimbursed for only a small portion of the bill.
Under the direct-provision method, the social security system or the government owns and operates its own medical facilities, largely manned by salaried staff.
Countries using this method may contract for services of public or private providers.
The patient normally pays no fee for most of these services, except insofar as part of the social security contribution may be allotted toward health care funding.
Regardless of the funding method used, all national health care programs provide for at least a small degree of cost-sharing by patients, usually on the assumption that such charges discourage overuse.
Thus, the patient either pays part of the cost to the provider or social
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 9
security agency or receives less than full reimbursement.
Even under the direct-provision method, with its emphasis on basically free medical services to the whole population, patients are generally required to pay a small fixed fee per medical treatment or prescription or per day of hospitalization.
Some health care systems have no limit on how long medical care may be provided.
Other systems fix a maximum, such as 26 weeks, for services provided for any given illness.
Some set limits only on the duration of hospitalization paid for by social security.
Where time limits are imposed, they may be extended.
Maternity Care.
Prenatal, obstetric, and postnatal care
for working women is provided in most countries under the medical services program.
Obstetric care is sometimes limited to the services of a midwife, although a doctor is usually available in case of complications.
Care in a maternity home or hospital, as well as essential drugs, are ordinarily furnished where necessary.
Medical Care for Dependents.
When medical benefits
National law usually prescribes the minimum (and, in some cases, the maximum) cash benefits and medical services the health funds may provide.
In a few countries, individual funds may determine what specific health care benefits and services to provide and arrange to furnish medical care to their members.
This arrangement can involve delivery through contracts with care and service providers in the region.
Less commonly, government departments are responsible for the actual provision of medical services, usually through a national health service program.
The administrative responsibility for delivering medical services in some countries is often separated from the administration of cash benefit programs, which tend to be linked with other types of social security benefits.
Work Injury The oldest type of social security--the work injury program--provides compensation for work-connected injuries and occupational illnesses.
Such programs usually furnish short- and long-term benefits, depending on both the duration of the incapacity and the age of survivors.
Work injury benefits nearly always include cash benefits and medical services.
Most countries attempt to maintain separate work injury programs that are not linked directly with other social security measures.
In some countries, however, work injury benefits are paid under special provisions of the general social security programs.
Both types of programs are dealt with under Work Injury.
Types of Systems.
There are two basic types of work
for insured workers are provided through social insurance, similar services are typically furnished to their spouse and young children (and, in some cases, other adults or young relatives living with and dependent on the insured).
Maternity care is generally provided to the wife of an insured man.
In some countries, however, medical services available to dependents are more limited than those provided to insured workers or heads of families.
Dependents may be subject to a shorter maximum duration for hospital stays, for example, and may have to pay a larger percentage of the cost of certain services such as medicines.
Administrative Organization.
The administrative organization for the sickness and maternity program is similar to that of the old-age, disability, and survivor program in many countries.
Most commonly, such programs are administered by some form of national social security institution.
Under some systems, social security agencies own and operate their own medical facilities, furnishing at least part of the services available under their programs.
In most countries with a national health insurance program, responsibility for detailed administration lies with semiautonomous, nongovernment health funds or associations.
All workers covered by the program must join one of these funds.
Each health fund usually requires government approval and must satisfy certain requirements.
Workers and, in some countries, employers participate in the election of governing bodies.
The funds normally collect contributions within minimum and maximum limits.
Funds may also receive government subsidies related to their expenditures or to the number of affiliated members.
10 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
injury systems: social insurance systems that use a public fund, and various forms of private or semiprivate arrangements required by law.
In most countries, work injury programs operate through a central public fund, which may or may not be part of the general social insurance system.
All employers subject to the program must pay contributions to the public carrier, which in turn pays the benefits.
Countries that rely primarily on private arrangements require employers to insure their employees against the risk of employment injury.
However, in some of these countries, only private insurance is available.
In the remainder, a public fund does exist, but employers are allowed the option of insuring with either a private carrier or the public fund.
The premiums charged by private or mutual insurance companies for work injury protection usually vary according to the experience of work accidents in different undertakings or industries, and the cost of protection may vary widely.
In some countries, however, experience rating has been eliminated, and all employers contribute to the program at one rate.
In other instances, workers' compensation laws simply impose on employers a liability to pay direct compensation to injured workers or their survivors.
Employers covered under such laws may simply pay benefits from their own funds as injuries occur or may voluntarily purchase a private or mutual insurance contract to protect themselves against risk.
Coverage.
Work injury programs commonly cover wage
and salary workers and exclude the self-employed.
The programs of some of the more highly industrialized nations cover practically all employees.
However, many countries either exclude all agricultural employees or cover only those who operate power-driven machinery.
Some programs also exclude employees of small enterprises.
Source of Funds.
Work injury benefits are financed
primarily by employer contributions, reflecting the traditional assumption that employers should be liable when their employees suffer work injuries.
Where certain elements of the work injury program are meshed with one or more of the other branches of the social insurance system, however, financing usually involves contributions from employees, employers, and the government.
Another exception occurs in countries that provide medical treatment for work-connected illnesses under their ordinary public medical care programs.
Work Injury Benefits.
Work injury programs provide
cash benefits and medical benefits.
Cash benefits under work injury programs may be subdivided into three types: benefits for temporary disability, those for permanent total disability, and those for permanent partial disability.
No qualifying period of coverage or employment is ordinarily required for entitlement to work injury benefits.
The concept of work-connected injury has gradually been liberalized in a number of countries to cover injuries occurring while commuting to and from work.
Temporary disability benefits are usually payable from the start of an incapacity caused by a work injury, though some programs require a waiting period of 1 to 3 days.
Benefits normally continue for a limited period, such as 26 to 52 weeks, depending on the duration of incapacity.
If incapacity lasts longer, the temporary disability benefit may be replaced by a permanent disability benefit.
In some systems, temporary benefits may continue for an extended period, particularly if the temporary and permanent benefit amounts are identical.
The temporary benefit is nearly always a fraction of the worker 's average earnings during a period immediately before injury, usually at least one-third to one-half.
A ceiling may be placed on the earnings considered in computing a benefit.
Temporary benefits under work injury programs may be significantly higher than in the
case of ordinary sickness.
Benefits are reduced under some programs when a worker is hospitalized.
The second type of cash work injury benefit is provided in cases of permanent total disability.
Generally, it becomes payable immediately after the temporary disability benefit ceases, based on a medical evaluation that the worker 's incapacity is both permanent and total.
The permanent total disability benefit is usually payable for life, unless the worker 's condition changes.
A minority of programs, however, pay only a single lumpsum grant equal to several years' wages.
The permanent total disability benefit usually amounts to two-thirds to three-fourths of the worker 's average earnings before injury, somewhat higher than for ordinary disability benefits.
In addition, unlike ordinary disability benefits, the rate usually does not vary based on the length of employment before the injury.
Supplements may be added for dependents and for pensioners requiring the constant attendance of another person, in which case benefits may exceed former earnings.
In some countries, the benefits of apprentices or new labor force entrants who become permanently disabled as a result of work-connected injury or disease are based on hypothetical lifetime wages or on the wage of an average worker in the particular industry.
This mechanism overcomes the problem of establishing a lifetime benefit based on a very low starting wage.
The third type of cash work injury benefit is provided when permanent partial disability results in a worker 's loss of partial working or earning capacity.
It is usually equal to a portion of the full benefit corresponding to the percentage loss of capacity.
Alternatively, permanent partial disability benefits may be paid in the form of a lump-sum grant.
Partial disability payments are generally smaller and are usually stipulated in a schedule of payments for particular types of injuries.
Some systems pay the benefit as a lump sum when the extent of disability is below a stated percentage, such as 20 percent.
Medical and hospital care and rehabilitation services are also provided to injured workers.
Nearly always free, they may include a somewhat wider range of services than the general sickness program.
Ordinarily, they are available until the worker recovers or the condition stabilizes.
In some countries, however, free care is limited, the amount being based on the duration of services or their total cost.
Survivor Benefits.
Most work injury programs also provide benefits to survivors.
These benefits are customarily payable to a widow, regardless of her age, until her death or remarriage; to a disabled widower; and to orphans below specified age limits.
If the benefit is not exhausted by the immediate survivors' claims, dependent parents or other relatives may be eligible for
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 11
small benefits.
No minimum period of coverage is required.
Survivor benefits are computed as a percentage of either the worker 's average earnings immediately before death or the benefit payable (or potentially payable) at death.
These percentages are typically larger than those for survivor benefits under the general program and do not normally vary with the length of covered employment.
They are usually about one-third to one-half of the worker 's average earnings for a widow, about half as much for each half orphan, and about two-thirds as much for each full orphan.
A limit is commonly placed on the combined total of survivor benefits.
Not all countries, however, provide work injury benefits to survivors, and some do not differentiate between survivors in this category and survivors entitled to benefits under other social insurance programs.
Some schemes pay only a lump sum equal to the worker 's earnings over a specified number of years.
Most systems also pay a funeral grant equivalent to a fixed sum or a percentage of the worker 's earnings.
Administrative Organization.
The functions involved in
more than a specified amount.
Some have special provisions covering temporary and seasonal employees.
Several countries have special occupational unemployment programs, most typically for workers in the building trades, dockworkers, railway employees, and seafarers.
Voluntary insurance systems are limited to industries in which labor unions have established unemployment funds.
Membership in these funds is usually compulsory for union members in a covered industry and may be open on a voluntary basis to nonunion employees.
Noninsured workers, such as recent school graduates or the selfemployed, for example, may be eligible for a governmentsubsidized assistance benefit when they become unemployed.
Source of Funds.
The methods used to finance unemployment insurance are usually based on the same contributory principles as for other branches of social insurance--contributions amounting to a fixed percentage of covered wages are paid on a scheduled basis.
In many cases, the government also grants a subsidy, particularly for extended benefits.
Unemployment insurance contributions are shared equally between employees and employers in many countries.
Alternatively, the entire contribution may be made by the employer.
However, government subsidies may be quite large, amounting to as much as two-thirds of the program's expenditures.
Means-tested unemployment assistance programs are financed entirely by governments, with no employer or employee contribution.
Qualifying Conditions.
To be entitled to unemployment
administering work injury programs differ widely between countries in which employers are not required to insure or can insure with private carriers and those in which a public agency or fund has sole responsibility for both collecting contributions and paying benefits.
Unemployment Benefits in this category provide compensation for the loss of income resulting from involuntary unemployment.
In some countries, these programs are independent of other social security measures and may be closely linked with employment services.
In other countries, the unemployment programs are included with social security measures covering other short-term risks, although employment services may continue to verify unemployment and assist in a job search.
Unemployment programs, which exist mainly in industrialized countries, are compulsory and fairly broad in scope in many countries.
Some restrict benefits to those who satisfy a means or income test.
In addition to the programs offering scheduled payments, a number of countries provide lump-sum grants, payable by either a government agency or the employer.
In addition, employers in many instances are required to pay lump-sum severance indemnities to discharged workers.
Coverage.
About half of the compulsory unemployment
programs cover the majority of employed persons, regardless of the type of industry.
Coverage under the remaining programs is limited to workers in industry and commerce.
A few exclude salaried employees earning
benefits, a worker must be involuntarily unemployed and have completed a minimum period of contributions or covered employment.
The most common qualifying period is 6 months of coverage within the year before employment ceased.
In a number of industrialized countries, however, students recently out of school who are unable to find jobs may be eligible for unemployment benefits, even without a work record.
This benefit provides a transition from school to work, particularly in periods of recession.
Nearly all unemployment insurance programs, as well as those providing unemployment assistance, require that applicants be capable of, and available for, work.
An unemployed worker, therefore, is usually ineligible for unemployment benefits when incapacitated or otherwise unable to accept a job offer.
Usually, the unemployed worker must register for work at an employment office and report regularly for as long as payments continue.
This close linkage between unemployment benefits and placement services ensures that benefits will be paid only after the person has been informed of any current job opportunities and been found unsuitable.
12 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
An unemployed worker who refuses an offer of a suitable job without good cause usually will have benefits temporarily or permanently suspended.
Most programs stipulate that the job offered must have been suitable for the worker.
The definitions of suitable employment vary considerably.
Generally, the criteria include the rate of pay for the job being offered in relation to previous earnings; distance from the worker 's home; relationship to the worker 's previous occupation, capabilities, and training; and the extent to which the job may involve dangerous or unhealthy work.
In some countries, longterm unemployed workers may also be obliged to undertake employment retraining programs.
Some countries also provide the unemployed with access to educational placements.
If an unemployed worker refuses a place on a retraining program or fails, without good cause, to attend an educational placement, benefits can be temporarily or permanently suspended.
An unemployed worker may satisfy all of the qualifying conditions for a benefit but still be temporarily or permanently disqualified.
Nearly all unemployment systems disqualify a worker who left voluntarily without good cause, was dismissed because of misconduct, or participated in a labor dispute leading to a work stoppage that caused the unemployment.
The period of disqualification varies considerably, from a few weeks to permanent disqualification.
Unemployment Benefits.
Weekly benefits are usually a
Most countries place a limit on the period during which unemployment benefits may be continuously drawn.
Typically, this limit varies from 8 to 36 weeks but may be longer in certain cases.
Duration of benefits may also depend on the length of the preceding period of contribution or coverage under the program.
That criterion may reduce the maximum duration of unemployment benefits for workers with brief work histories.
However, workers with a long history of coverage may, under some programs, have their benefit period extended well beyond the ordinary maximum.
Many unemployed workers who exhaust the right to ordinary benefits continue to receive some assistance, provided their means or incomes are below specified levels.
Recipients are usually required to continue registering and reporting at an employment exchange.
Some countries that have unemployment assistance but no insurance program do not place any limit on the duration of payments.
A number of countries require that insured workers approaching retirement age who have been out of work for a specified period be removed from the unemployment rolls and granted a regular old-age benefit.
Administrative Organization.
Unemployment insurance
percentage of average wages during a recent period.
A system of wage classes rather than a single fixed percentage is used in some countries.
The basic rate of unemployment benefits is usually between 40 percent and 75 percent of average earnings.
However, a ceiling on the wages used for benefit computations or maximum benefit provisions may considerably narrow the range within which the basic percentage of wages applies.
Flat-rate amounts are sometimes payable instead of graduated benefits that vary with past wages and customarily differ only according to the family status or, occasionally, the age of the worker.
Supplements for a spouse and children are usually added to the basic benefit of unemployed workers who are heads of families.
These supplements are either flat-rate amounts or an additional percentage of average earnings.
Most countries have a waiting period of several days before unemployment benefits become payable to reduce the administrative burden of dealing with a very large number of small claims.
Most waiting periods are between 3 and 7 days.
Some programs have a waiting period for each incident of unemployment, and others limit eligibility to once a year.
Longer waiting periods may be prescribed for certain workers, such as the seasonally employed.
systems may be administered by government departments or self-governing institutions that are usually managed by representatives of insured persons, employers, and the government.
Unemployment insurance and placement service programs usually maintain a close administrative relationship that ensures that benefits are paid only to workers who are registered for employment.
At the same time, this liaison increases the effectiveness of the placement services by providing an incentive, through payment of benefits, for unemployed persons to register and report regularly.
Some countries have merged the administration of unemployment insurance and employment service programs, especially at the lower administrative levels where claims are received and benefits are paid by the local employment office.
Other countries require persons to register with a local employment office, but the receipt of claims and payment of benefits are handled by a separate insurance office.
In addition to providing an income for the unemployed, many governments have elaborate measures to prevent or counteract unemployment.
The typical procedure is for government employment services to work with industry to promote occupational and geographic mobility of labor and to minimize unemployment caused by economic or technological developments; they do that by subsidizing the retraining and relocation of workers in industries that are declining or being restructured.
Gov-
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 13
ernments may grant tax and other incentives to industry to locate in areas of high unemployment, or they may allocate funds to create jobs in anticipation of periods of seasonal unemployment.
Eligibility.
Eligibility is commonly related to the size of
Family Allowances The general purpose of family allowance programs is to provide additional income for families with young children in order to meet at least part of the added costs of their support.
These programs may either be integrated with other social security measures or kept entirely separate.
In this report, family allowances primarily include regular cash payments to families with children.
In some countries, they also include school grants, birth grants, maternal and child health services, and allowances for adult dependents.
Most industrialized countries have family allowance programs that originated in Europe in the 19th century when some large companies began paying premiums to workers with large families.
The idea spread gradually, and several European countries enacted programs during the 1920s and 1930s.
Most programs in operation today, however, have been in place since 1945.
Types of Systems and Coverage .
Family allowance programs are of two types: universal and employmentrelated.
The first category, in principle, provides allowances to all resident families with a specified number of children.
The second category provides allowances to all wage and salary workers and, in some cases, the self-employed.
A few systems cover some categories of nonemployed persons as well.
Most employment-related programs continue to pay family allowances to insured persons with dependent children in their care when they retire or are temporarily off the job and receiving sickness, unemployment, work injury, disability, or other benefits.
Employment-related family programs also pay allowances to widows of social security beneficiaries.
Source of Funds.
The differences in family allowance
the family and, in some cases, to family income.
Many countries pay allowances beginning with the first child.
In addition, some countries pay an allowance for a nonemployed wife or other adult dependent, even if there are no children.
In some countries, families with only one child are ineligible.
Age requirements vary but are usually tied to the last year of school or the minimum working age, which are often the same and fall somewhere between ages 14 and 18.
Under most programs, the continuation of schooling, apprenticeship, or vocational training qualifies a child for an extension of the age limit.
In the case of disabled children, many countries extend the age limit beyond that for continued education or pay allowances indefinitely.
Benefits.
Whether a program pays a uniform rate for all
children or an increasing or decreasing amount for each additional child may reflect the history or the intent of the program.
The allowance structure may vary, for example, depending on whether the primary intent is to provide assistance or stimulate population growth.
The allowance in most countries is a uniform amount for every child, regardless of the number of children in a family.
The allowance in most of the other countries increases for each additional child; the payment for a fifth child, for example, may be considerably larger than that for the first or second child.
In a few countries, the allowance per child diminishes or ceases with the addition of children beyond a certain number.
In some countries, family allowances (and tax exemptions for dependent family members) have been replaced or supplemented by credits or other forms of a negative income tax.
Administrative Organization.
In countries where family
programs are reflected in the methods used for financing.
In universal systems, the entire cost is usually covered by general revenue.
By contrast, countries linking eligibility with employment meet the cost of allowances entirely or in considerable part from employer contributions, usually at a uniform percentage-of-payroll rate.
If employer contributions do not cover the entire cost, the remainder is usually met from a government subsidy.
Few countries require an employee contribution toward family allowances, although some require self-employed persons to contribute.
allowances are available to all families and financed from general revenues, the program is usually administered by a government department.
Where allowances are payable mainly to families of employed persons and financed primarily from employer contributions, the administration may be by a semiautonomous agency under public supervision.
Equalization funds may handle the program's financial operations.
Each employer pays family allowances to its employees with their wages.
The firm then settles with the local fund only the surplus or deficit of contributions due, after deducting allowances the firm has paid.
A similar procedure of settling only surpluses or deficits is followed by the local funds in relation to the regional equalization funds under whose supervision they operate.
The equalization process makes it possible to fix a uniform contribution rate for all
14 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
employers, regardless of the number of children in their employees' families.
It also eliminates any effect allowances might have in inducing employers to discriminate in hiring workers with children.
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 15
Table 1.
Types of social security programs Sickness and maternity Old age, disability, survivors X X X X X X X b X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X Cash benefits for both X X X X b X b X X b X X X b X X X X b X b b b X X X b b b b X b X b b Cash benefits plus medical care b X X X b X c X X b X X X c X X X X b X b c b X X X c b b b X b X b c Work injury X X X X X X b X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X d
Country Afghanistan Armenia Australia Azerbaijan Bahrain Bangladesh Brunei Burma (Myanmar) China Fiji Georgia Hong Kong India Indonesia Iran Iraq Israel Japan Jordan Kazakhstan Kiribati Korea, South Kuwait Kyrgyzstan Laos Lebanon Malaysia Marshall Islands Micronesia Nepal New Zealand Oman Pakistan Palau Papua New Guinea
a
Unemployment b X X X b X b b X b X X X b X X d
Family allowances b X X X b b b b b b b X b b X b X X b X b b b X b X b b b b X b b b b (Continued)
X X b X b X b X b b b b b b X b X b b
X X X X b b X X X X b X
16 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
Table 1.
Continued Sickness and maternity Old age, disability, survivors X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X Cash benefits for both X X X b e b X X X X X b X b b Cash benefits plus medical care X b X b b b X X X X X b X c b Work injury X X X X X X X X X X X b X X X Family allowances b b b b X b b X b d b b b b b
Country Philippines Saudi Arabia Singapore Solomon Islands Sri Lanka Syria Taiwan Thailand Turkey Turkmenistan Uzbekistan Vanuatu Vietnam Western Samoa Yemen
a
Unemployment b b b X d b X X X X X b b b b
SOURCE: Based on information in the country summaries in this volume.
a. b. c. d. e. Coverage is provided for medical care, hospitalization, or both.
Has no program or information is not available.
Medical care only.
Coverage is provided under other programs or through social assistance.
Maternity care only.
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 17
Table 2.
Types of mandatory systems for retirement income Flatrate Earningsrelated X X a
Country Afghanistan Armenia Australia Azerbaijan Bahrain Bangladesh Brunei Burma (Myanmar) China Fiji Georgia Hong Kong India Indonesia Iran Iraq Israel Japan Jordan Kazakhstan Kiribati Korea, South Kuwait Kyrgyzstan Laos Lebanon Malaysia Marshall Islands Micronesia Nepal New Zealand Oman Pakistan Palau Papua New Guinea Philippines Saudi Arabia
Meanstested
Flat-rate universal
Provident funds
Occupational retirement schemes
Individual retirement schemes
X X X b X b X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X Xc X X X X X X X X X X
X
X
X
X
X X a
X (Continued)
18 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
Table 2.
Continued Occupational retirement schemes Individual retirement schemes
Country Singapore Solomon Islands Sri Lanka Syria Taiwan Thailand Turkey Turkmenistan Uzbekistan Vanuatu Vietnam Western Samoa Yemen
Flatrate
Earningsrelated
Meanstested
Flat-rate universal
Provident funds X X X
X X X X X X X X X X X X X
SOURCE: Based on information in the country summaries in this volume.
NOTE: The types of mandatory systems for retirement income are defined as follows: Flat-rate pension: A pension of uniform amount or based on years of service or residence but independent of earnings.
It is financed by payroll tax contributions from employees, employers, or both.
Earnings-related pension: A pension based on earnings.
It is financed by payroll tax contributions from employees, employers, or both.
Means-tested pension: A pension paid to eligible persons whose own or family income, assets, or both fall below designated levels.
It is generally financed through government contributions, with no contributions from employers or employees.
Flat-rate universal pension: A pension of uniform amount normally based on residence but independent of earnings.
It is generally financed through government contributions, with no contributions from employers or employees.
Provident funds: Employee and employer contributions are set aside for each employee in publicly managed special funds.
Benefits are generally paid as a lump sum with accrued interest.
Occupational retirement schemes: Employers are required by law to provide private occupational retirement schemes financed by employer and, in some cases, employee contributions.
Benefits are paid as a lump sum, annuity, or pension.
Individual retirement schemes: Employees and, in some cases, employers must contribute a certain percentage of earnings to an individual account managed by a public or private fund manager chosen by the employee.
The accumulated capital in the individual account is used to purchase an annuity, make programmed withdrawals, or a combination of the two and may be paid as a lump sum. a.
The benefit formula contains a flat-rate component as well as an element based on years of coverage.
b.
No mandatory system for retirement income or only limited social assistance.
c.
Not means-tested but benefits vary depending on other factors, including geographic location.
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 19
Table 3.
Demographic and other statistics related to social security, 2002 Percentage Total 65 or Dependency population older (millions) ratio a Life expectancy at birth (years) Men Women Statutory pensionable age Men Women Early pensionable age b Men Women GDP per capita (U.S.$)
Country
Afghanistan Armenia Australia Azerbaijan Bahrain Bangladesh Brunei Burma (Myanmar) China Fiji Georgia Hong Kong India Indonesia Iran Iraq Israel Japan Jordan Kazakhstan Kiribati Korea, South Kuwait Kyrgyzstan Laos Lebanon Malaysia Marshall Islands Micronesia Nepal New Zealand Oman Pakistan Palau Papua New Guinea
21.7 3.7 19.1 8 0.6 137.4 0.3 47.7 1,275 0.8 5.2 6.8 1,008 212 70.3 22.9 6 127 4.9 16.1 0.096 46.7 1.9 4.9 5.2 3.4 22.2 0.073 d 23 3.7 2.5 141.2 0.019 4.8
2.8 8.6 12.3 6.8 2.9 3.1 3.2 4.6 6.9 3.4 12.9 10.6 5 4.8 3.4 2.9 9.9 17.2 2.8 6.9 3.2 7.1 2.2 6 3.5 6.1 4.1 2 d 3.7 11.7 2.5 3.7 4.6 2.4
86.3 47.8 48.8 55.7 45.2 71.9 54.1 60.5 46.4 58.2 50.1 36.9 62.5 55.2 68.8 80.2 61.6 46.8 74.9 51.1 76.6 38.7 50.4 66.6 86 59.2 61.9 104 d 81 53 87.2 83.4 45.7 74.1
43.0 70.3 76.4 68.7 72.1 60.6 74.2 53.8 69.1 68.1 69.5 77.3 63.6 65.3 68.8 63.5 77.1 77.8 69.7 59.6 57.6 71.8 74.9 64.8 53.3 71.9 70.6 64.3 71.0 60.1 75.3 70.2 61.2 66.0 56.8
43.5 76.2 82.0 75.5 76.3 60.8 78.9 58.8 73.5 71.5 77.6 82.8 64.9 69.3 70.8 66.5 81.0 85.0 72.5 70.7 63.6 79.1 79.0 72.3 55.8 75.1 75.5 68.0 75.5 59.6 80.7 73.2 60.9 72.5 58.7
60 63.5 65 62 60 57 55 d 60 55 65 65 55 55 60 60 65 65 60 63 50 60 50 60 60 64 55 55 60 d 65 60 60 60 55
55 58 62.5 57 55 57 55 d 60 55 60 65 55 55 55 55 60 65 55 55 50 60 50 55 60 64 55 55 60 d 65 55 55 60 55
c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c 60 45 c 45 55 45 c 55 60 c c c c c c c c c
c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c 60 45 c 45 55 45 c 55 60 c c c c c c c c c
800 2,559 25,693 2,936 13,000 1,602 18,000 1,027 3,976 4,668 2,664 25,153 2,358 3,043 5,884 2,500 20,131 26,755 3,966 5,871 840 17,380 15,799 2,711 1,575 4,308 9,068 1,600 2,000 1,327 20,070 8,200 1,928 9,000 2,280 (Continued)
20 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
Table 3.
Continued Percentage Total 65 or Dependency population older (millions) ratio a Life expectancy at birth (years) Men Women Statutory pensionable age Men Women Early pensionable age b Men Women GDP per capita (U.S.$)
Country
Philippines Saudi Arabia Singapore Solomon Islands Sri Lanka Syria Taiwan Thailand Turkey Turkmenistan Uzbekistan Vanuatu Vietnam Western Samoa Yemen
75.6 20.3 4 0.447 18.9 16.1 22.5 62.8 66.6 4.7 24.8 0.196 78.1 0.158 18.3
3.5 3 7.2 2.6 6.3 3.1 9 5.2 5.8 4.3 4.7 3.2 5.3 4.6 2.3
69.7 84.8 41 90.1 48.3 78.5 42.8 46.8 55.8 72.1 69.3 82.6 63.2 84.5 110
68.0 71.1 75.9 67.9 69.9 70.6 73.9 67.9 68.0 63.9 66.8 67.5 66.9 66.9 60.7
72.0 73.7 80.3 70.7 75.9 73.1 79.7 73.8 73.2 70.4 72.5 70.5 71.6 73.5 62.9
60 60 55 50 55 60 60 55 55 62 60 55 60 55 60
60 55 55 50 50 55 55 55 50 57 55 55 55 55 55
c c c 40 c 55 c c c c c c c c 50
c c c 40 c 50 c c c c c c c c 46
3,971 11,367 23,356 1,648 3,530 3,556 17,200 6,402 6,974 3,956 2,441 2,802 1,996 5,041 893
SOURCES: United Nations Population Division, Department of Economic and Social Affairs.
2002.
1950-2050.
New York: United Nations; Human Development Report 2002.
2002.
Prepared for the Programme.
New York: Oxford University Press; U.S. Central Intelligence Agency.
2001.
The World D.C.: Central Intelligence Agency.
Information on statutory and pensionable ages is taken from the volume.
NOTE: GDP = gross domestic product.
a. b. c. d.
World Population Ageing United Nations Development Factbook, 2001.
Washington country summaries in this
Population aged 14 and under plus population aged 65 or older, divided by population aged 15­64.
General early pensionable age only; excludes early pensionable ages for specific groups of employees.
The country has no early pensionable age, has one only for specific groups, or information is not available.
Information is not available.
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 21
Table 4.
Contribution rates for social security programs, 2002 (in percent) Old age, disability, survivors Country Insured person b
All social security programs Insured person Employer
a
Employer
Total
Total
Afghanistan Armenia d
3 3 1.5
c c
0 5 29 c
3 8 9 30.5
c c e c
4 3 0 1.5 5 0 5 0.5 11 8 1 5 13.75 2 7 5 l
0 5 9 29 10 0 g,h,j
4 8 9 c e f
Australia Azerbaijan Bahrain Bangladesh Brunei Burma (Myanmar) China Fiji Georgia India Indonesia Iran Iraq d b d d d b d d b
0 c
9 c
30.5
5 0 5 0 8 8 1 c
7 0 5 0 23 8 27 c
12 0 10 0 31 16 28 c
15 0 10 2 43 16 29 10 f,i
5 1.5 32 8 5 7 23 4.89 h
28 h
Hong Kong
5 12 2 7 5 2.15 c c l
5 9.28 4 20 12 2.29 c c l
10 21.28 6 27 17 c c
14.03 h k
27.78 9 30 17 10.62 l
12 l
Israel
4.44 17.35 14.5 10 15 9 30 36 9.5 c
5.73
l
Japan
8.675 5.5 10 7.5 4.5 10 b
8.675 9 0 7.5 4.5 20 34 5 c
13 5.5 0 7.5 6.81 10 2.5 4.5 2 11.5 5 6 10 0 5 Lump sum 6 5 4.58
15.07 11 10 7.5 h
28.07 16.5 10 f
Jordan Kazakhstan Kiribati Korea, South Kuwait Laos Lebanon Malaysia Marshall Islands Micronesia Nepal New Zealand Oman Palau b d d b,d d d
15 15.51 30 42 f
8.7 20 41.5 5 21.5 h
Kyrgyzstan
2 4.5 c
9.5 23.5 25.25 10 12 20 0 e
0 11.5 5 6 10 0 5 Lump sum 6 5 3.33 d
8.5 12.5 5 6 10 0 8 5 6 7 5.07
8.5 24 10 12 20 0 e
13.75 5 6 10 h
0 9 12 7 h
13 5 12 12 8.4
14 12 12 12 12.3 (Continued)
Pakistan d
6 h
Papua New Guinea Philippines
7.72
22 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
Table 4.
Continued Old age, disability, survivors Country Insured person d
All social security programs Insured person Employer
a
Employer
Total
Total
Saudi Arabia Singapore Sri Lanka Syria Taiwan Turkey d d d
9 20 c
9 16 c
18 36 c
9 20 5 8 7 2.77 2 14 0 1 6 6 5 6
11 16 7.5 12 h h h
20 36 12.5 20 f
Solomon Islands b
5 8 7 1.3 1 0 1 c
7.5 12 14 4.55 1 20 32.5 c
12.5 20 21 5.85 2 20 33.5 c
17 8.13 2.2 20.5 22 35.5 6 17 6 13
24 10.9 4.2 34.5 22 36.5 12 23 11 19
Thailand b,d
9 c c b
11 c c
20 c c
Turkmenistan Uzbekistan Vanuatu Vietnam Western Samoa Yemen
6 5 5 6
6 10 5 9
12 15 10 15
SOURCE: Based on information in the country summaries in this volume.
a.
Includes old age, disability, and survivors; sickness and maternity; work injury; unemployment; and family allowances.
In some countries, the rate may not cover all of these programs.
In some cases, only certain groups, such as wage earners, are represented.
When the contribution rate varies, either the average or the lowest rate in the range is used. b. Data are more than 4 years old. c.
Also includes the contribution rate for other programs.
d. Contributions are subject to an upper earnings limit for some benefits.
e. Government pays the total cost of most programs from general revenues.
f. Government pays the total cost of family allowances.
g. Employers pay the total cost of cash sickness and medical benefits.
h. Employers pay the total cost of work injury benefit.
i. Government pays the total cost of basic unemployment benefit.
j. Employers pay the total cost of cash unemployment benefit.
k. Employers pay the total cost of family allowances.
l.
Contributions vary for earnings that are above or below one-half of the average national wage.
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 23
Country Summaries
Afghanistan
Sickness and Maternity
Afghanistan Exchange rate: U.S.$1.00 equals 36,807 afghanis.
Regulatory Framework First law: 1946 (labor law).
Current laws: 1985 (public health) and 1987 (labor code).
Old Age, Disability, and Survivors Regulatory Framework Type of program: Social insurance system.
First and current law: 1987 (labor code).
Type of program: Social insurance system.
Coverage All citizens.
Note: This information is more than 10 years old.
Source of Funds Insured person: See Old Age, Disability, and Survivors,
Coverage Employed persons in private-sector establishments, cooperatives, social organizations, joint enterprises, and government.
above.
Employer: None.
Government: See Old Age, Disability, and Survivors, above.
Source of Funds Insured person: 3% of earnings.
Contributions may be
Qualifying Conditions Information is not available.
higher depending on rank or grade.
Employer: None.
Government: Subsidy equal to 3% of earnings.
Sickness and Maternity Benefits Sickness benefit: Twenty days of leave with salary.
Maternity benefit: Ninety days of leave with salary; 15 days
All of the above contributions also finance sickness and maternity benefits.
of additional leave with salary for the birth of twins.
Qualifying Conditions Old-age pension: Age 60 with 25 years of contributions (men)
Administrative Organization Ministry of Finance is responsible for the program.
or age 55 with 20 years of contributions (women).
Work Injury Old-Age Benefits Old-age pension: Up to 100% of salary.
Regulatory Framework First law: 1946.
Current law: 1987 (labor code) and 1989 (medical
Permanent Disability Benefits Disability pension: Equal to the insured's salary if at least
compensation).
Type of program: Contributory lump-sum benefit system.
60% disabled.
If under 60% disabled, the pension is calculated according to any loss in earnings.
The disabled have access to treatment provided by medical clinics.
Coverage Employed persons in private-sector establishments, cooperatives, social organizations, joint enterprises, and government.
Administrative Organization Ministry of Finance is responsible for the program.
Source of Funds Insured person: 1% of earnings.
Employer: None.
Government: None.
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 27
Afghanistan
Qualifying Conditions Work injury benefits: There is no minimum qualifying period.
Temporary Disability Benefits If the insured is assessed as being between 10% and 60% disabled, the lump-sum benefit equals 30% of the minimum salary rate times the percentage of the assessed degree of incapacity.
Permanent Disability Benefits If the insured is assessed as being between 60% and 100% disabled, the lump-sum benefit equals 60% of the minimum salary rate times the assessed degree of incapacity.
Survivor Benefits A lump-sum benefit equal to 80% of the minimum salary rate times 100.
Administrative Organization The Inspection Department of the Ministry of Labor and Social Affairs supervises the program.
28 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
Armenia Survivor pension: The insured had at least 15 years of
Armenia Exchange rate: U.S.$1.00 equals 584 dram (dr.).
covered employment.
The pension is payable to surviving children.
For all pensions, covered employment includes years in higher education, serving in the armed forces, caring for disabled persons or children under age 3, and periods of receiving unemployment benefits.
Social pension: Disabled or single pensioners with limited
Old Age, Disability, and Survivors Regulatory Framework First laws: 1956 and 1964.
Current law: 2002.
Type of program: Social insurance system.
means.
Old-Age Benefits Old-age pension: 100% of the base pension plus a bonus
pension of 80 dr. for each insured year.
Coverage All employees, self-employed persons, collective farmers, scientists, and artists.
Base pension: 3,000 dr. a month (November 2001).
Benefit adjustment: Periodic benefit adjustments are made by government decree.
Source of Funds Insured person: 3% of earnings; self-employed persons,
Permanent Disability Benefits Disability pension: For a Group I pension (total disability),
artists, and scientists, 15% of annual income less than 1,200,000 dr.
If annual income is more than 1,200,000 dr., the payment is 180,000 dr. plus 5% of the sum higher than 1,200,000 dr. Collective farmers pay 5% of their annual income up to a maximum of 60,000 dr.
If collective farmers are employers, they also make a social payment on behalf of any employees.
Employers: A flat-rate contribution of 5,000 dr. for income less
120% of the base pension a month plus a bonus pension of 80 dr. for each full calendar year of covered employment; for Group II, 100% of the base pension a month plus a bonus pension of 80 dr. for each year of covered employment.
Partial disability (Group III): 80% of the base pension per month plus a bonus pension of 80 dr. for each year of covered employment.
Benefit adjustment: Periodic benefit adjustments are made by government decree.
than 20,000 dr.
If income is more than 20,000 dr., a flat-rate contribution of 5,000 dr. plus 15% of sum higher than 20,000 dr. but less than 100,000 dr.
When income exceeds 100,000 dr., a flat-rate contribution of 17,000 dr. plus 5% of the sum higher than 100,000 dr. Government: Total cost of the social pension and subsidies
Survivor Benefits Survivor pension (orphan's pension): 100% of the base
as needed.
The above contributions also finance benefits for sickness and maternity, work injury, and unemployment.
pension plus 50% of the bonus pension of 80 dr. for each year of covered employment of the insured; full orphans, 120% of the base pension plus 50% of the bonus pension of 80 dr. for each year of covered employment of both parents.
Social pension: 3,500 dr. plus 1,300 dr. for each dependent
family member.
Qualifying Conditions Old-age pension: Age 63.5 (men) or age 58 (women) with at
Benefit adjustment: Periodic benefit adjustments are made by government decree.
least 25 years of covered employment; age 58.5 (men) or age 53.5 (women) with at least 20 years of covered employment in arduous or hazardous work; or age 53.5 (men) or age 48 (women) with at least 15 years of covered employment in very arduous and hazardous work.
Disability pension: Total or partial disability with at least 5
Administrative Organization Ministry of Social Security is responsible for policy.
Council of the Social Insurance State Fund, including the Minister for Social Security, the Minister for Health, the Minister for Finance and Economics, the Chairman of the State Fund, and the Chairman of the Trade Unions, provides general coordination and oversight.
Regional and provincial branches of the Social Insurance State Fund administer the program.
years of covered employment.
The pension is awarded according to three assessed degrees of disability: total incapacity for work and requiring constant attendance (Group I); total incapacity for work but not requiring constant attendance (Group II); and partial incapacity for usual work (Group III).
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 29
Armenia
Sickness and Maternity Regulatory Framework First law: 1912.
Current laws: 1984 and 1993.
Type of program: Dual social insurance (cash benefits) and
with preference being given to insured workers who may pay part of the cost.
Patients ordinarily pay part of the cost for appliances.
Medicines, if provided with hospitalization, are free.
Medicines are also free for disabled children under age 16, infants until age 1, and pensioners receiving the minimum pension.
universal (medical care) system.
Note: Provisions for medical care are as of January 1995.
Dependents' Medical Benefits Same as for the head of the household.
Coverage Cash benefits: All employees, self-employed persons,
Administrative Organization Cash benefits: Social Insurance State Fund provides general
collective farmers, scientists, and artists.
Medical care: All residents.
Source of Funds Insured person: See Old Age, Disability, and Survivors,
oversight of the program.
The Social Insurance State Fund's regional and provincial departments within local governments administer benefits.
Medical care: Ministry of Health and health departments of
above.
Employer
local governments provide general supervision and coordination.
Medical services are provided through clinics, hospitals, maternity homes, and other facilities administered by the Ministry of Health and local health departments.
Cash benefits: See Old Age, Disability, and Survivors, above.
Medical care: Total cost of optional employer-operated health
Work Injury Regulatory Framework First laws: 1955 and 1974.
Current laws: 1992 and 1995 (short-term benefits); 1990 and 1992 (pensions).
Type of program: Dual social insurance (cash benefits) and
care facilities.
Government
Cash benefits: Subsidies as needed from central and local
governments; the total cost of child care leave benefit is paid to parents.
Medical care: Total cost of medical care is paid by central and local government budgets.
universal (medical care) system.
Note: Provisions for work injury are as of January 1995.
Qualifying Conditions Cash and medical benefits: There is no minimum qualifying
Coverage Cash benefits: All employees.
Medical care: All residents.
period.
Sickness and Maternity Benefits Sickness benefit: The benefit is payable in case of illness or to care for a sick child.
If insured for at least 8 years, 100% of earnings; if insured for less than 8 years, 80% of earnings.
Maternity benefit: 100% of earnings is payable for 70 days
Source of Funds Insured person
Cash benefits: See Old Age, Disability, and Survivors, above.
Medical care: None.
Employer
before and 70 days after the expected date of childbirth; for a maximum of 155 days if there are complications in childbirth or 180 days for multiple births.
Child care leave: 2,360 dr. a month until the child is age 2.
Cash benefits: See Old Age, Disability, and Survivors, above.
Medical care: Total cost of optional employer-operated health
Workers' Medical Benefits Medical services are provided directly to patients by governmental health providers.
Benefits include preventive care, general and specialist curative care, hospitalization, laboratory services, dental care, maternity care, and transportation.
Care in sanatoria and rest homes is provided,
care facilities.
Government
Cash benefits: Subsidies as needed from central and local
governments.
Medical care: Total cost of medical care is paid by central and
local government budgets.
30 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
Armenia
Qualifying Conditions Work injury benefits: There is no minimum qualifying period.
Unemployment Regulatory Framework First law: 1921.
Current laws: 1991 and 1996.
Type of program: Social insurance system.
Temporary Disability Benefits 100% of average monthly earnings in the last 12 months preceding the onset of disability or occupational disease.
The benefit is payable from the first day of incapacity until recovery or the award of a permanent disability pension.
Coverage Cash benefits: All employees.
Medical care: All residents.
Permanent Disability Benefits Permanent disability pension: See permanent disability
benefits under Old Age, Disability, and Survivors, above.
Source of Funds Insured: See Old Age, Disability, and Survivors, above.
Employer: See Old Age, Disability, and Survivors, above.
Government: Subsidies as needed from central and local
Workers' Medical Benefits Medical services are provided directly to patients by governmental health providers.
Benefits include preventive care, general and specialist curative care, hospitalization, laboratory services, dental care, maternity care, and transportation.
Care in sanatoria and rest homes is provided, with the insured paying part of the cost.
The insured must pay the full cost of appliances and medicines.
governments.
Qualifying Conditions Unemployment benefit: The benefit covers persons
Survivor Benefits Survivor pension (orphan's pension): 100% of the base
dismissed as a result of enterprise reorganization, staff reduction, or the cancellation of a collective agreement; dismissed for a breach of discipline; or resigned from a job.
The insured had a minimum of 12 weeks of covered employment in the 12-month period preceding unemployment, or a minimum of 7 months of covered employment between two episodes of unemployment, or is seeking to rejoin the labor force after a lengthy period of unemployment, or is seeking work for the first time.
The insured must be registered at an employment office and be able and willing to work.
pension plus 50% of the bonus pension of 80 dr. for each year of covered employment of the insured; full orphans, 120% of the base pension plus 50% of the bonus pension of 80 dr. for each year of covered employment of both parents.
Administrative Organization Temporary disability benefits: General supervision by the Social Insurance State Fund.
Enterprises and employers pay benefits to their own employees.
Permanent disability and survivor pensions: Ministry of
Unemployment Benefits For insured persons dismissed as a result of enterprise reorganization, staff reduction, or the cancellation of a collective agreement, the monthly benefit is 100% of the basic unemployment benefit; for those who resigned from a job, 80% of the basic benefit; and for those dismissed for a breach of discipline, 60% of the basic benefit.
The basic unemployment benefit is 3,900 dr. a month.
Benefit is paid for up to 12 months.
Social Security is responsible for policy.
Council of the Social Insurance State Fund, including the Minister for Social Security, the Minister for Health, the Minister for Finance and Economics, the Chairman of the State Fund, and the Chairman of the Trade Unions, provides general coordination and oversight.
Regional and provincial branches of the Social Insurance State Fund administer the program.
Medical care: Ministry of Health and health departments of
local governments provide general supervision and coordination.
The Ministry of Health and local health departments administer the provision of medical services through clinics, hospitals, maternity homes, and other facilities.
Administrative Organization Social Insurance State Fund and the Ministry of Social Security provide general oversight.
Regional Employment Service and regional Departments of Labor and Employment administer the program.
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 31
Armenia
Family Allowances Regulatory Framework First law: 1944.
Current law: 1992, with 1993 amendment.
Type of program: Dual universal and social assistance
system.
Note: Provisions of this program are as of January 1995.
Coverage Families with children.
Source of Funds Insured person: None.
Employer: None.
Government: Total cost.
Qualifying Conditions Family allowances: Children under age 17.
Low-income family allowance: Urban families with children if income per capita is lower than 60% of the minimum wage.
Family Allowance Benefits Family allowances: Between 450 dr. and 650 dr. a month
(April 1995), depending on the number of children.
Supplementary benefit: 700 dr. a month (December 1994) for an unwed or single mother.
Low-income family allowance: 10% of the minimum wage a
month per child.
The maximum supplement is 60% of the minimum wage per family.
Birth grant: 3,000 dr. (April 1995).
Administrative Organization Ministry of Social Security and local Departments of Social Security are responsible for the program.
32 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
Australia Disability pension
Australia Exchange rate: U.S.$1.00 equals 1.76 Australian dollars (A$).
Social security (means-tested unless blind): Aged 16 to 65
Old Age, Disability, and Survivors Regulatory Framework First laws: 1908 (old-age and disability pensions) and 1942
(men) or 16 to 61 (women).
A minimum 20% impairment level and an inability to work for at least 30 hours a week at full wages, or be retrained for such work for at least the next 2 years due to a physical or mental impairment or permanent blindness.
Resident and physically present in the country.
If incapacity occurs prior to becoming an Australian resident, the same minimum residence requirements apply as for the oldage pension; there is no minimum residence requirement for an Australian resident with an impairment.
The pension is payable abroad under specific circumstances.
The pension may be reduced.
Wife's pension (means-tested): Paid when both the disability pensioner and his wife are over age 21 (unless they have dependent children).
(Since July 1, 1995, no new wife pensions have been awarded except for certain partners of recipients of a mature age allowance.)
Carer payment (means-tested): Paid to the provider of constant care at home for a recipient of social security or veteran's income support who has a physical or mental impairment (including a profoundly disabled child); or for two disabled children or more.
Mobility allowance (not means-tested): Paid to a disabled person aged 16 or older who cannot use public transportation without substantial assistance.
Mandatory occupational pension: There is no mandated
(widow pension).
Current laws: 1991 (social security), 1992 (superannuation
guarantee), and 1999 (family assistance).
Type of program: Dual social security (means-tested) and
mandatory occupational pension (earnings-based) system.
Coverage Social security: Residents.
Mandatory occupational pension: Employed persons
earning more than A$450 a month.
Exclusion: The self-employed.
Source of Funds Insured person
Social security: None.
Mandatory occupational pension: None required, but
provision for disability.
Survivor pension
voluntary contributions are encouraged.
Employer
Social security (means-tested): A widow(er) with dependent
Social security: None.
Mandatory occupational pension: 9% of basic wages.
Government
children is entitled to benefits under family tax benefit (Part B).
Widow allowance: A single woman aged 50 and without
Social security: Total cost from general revenue.
Mandatory occupational pension: None.
children if widowed, separated, or divorced after age 40.
The widow must be resident and physically present in the country and have no recent workforce experience.
(No new widow allowances have been awarded since March 20, 1997.)
If the widow resides in Australia when the spouse dies, there is no minimum residence requirement; otherwise, the minimum continuous residence requirement for the old-age pension is applied.
Benefits are payable abroad if the benefit is in payment before the person leaves the country.
The benefit may be reduced.
Mandatory occupational pension: There is no mandated
Qualifying Conditions Old-age pension
Social security (means-tested unless blind): Age 65 (men) or
age 62.5 (women, as of July 1, 2000, and rising gradually to age 65 by July 1, 2013); resident and physically present in the country; 10 years' continuous residence (5 continuous years if the total residence period exceeds 10 years).
The pension is payable abroad if the pension is in payment before the insured leaves the country.
The pension benefit may be reduced.
Mandatory occupational pension: Age 55 if permanently
provision for survivors.
Old-Age Benefits Old-age pension
Social security (means-tested unless blind): Up to A$210.90 a
retired.
week for a single person; A$176.05 each for a couple.
Wife's pension (means-tested): Up to A$176.05 a week.
Benefits for dependent children are paid through family allowances.
(No new wife pensions have been awarded since July 1, 1995.)
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 33
Australia Carer payment (means-tested): Up to A$210.90 a week; A$176.05 if caring for a spouse.
Rent assistance (means-tested): Up to A$60.06 per week, according to marital status and the level of rent.
Special rules apply to people living in retirement villages.
Pharmaceutical allowance: A$2.90 a week per family.
Telephone allowance: A$72 a year for telephone subscribers.
Remote area supplement: A$9.10 a week for a single person (A$15.60 a week for a couple), plus A$3.65 per child.
Pensioner concession card: Social security recipients are entitled to the concession card that provides reduced costs on certain federal, state or territory, and local government services.
Benefit adjustment: Benefits are adjusted in March and September according to changes in the price index (the single person rate of the old-age pension is maintained as a percentage of average weekly earnings).
Mandatory occupational pension: Usually a lump sum of total
Pensioner concession card: Social security recipients are entitled to the concession card that provides reduced costs on certain federal, state or territory, and local government services.
Orphan's payment: Benefits for orphans are delivered through family allowances.
Bereavement payment: The difference between a singleperson pension and a married-person pension is paid to the surviving partner for 14 weeks after a pensioner 's death; one pension payment is credited to the estate of a single pensioner.
Benefit adjustment: The survivor pension is adjusted in March and September according to changes in the price index.
Administrative Organization Department of Family and Community Services provides general supervision.
Centrelink administers the programs through 401 customer service centers and 16 area support offices.
contributions, plus interest minus administrative fees and taxes.
Sickness and Maternity Permanent Disability Benefits Regulatory Framework Disability pension First laws: 1944 (cash sickness benefits), 1947
Social security (means-tested unless blind): For all married
pensioners and single pensioners aged 21 and older, see oldage pension, above.
For single people aged 18 to 20 and living away from the family home, up to A$150.85 a week; A$99.15 a week if living in the family home.
Single disability pensioners under age 21 may also be eligible for the youth disability supplement of A$42.65 a week that is included in the rates of the disability support pension payable to pensioners under age 21.
Mobility allowance (not means-tested): A$32.20 a week.
Wife's pension (means-tested): See old-age benefits, above.
Carer payment (means-tested): See old-age benefits, above.
Rent assistance (means-tested): See old-age benefits, above.
Telephone allowance: See old-age benefits, above.
Remote area supplement: See old-age benefits, above.
Pensioner concession card: See old-age benefits, above.
Benefit adjustment: The disability pension, carer payment, and wife pension are adjusted in March and September according to changes in the price index.
(pharmaceutical benefits), and 1948 (national health program).
Current laws: 1991 (cash benefits), 1953 (medical and hospital
benefits), 1973 and 1983 (universal medical and hospital insurance, medicare).
Type of program: Dual social assistance (cash benefits) and
universal (medical care) system.
Note: Maternity benefits are provided under Family Allowances, below.
Coverage Cash benefits: Gainfully employed persons with limited
income; others meeting the qualifying conditions.
Medical and pharmaceutical benefits: Residents.
Source of Funds Insured person
Sickness allowance: None.
Medical benefits: 1.5% levy on income above A$26,523 for
Survivor Benefits Survivor pension
couples and single parents (increased by A$2,253 per child); A$15,718 for single persons without dependents.
Higher income thresholds apply to low-income earners and to senior citizens.
Exemption from the levy: Veterans, war widows, and armed forces personnel with dependents (half levy if no dependents).
Pharmaceutical benefits scheme: Cost sharing for
Social security (means-tested): See the single person old-age pension, above.
(No new widow allowances have been awarded since March 20, 1997.)
Rent assistance: See old-age benefits, above.
prescription drugs.
34 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
Australia Employer
Sickness allowance: None.
Medical benefits: None.
Pharmaceutical benefits scheme: None.
Government
Private benefit organizations pay for private hospital stays, or public hospitals charge for those who choose treatment by their own physician in public hospitals.
Pharmaceutical benefit: A fee of up to A$22.40 per prescription applies to most prescribed medicines.
Pensioners, benefit recipients, and low-income persons pay a A$3.60 fee per prescription.
Sickness allowance: Total cost of cash benefits.
Medical benefits: Rebates for medical and hospital benefits.
Pharmaceutical benefits scheme: Assistance is provided
The government pays pharmacists.
toward the cost of a wide range of prescription drugs.
Government funding is provided for residential and community aged care.
Federal government general revenue grants and medicare grants provided to states and territories for public hospital operating costs meet approximately 40% to 50% of the total funding of the medical insurance scheme.
Dependents' Medical Benefits The same medical and hospital benefits as for the head of the family.
Family membership in a private benefit organization will also cover dependents.
Administrative Organization Sickness allowance: Department of Family and Community
Services provides general supervision.
Qualifying Conditions Sickness allowance (means-tested): Age 21 (age 25 if a full-
Centrelink administers the programs through 401 customer service centers and 16 area support offices.
Medical and pharmaceutical benefits: Health Insurance
time student) up to pension age.
Resident in the country.
Sickness or injury prevents work and must have a job to return to, or intends to resume full-time studies.
Medical and pharmaceutical benefits: Residents.
Commission administers the program, and the federal Department of Health and Aged Care is responsible for policy development.
Sickness and Maternity Benefits Sickness allowance (means-tested): Up to A$166.40 a week
Work Injury Regulatory Framework First laws: For the six states, enacted between 1902 (Western
each for a couple with dependent children; A$161.70 for a single person aged 21 or older with no dependents, or up to A$174.95 a week if single with dependents or over age 60.
Benefits for children are paid under Family Allowances, below.
Benefits are payable after a 7-day waiting period for as long as the person is qualified.
Rent assistance: See old-age benefits under Old Age, Disability, and Survivors, above.
Pharmaceutical allowance: See old-age benefits under Old Age, Disability, and Survivors, above.
Remote area supplement: See old-age benefits under Old Age, Disability, and Survivors, above.
Concession card: Entitled to a health care card that makes available additional health, household, and transportation assistance from state, territory, and local governments.
Benefit adjustment: Benefits are adjusted in March and September according to changes in the price index.
Australia) and 1918 (Tasmania); 1911 (seamen's compensation); 1912 (commonwealth government employees); 1931 (Northern Territory); and 1946 (Australian Capital Territory).
Current laws: 1942, 1987, and 1998 (New South Wales); 1958,
1985, and 1993 (Victoria); 1986 (South Australia); 1986 (Northern Territory); 1988 (Tasmania); 1988 (federal government employees); 1989 (Australian Capital Territory); 1996 (Queensland); and 2001 (Western Australia).
Type of program: Compulsory insurance with a public or
private carrier.
Coverage Employed persons; the self-employed are not usually covered.
Source of Funds Insured person: None.
Employer: Total cost met through insurance premiums.
The
Workers' Medical Benefits Medical benefits: The patient pays 15% of the scheduled fee
for outpatient ambulatory care or A$50.10, whichever is less (indexed annually for price changes).
Hospital benefits: Free standard ward inpatient treatment by staff doctors in public hospitals.
cost of premiums varies with the assessed degree of risk.
Some employers are permitted to self-insure.
Government: None, except as a self-insurer for its own
employees.
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 35
Australia
Qualifying Conditions Work injury benefits: There is no minimum qualifying period.
Current law: 1991 (newstart allowance) and 1998 (youth
allowance).
Type of program: Unemployment assistance.
Temporary Disability Benefits The benefit varies depending on the state or territory in which the award is made.
Generally, the benefit is at least 95% of earnings for a minimum of 26 weeks.
Benefit may be payable for an extended period at reduced levels.
Maximum territories.
ceiling on lump-sum benefit levels are determined by the states and Usually, the maximum benefit is in the form of a the weekly benefit payment or is based on a total value.
Coverage Gainfully employed persons (also payable to those not previously gainfully employed who meet the qualifying conditions).
Source of Funds Insured person: None.
Employer: None.
Government: Total cost from general revenue.
Permanent Disability Benefits Permanent disability pension: Total disability.
See temporary disability benefits, above.
Qualifying Conditions Youth allowance (means-tested): Unemployed young
Partial disability pension: The pension is determined by the amount of earnings lost subject to a limit; lump-sum payments are made for specific injuries.
Lump-sum payments made for specified permanent injuries and for pain and suffering vary among states and territories.
Medical benefits: The reasonable cost of medical care,
people aged 16 to 20 (age 24 if a full-time student, age 15 or older if old enough to leave school) who undertake approved education, training, job search, or other activity to prepare for employment or are incapacitated for work because of an illness or injury.
The allowance is means-tested in terms of both parental and personal income and assets.
Newstart allowance (means-tested): Age 21 to pensionable
hospitalization, transportation, nursing care, and rehabilitation.
Survivor Benefits Survivor benefit: A lump sum for the survivor, plus a lump sum or a weekly payment for each child.
In some cases, the benefit for a child may include a lump sum as well as a weekly payment.
Benefit adjustment: Benefits are indexed.
Funeral grant: The reasonable cost of a funeral.
age 65 (men) or 62.5 (women).
A permanent resident and present in the country during the period of payment.
Must be unemployed, capable of undertaking and actively seeking work, or temporarily incapacitated for work because of an illness.
Unemployment is not due to voluntary leaving, a labor dispute, or the refusal of a suitable job offer.
Otherwise, benefit may be paid at a reduced rate for up to 26 weeks or postponed for up to 8 weeks.
Mature age allowance (means-tested): An older
Administrative Organization Worker 's Compensation Board or Commission administers claims in most states (except Australian Capital Territory, Northern Territory, Tasmania, and Western Australia, which have multi-insurer systems with claims administered by insurers).
Worker 's Compensation Board or Commission administers claims for Commonwealth employees.
Some states still allow common law actions for negligence against an employer.
unemployed person who is at least age 60 but less than pensionable age.
Must have received the newstart allowance for the preceding 9 months, or a nonactivity-tested payment in the 13 weeks prior to the claim, and have no recent workforce experience.
Recipients are not required to look for work.
Partner allowance (means-tested): Member of a couple
(born on or before July 1, 1955) whose partner receives a major social security pension or allowance.
Must have no recent workforce experience, no dependent children under age 16, and must not have received unemployment payments or sickness allowance in the 13 weeks prior to the claim.
Recipients are not required to look for work.
Unemployment Regulatory Framework First law: 1944.
Unemployment Benefits Youth allowance (means-tested): Between A$82.55 and A$197.65 a week depending on age, living arrangements, marital status, and whether recipient has dependent children.
36 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
Australia Newstart allowance (means-tested): Up to A$166.40 a week
Qualifying Conditions Family tax benefit, Parts A and B (income-tested): Families
for each member of a couple over age 21; A$184.50 a week if single, over age 21, and no dependents; A$199.50 if single with dependents, or single and over age 60, after receiving the allowance for 9 months.
The allowance is payable after a 7-day waiting period for as long as the person remains qualified.
Mature age allowance (means-tested): Same benefits as
under the newstart allowance, above.
Partner allowance (means-tested): Same benefits as under
the newstart allowance, above.
Rent assistance (means-tested): See old-age benefits under Old Age, Disability, and Survivors, above.
Single recipients under age 25 and living with their parents are not eligible for rent assistance.
Remote area supplement: See old-age benefits under Old Age, Disability, and Survivors, above.
Concession card: Entitled to a health care card, or a pensioner concession card if over age 60, after receiving social security benefits for 9 months.
Benefit adjustment: The newstart allowance is adjusted in March and September according to changes in the price index.
with dependent children up to and including age 20 (age 24 if a full-time student; age 21 for job seekers not receiving the youth allowance).
Benefit is awarded without being subject to an income test if annual family income is A$30,806 or less.
Families receive some benefit under Part A for annual family income up to A$83,184 with one dependent child under age 18 (the income ceiling is raised by A$6,752 for each additional dependent child under age 18) or A$84,401 with one dependent aged 18 to 24 (the income ceiling is raised by A$7,969 for each additional dependent aged 18 to 24).
In addition, Part B provides extra assistance for single-income families (including single parents), particularly for families with children under age 5.
Single parents are not subject to an income test.
Couples receive some benefit under Part B if the secondary earner 's annual income is below A$11,206 and if the youngest child is under age 5; below A$8,347 if the youngest child is between ages 5 and 18.
Large family supplement: For families with four or more children.
The supplement is paid on top of the family tax benefit.
Multiple birth allowance: For the birth of three children or more.
The allowance is paid every 2 weeks until the children are age 6.
Rent assistance: Payable to people receiving more than the base rate of the family tax benefit (Part A) and who pay rent to private landlords.
Double orphan pension: If both parents are dead (or one parent is dead and the other is in a hospital or an institution on a long-term basis, has been in prison for at least 10 years, or whose whereabouts is unknown) or for refugee children under certain circumstances.
Maternity allowance: Persons with a newborn child who are
Administrative Organization Department of Family and Community Services provides general supervision.
Centrelink administers the programs through 401 customer service centers and 16 area support offices.
Family Allowances Regulatory Framework First law: 1941 (family allowances).
Current laws: 1991 (orphan's pension), 1991 (child disability
allowance), 1995 (birth grant), 1996 (family tax payment), 1997 (parenting payment), 1997 (maternity immunization allowance), and 1999 (family assistance).
Type of program: Dual universal and social assistance
eligible for the family tax benefit (Part A).
Includes persons with adopted babies, stillborn babies, and babies who died shortly after birth.
Maternity immunization allowance: Persons who received a
system.
Coverage Residents with one child or more.
maternity allowance at the time of the child's birth or who are receiving or are eligible for a family tax benefit (Part A) when the child is between 18 and 24 months old and after the child receives age-appropriate immunization or valid exemption from immunization.
Child care benefit (income-tested): Resident families with
Source of Funds Insured person: None.
Employer: None.
Government: Total cost from general revenue.
children who pay for child care with an approved or registered care provider.
Children must meet the immunization requirements or be exempt from them.
Health care card: Recipients of the maximum family tax
benefit (Part A); a low-income health care card is provided to those satisfying an income test on average gross weekly income in the 8 weeks immediately before the claim is made.
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 37
Australia
Family Allowance Benefits Family tax benefit, Part A (income-tested): The minimum
and maximum rates of payment vary with the age of the dependent child.
The minimum rate per 2-week period for a child under age 18 is A$40.74 (ages 18 to 24 years, A$54.74).
The maximum rate per 2-week period for a child under age 13 is A$126.70; for ages 13 to 15, A$160.72; for ages 16 to 17, A$40.74; and for ages 18 to 24, A$54.74.
Family tax benefit, Part B (income-tested for couples): The maximum rate for a single parent with a child under age 5 is A$108.78 every 2 weeks; for ages 5 to 15 (ages 6 to 18 if a fulltime student), A$75.88 every 2 weeks.
The benefit rates for couples are subject to an income test if the annual income of the secondary earner is above A$1,752.
Large family supplement: A$8.68 every 2 weeks for each child after the third.
Multiple birth allowance: A$105.98 every 2 weeks for triplets; A$141.40 for quadruplets or more.
The allowance is usually added to the family tax benefit.
Rent assistance: Paid at the rate of 75 cents for each dollar of rent paid above a determined rent threshold.
The maximum rate of assistance for each 2-week period depends on whether the claimant is single or partnered, the number of children, and the level of rent.
Double orphan pension (not income-tested): A$42.80 every
2 weeks.
Maternity allowance: A single lump-sum payment of A$798.72 is paid for one child; A$1,597.44 for twins.
Maternity immunization allowance: A single lump-sum
payment of A$208.
Child care benefit (income-tested): The rate of benefit depends on the number of children, the number of hours of care paid for each week, the age of the children, and the status of the care provider.
Health care card: The card makes available additional health,
household, and transportation assistance from state, territory, and local governments.
Benefit adjustment: Benefits are adjusted on July 1 each year according to changes in the price index.
Administrative Organization Department of Family and Community Services provides general supervision.
Family Assistance Offices administer the program.
38 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
Azerbaijan
Azerbaijan Exchange rate: U.S.$1.00 equals 4,850 manat (AZM).
The full pension is paid with 45 years of service.
The pension is increased by 2% of the average monthly wage for each additional year of service, up to a maximum of 100% of the average monthly wage.
Early pension: Age 57 with at least 25 years of service (men) or age 52 with at least 20 years of service (women), including at least 12.6 years (men and women) working in unhealthy or arduous conditions.
Early pensions are also provided to mothers who have raised at least four children or a congenitally disabled child until age 8.
Dependent supplement: The spouse and children of deceased National Heroes of Azerbaijan receive 100% of the minimum old-age pension; the spouse and children of citizens who have died during national service receive 50% of the minimum oldage pension.
Special supplements: Group I disabled persons (totally disabled, incapable of doing any work, and requiring constant attendance), disabled children under age 16, and rehabilitated victims of political repression receive 50% of the minimum oldage pension; war veterans (including enrolled civilian personnel and partisan forces) and some other categories of military personnel receive 30%.
Group I war-disabled persons (totally disabled, incapable of doing any work, and requiring constant attendance) receive 100% of the minimum old-age pension; Group II war-disabled persons (disabled and not requiring constant attendance) receive 70%; Group III war-disabled persons (partially disabled and incapable of doing usual work) receive 50%.
Group I wardisabled persons who are also war veterans receive only the higher of these two supplements.
Social pension: For nonworking citizens aged 65 (men) and 60
Old Age, Disability, and Survivors Regulatory Framework First law: 1956.
Current laws: 1992 (armed forces); 1993 (pensions), with 1997
and 1998 amendments; and 1997 (social insurance).
Type of program: Dual social insurance and social assistance
system.
Local authorities and employers may provide supplementary benefits out of their own budgets.
Coverage Social insurance: All employed residents, including the selfemployed and members of collective farms.
Social pension: Elderly people, disabled people, and
survivors who are not eligible for social insurance benefits.
Source of Funds Insured person
Social insurance: 1.5% of gross earnings; self-employed persons, 20% of gross earnings.
Social pension: None.
Employer
Social insurance: 29% of payroll (nonagricultural); 23% of
payroll (agricultural).
Social pension: None.
Government
(women); or aged 55 for certain categories of mother who are not eligible for the old-age pension.
Disability pension: The pension is awarded according to
three assessed degrees of disability (Groups I to III).
The minimum degree of assessed disability for entitlement to a pension is 25%.
The benefit for different categories of insured person is determined by minimum periods of covered employment.
There is no minimum period if insured and under age 21; if between ages 21 and 23, 1 year of employment; if over age 23, 1 year of employment plus 3 months for each year over age 23.
Noncontributory periods are also credited or taken into consideration, including military and nonmilitary national service; education and professional training; care-giving for the disabled, children, and the elderly; for temporary disability; and for periods of unemployment.
Dependent supplement: For the spouse and children of nonworking Group I and II disabled persons, 20% of the minimum old-age pension per dependent.
There is no maximum.
Social pension: For Group I, II, or III disabled persons who
Social insurance: Subsidies as needed.
Social pension: Total cost.
All of the above contributions also finance cash sickness, maternity, and work injury benefits and family allowances.
Qualifying Conditions Old-age pension: Age 62 with 25 years of covered employment (men) or age 57 with 20 years of work (women).
The pensionable age for women will increase gradually by 6 months a year from January 2002 to 2012.
Covered employment includes years of military and alternative national service; care for Group I invalids, disabled children under age 16; periods of receiving unemployment allowance or in employment training; and periods of receiving a Group I or II disability pension as a result of military or civilian national service or an occupational disease.
are not eligible for a disability pension and for disabled children under age 16.
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 39
Azerbaijan Survivor pension: The insured had 1 to 15 years of work (depending on age at the time of death).
The pension is payable to a surviving spouse if retired or disabled, to a nonworking spouse, to a spouse caring for a child under age 8, to a spouse of someone killed in combat, and to children under age 18 (age 23 if a full-time student; no age limit if disabled).
earnings (80% if war-disabled); Group II, 50 % (60% if wardisabled); and Group III, 30% (40% if war-disabled).
Average monthly earnings: The insured's average monthly earnings (gross) calculated over 5 years chosen out of the entire employment history or over the last 2 years.
The maximum monthly earnings for benefit calculation purposes are 180,000 AZM.
The minimum pension for a Group I disability is 150% of the minimum old-age pension (200% if war-disabled) ; Group II, 100% (150% if war-disabled); and Group III, 70% (100% if wardisabled).
The maximum pension is three times the national average monthly wage (180,000 AZM).
Partial pension: The full pension is proportionately reduced to reflect the number of years of employment.
The minimum partial pension is 85% of the national minimum wage (which is the same as the social pension).
Dependent supplement: The spouse and children receive 20% of the minimum old-age pension per dependent.
There is no maximum.
Care supplement: For Group I disabled persons who require care and for all war-disabled (including dependent pensioners), 50% of the minimum old-age pension.
Social pension: 100% of minimum wage for a Group I
Other eligible survivors: The parents of an insured person killed in combat, regardless of whether they were dependent on the insured; if they have reached retirement age or are disabled and were dependent on the insured; and regardless of age or previous dependency if they do not work and care for one or more of the insured's children under age 8.
Brothers and sisters who satisfy the age conditions and whose parents are incapable of work or are not working but are caring for one or more of the insured's children, brothers, sisters, or grandchildren under age 8.
Grandparents who do not work but care for one or more of the insured's children, brothers, sisters, or grandchildren under age 8 and there is no one else capable of caring for them.
Grandchildren under age 18 (age 23 if a fulltime student) whose parents are incapable of work.
Social pension: Payable to a surviving dependent if the
insured did not qualify for a social insurance pension.
Old-Age Benefits Old-age pension: 60% of average monthly earnings plus 2% for every year of employment over the minimum requirement.
Average monthly earnings: The average monthly earnings (gross) are calculated on the basis of the 60 months of employment prior to the application for a pension.
The minimum pension is 70,000 AZM, plus a bread allowance of 11,000 AZM.
The maximum pension is 30% of the national average wage approved for calculating the pension.
Early pension: The reduction applied to early pensions varies from profession to profession.
Partial pension: Working pensioners are entitled to 50% of their pension.
Dependent supplement: Members of families of National Heroes of Azerbaijan who died for their country are entitled to 100% of the minimum old-age pension; members of families of other people who have died for their country are entitled to 50% of the minimum old-age pension.
Special supplements: 30%, 50%, 70%, or 100% of the minimum old-age pension, according to category.
Social pension: 80% of the minimum wage a month.
disability, for a Group II disability if the disability began in childhood, and for disabled children under age 16; 80% for a Group II disability (excluding the disabled up to age 16); 65% of the minimum wage for a Group III disability if the disability began before age 16.
Benefit adjustment: Benefits are adjusted according to changes in average monthly earnings.
Survivor Benefits Survivor pension: For a surviving spouse, 30% of the
insured's average monthly earnings; 60% if the insured was in military service.
The spouse's pension is terminated upon remarriage.
Orphan's pension: 30% of the insured's average monthly
earnings; 60% for full orphans.
Other dependents: 30% of the insured's average monthly earnings.
The minimum survivor pension is 100% of the minimum old-age pension per recipient.
There is no limit to total maximum survivor pensions.
Social pension: 80% of the minimum wage a month for each
Benefit adjustment: Benefits are adjusted according to changes in the average monthly earnings.
Permanent Disability Benefits Disability pension: The amount of benefit is based on the
orphan, nonworking parents, grandparents, aunts and uncles, and for siblings who were employed by the insured to care for a disabled child under age 8.
Benefit adjustment: Benefits are adjusted according to changes in average monthly earnings.
insured's average monthly earnings and assessed degree of disability.
For a Group I disability, 70% of average monthly
40 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
Azerbaijan
Administrative Organization Ministry of Labor and Social Protection of the Population provides general coordination and supervision.
Social Protection Fund and its regional counterparts collect and manage payroll contributions and finance benefit payments.
Regional and local departments of Ministry of Labor and Social Protection of the Population administers the program.
during the military conflict in Karabakh; for parents, wives, and children of soldiers killed in combat; and for persons who helped during the Chernobyl nuclear accident (80% of the last month's earnings for those employed for between 5 and 8 years; 60% of the last month's earnings for those who have worked for less than 5 years).
The benefit is paid from the first day of illness until recovery or until assessed as permanently incapable of work.
Death grant: For the death of an old-age pensioner.
Maternity benefit: 100% of gross average monthly earnings
Sickness and Maternity Regulatory Framework First law: 1912.
Current laws: 1997 (health care) and 1999 (health insurance).
Type of program: Dual social insurance (cash benefits) and
during the period before childbirth and 15,000 AZM a month after childbirth.
Employer pays the benefit for the first 56 to 70 days; thereafter, the benefits are paid by the social protection fund.
Maternity leave: For insured women in the nonagricultural sector, 70 days before and 56 days after (for multiple births or for a difficult delivery, 70 days after) the expected date of childbirth.
For insured women in the agricultural sector, 70 days before and 70 days after (for a difficult delivery, 86 days after; for multiple births, 110 days after) the expected date of childbirth.
universal (medical care) system.
Coverage Cash benefits: Employed citizens; voluntary coverage for the
self-employed.
Medical care: Permanent residents.
Workers' Medical Benefits Compulsory medical insurance is organized by employers and covers medical services provided directly to patients by public and private facilities contracted by the health insurance agencies.
(Mandatory medical insurance for nonworking people is organized by the local authorities.)
Free medical services include the provision of wheelchairs, immunization and vaccination services, and home nursing care for Group I disabled persons.
There is compensation for transport expenses for disabled persons and for authorized medical treatment abroad.
Groups I and II disabled persons and persons with long employment records are entitled to free dental prosthesis and medicines prescribed by a doctor.
Prosthesis, spectacles, and hearing aids are free for Groups I, II, and III disabled persons and for those with long employment records.
General dental care is not free except for children up to age 16 and vulnerable groups of the population, including the disabled.
Source of Funds Insured person
Cash sickness and maternity benefits: See Old Age,
Disability, and Survivors, above.
Medical care: None.
Employer
Cash sickness and maternity benefits: See Old Age,
Disability, and Survivors, above.
Medical care: None.
Government
Cash sickness and maternity benefits: May cover deficits.
Medical care: Total cost.
Qualifying Conditions Cash sickness and maternity benefits: All employed
Dependents' Medical Benefits Individual entitlement.
persons.
Medical care: Permanently resident.
Administrative Organization Sickness and Maternity Benefits Sickness benefit: 100% of the last month's earnings for Cash benefits: State Social Protection administers benefits.
Employers also pay some maternity benefits.
Medical care: Ministry of Health administers the program.
those employed for more than 8 years; for those wounded during the military conflict in Baku in 1990; for those wounded
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 41
Azerbaijan
Work Injury Regulatory Framework First law: 1956.
Current law: 1996.
Type of program: Dual social insurance (cash benefits) and
Workers' Medical Benefits Medical services are provided directly to patients by governmental health providers.
Benefits include general and specialist care, hospitalization, laboratory services, transportation, and the full cost of appliances and medicines.
Rehabilitation and vocational training are available to disabled persons.
All costs are paid by the employer.
universal (medical care) system.
Coverage Cash benefits: All employees and insured self-employed
Survivor Benefits Survivor benefit
persons.
Medical care: All residents.
Widow(er) pension: For a widow(er) under the pensionable
age, 1/3 of the average monthly earnings.
Orphan's pension: Basic earnings are shared equally.
Other eligible survivors (in the absence of the above): Basic earnings are shared equally among dependent parents and other relatives.
Dependent supplement: See survivor benefits under Old Age,
Source of Funds Insured person: See Old Age, Disability, and Survivors,
above.
Employer: See Old Age, Disability, and Survivors, above; and
Disability, and Survivors, above.
The maximum survivor pension is 100% of average monthly earnings.
Funeral grant: The employer covers all funeral expenses.
the cost of medical care and funeral grants.
Government: See Old Age, Disability, and Survivors, above;
and the total cost of medical care.
Qualifying Conditions Work injury benefits: There is no minimum qualifying period.
Administrative Organization Temporary disability benefits: Enterprises and employers
pay benefits to their own employees.
Temporary Disability Benefits 100% of previous income.
The benefit is payable from the first day of incapacity until recovery or the award of a permanent disability pension.
Pensions: Ministry of Labor and Social Protection of the
Permanent Disability Benefits Permanent disability pension: 100% of average monthly earnings multiplied by the assessed degree of incapacity.
The pension is paid monthly.
Population provides general coordination and supervision.
Social Protection Fund and its regional counterparts collect and manage payroll contributions and finance benefit payments.
Regional and local departments of Ministry of Labor and Social Protection of the Population administer the program.
Medical care: Ministry of Health and health departments of
Average monthly earnings: Equal to average monthly earnings (gross) during the 60 months of employment prior to the application for a pension.
The minimum degree of assessed disability for entitlement to a pension is 25%.
Disability lump sum: A lump sum equal to 100% of average monthly earnings multiplied by the assessed degree of disability.
Care allowance: 9,000 AZM for a Group I disabled person to pay for someone else to provide personal care.
Benefit adjustment: Periodic adjustment according to the changes in the retail price index.
local governments provide general supervision and coordination.
Medical services are delivered through clinics, hospitals, and other facilities administered by the Ministry of Health and local health departments.
Unemployment Regulatory Framework First law: 1991.
Current laws: 1999 (labor code) and 2001(employment).
Type of program: Social insurance system.
Coverage All residents.
42 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
Azerbaijan
Source of Funds Employee: Information is not available.
Employer: Information is not available.
Government: Subsidies as needed from national and local
Source of Funds Insured person: See Old Age, Disability, and Survivors,
above.
Employer: See Old Age, Disability, and Survivors, above.
Government: Total cost of child benefit is financed by the
governments.
state budget.
Qualifying Conditions Unemployment benefit: At least 26 weeks of covered
Qualifying Conditions Child benefit: For resident under age 16 (age 18 if a secondary
employment in the 12 months preceding unemployment.
The insured must be between age 15 and the pensionable age, registered with the state employment services, and actively seeking, and willing to, work.
Benefit is suspended for 3 months for refusing two acceptable job offers or for failing to attend the monthly registration at the employment service without a valid reason.
Benefit is terminated for filing a false or fraudulent claim or for refusing to attend vocational training.
school student with no student allowance).
The benefit is income-tested.
The average monthly income per family member should be no more than 16,500 AZM.
Child-raising allowance: For employees who leave the labor
force in order to raise a child.
There is no minimum qualifying period.
Family Allowance Benefits Child benefit: Claims for benefits are either normal or special.
Unemployment Benefits Unemployment benefit is paid for a total of 26 weeks in a 12month period.
The benefit is 70% of average monthly gross earnings received during the 12 months before the termination of employment.
The benefit must not exceed the national average monthly wage.
Family supplement: 10% of benefit for each dependent up to age 18, up to a maximum of 50% of the benefit.
For a normal case, the basic amount varies according to the income of the family.
The full normal benefit is 9,000 AZM per child.
For a special case, the basic amount does not vary with the age of the child or the income of the family.
For a child whose parent is in periodic military service, 12,600 AZM a month; children of war invalids and martyrs, 20,000 AZM a month; children of parents killed during the defense of the motherland, 35,000 AZM; children of a parent who helped during the Chernobyl nuclear accident, 25,000 AZM.
Child-raising allowance: 15,000 AZM a month until the child
Administrative Organization Ministry of Labor and Social Protection of the Population provides general oversight.
State Employment Service, with its local branch offices, is responsible for administering the program, paying benefits, providing services for unemployed persons (including training), and also for creating new jobs.
is age 3.
Birth and adoption grants: The mother (or other recognized
carer) is entitled to a lump-sum benefit of 70,000 AZM.
Full orphan's special allowance: 5,500 AZM a month until
age 16.
Administrative Organization Ministry of Labor and Social Protection of the Population provides general oversight.
Local branches of the Ministry of Labor and Social Protection of the Population are responsible for administering social security benefits and paying benefits to nonworking parents.
Social Protection Fund is responsible for financing social security benefits.
Family Allowances Regulatory Framework First law: 1944.
Current laws: 1993 (pensions), with 1997 and 1998
amendments; 1995 and 1996 (children of low-income families).
Type of program: Dual universal (child benefit) and social
insurance system (child-raising allowance).
Coverage Child benefit: All residents; the benefit is usually paid to a parent or the person responsible for raising the child.
Child-raising allowance: Employees and self-employed
persons.
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 43
Bahrain Disability pension: Six months' continuous coverage before
Bahrain Exchange rate: U.S.$1.00 equals 0.37 dinars.
the onset of the disability (3 months' continuous coverage with a total of 12 months of contributions), for men before age 60 and for women before age 55.
Survivor pension: Insured met the qualifying conditions for a
Old Age, Disability, and Survivors Regulatory Framework First and current law: 1976, with amendments.
Type of program: Social insurance system.
pension or was a pensioner at the time of death and had coverage for 6 consecutive months before death (3 months' coverage with a total of 12 months of contributions).
Also if the disability or death occurs within 1 year following the termination of employment.
Old-Age Benefits Old-age pension: 2% of average earnings in the last 2 years
Coverage Bahraini employed persons in establishments with 10 employees or more; workers in establishments with fewer than 10 employees may contribute voluntarily.
Exclusions: Domestic servants, certain groups of agricultural employees, casual workers, the self-employed, and temporary noncitizen workers.
Special system for public employees.
Voluntary coverage is available for persons with 5 years or more of previous compulsory social security coverage but who no longer are covered on a compulsory basis.
Voluntary coverage for employers and the self-employed.
times the number of years of contributions (with an additional 5 years credited for those retiring at age 60 or older up to a maximum of 30 years).
Minimum pension: The average contributory wage during the last 2 years or 150 dinars, whichever is less.
The contributory wage is equal to the total monthly wage received in January of each year.
Reduced pension: The pension is reduced by 20% if the insured person retires before age 45, by 15% if between ages 45 and 49, and by 10% if between ages 50 and 54.
Supplement for pensioner and dependents: A variable amount to raise the pension benefit to 30 dinars for each dependent family member, including the pensioner, provided that the total benefit income does not exceed the average contributory wage (the total monthly wage received in January of each year) during the last 2 years.
Old-age settlement: If ineligible for an old-age pension, a
Source of Funds Insured person: 5% of earnings; previously insured persons may contribute 12% of their declared income on a voluntary basis.
The self-employed may voluntarily contribute 12% of monthly income between lower and upper limits of 200 dinars and 500 dinars, respectively.
The upper limit for monthly income may be increased by no more than 5% of monthly income annually up to a final ceiling of 1,000 dinars.
Employer: 7% of payroll.
Government: None.
lump sum equal multiplied by 12 plus 5% interest the settlement is
to 15% of average earnings in the last 2 years, times the number of years of contributions, from the date coverage stops until the date paid.
Permanent Disability Benefits Disability pension: 2% of average monthly earnings in the
previous year times the number of years of contributions.
Qualifying Conditions Old-age pension
Men: After age 60, with 10 years of coverage; age 60, with 15
years of coverage; before age 60, with 20 years of coverage.
Women: Age 55 and older, with 10 years of coverage; before
The minimum pension is equal to 44% or 46% of average monthly earnings in the last year of contribution or 150 dinars, whichever is higher; or the contributory wage, if less.
The contributory wage is equal to the total monthly wage received in January of each year.
The maximum pension is equal to 88% of average monthly earnings in the last year of contribution.
Supplement for pensioner and dependents: A variable amount raising pension benefit to 30 dinars for each dependent family member, including the pensioner, provided that the total benefit income does not exceed the average contributory wage during the last year.
The contributory wage is equal to the total monthly wage received in January of each year.
Disability settlement: If ineligible for a disability pension, a
age 55, with 15 years of coverage.
Reduced pension: A reduced pension is available before age 60 (men) with 240 months of contribution or before age 55 (women) with 180 months of contributions.
Retirement from usual employment is necessary.
Retirees are allowed to combine pension income and earned income from a new employment position provided that total income does not exceed the level of income earned at the time of retirement.
lump sum equal to 15% of average earnings in the last 2 years,
44 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
Bahrain multiplied by 12 times the number of years of contributions, plus 5% interest from the date the insured ceased employment because of the onset of disability until the date the settlement is paid.
Work Injury Regulatory Framework First and current law: 1976.
Type of program: Social insurance system.
Survivor Benefits Survivor pension
Coverage Employed persons in establishments with 10 workers or more.
Exclusions: Domestic servants, casual employees, those engaged in family labor, the self-employed, and agricultural workers.
Special system for public employees.
Widow's pension: 37.5% of the insured's pension.
Orphan's pension: 50% of the insured's pension (100% for a
full orphan) divided equally among the insured's children (a son must be under age 22; under age 26 if a student in higher education).
Other eligible survivors (in the absence of the above): 12.5% of the insured's pension is divided equally among dependent parents, brothers, and sisters.
The minimum benefit is 30 dinars a month.
The maximum benefit is 100% of the insured's average earnings.
For any years of coverage in excess of the number of years needed to obtain the maximum benefit, a lump-sum payment equal to 11% of annual earnings of each excess year is awarded.
Supplement for pensioner and dependents: A variable amount raising the pension benefit to 30 dinars for each dependent family member, including the pensioner.
Marriage grant: A marriage grant equal to 15 times the monthly pension is awarded upon marriage to each female heir who is currently receiving a pension.
The marriage grant is paid only once.
Entitlement to a survivor pension for widows, daughters, or sisters ceases on marriage but may be reinstated if she is subsequently divorced or widowed.
Survivor settlement: If the deceased was not a pensioner or did not meet the qualifying conditions for a pension, a lump sum equal to 15% of the deceased's average earnings in the last 2 years, multiplied by 12 times the number of years of contributions, plus 5% interest from the date of death until the date the settlement is paid.
Death grant: Six months' earnings or pension, plus 300 dinars
Source of Funds Insured person: None.
Employer: 3% of payroll; 1% if the employer pays cash
benefits to an insured worker who is receiving medical treatment and pays the insured's transportation expenses to the place of treatment; provides medical care to insured workers in employer-owned hospital facilities.
Government: None.
Qualifying Conditions Work injury benefits: There is no minimum qualifying period.
Temporary Disability Benefits 100% of average daily earnings.
The first day of incapacity is payable by the employer; thereafter, benefit is payable by the General Organization for Social Insurance until recovery or certification of permanent disability.
Permanent Disability Benefits Permanent disability pension: 88% or 92% of average
monthly earnings if totally disabled.
The minimum pension is 150 dinars a month or 100% of the contributory wage, whichever is less.
The contributory wage is equal to the total monthly wage received in January of each year.
Partial disability: A percentage of the full pension proportionate to the degree of disability.
For a loss of capacity of less than 30%, a lump sum equal to 36 times the monthly benefit for permanent disability multiplied by the actual percentage of the disability.
Supplement for pensioner and dependents: A variable amount to raise the pension benefit to 30 dinars for each dependent family member, including the pensioner.
for funeral expenses; 400 dinars if the insured died abroad and is brought back to Bahrain to be buried.
Administrative Organization Minister of Labor and Social Affairs provides general supervision.
General Organization for Social Insurance, managed by a board of directors, administers the program.
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 45
Bahrain
Workers' Medical Benefits Medical and surgical care, hospitalization, drugs, appliances, rehabilitation, transportation, diagnostic examinations, and dental care inside or outside Bahrain.
Survivor Benefits Survivor pension
Calculated on the basis of between 88% and 92% of the insured's average monthly earnings.
Widow's pension: 37.5% of the insured's pension.
Orphan's pension: 50% of the insured's pension divided equally among the insured's children (a son must be under age 22; age 26 if a student in higher education).
Other eligible survivors (in the absence of the above): 12.5% of the insured's pension is divided equally among dependent parents, brothers, and sisters.
Supplement for pensioner and dependents: A variable amount to raise the pension benefit to 30 dinars for each dependent family member, including the pensioner.
The minimum benefit is 150 dinars a month.
The maximum benefit is 100% of the pension.
Marriage grant: A marriage grant equal to 15 times the monthly pension is awarded upon marriage to each female heir who is currently receiving a pension.
The marriage grant is paid only once.
Entitlement to a survivor pension for widows, daughters, or sisters ceases on marriage but may be reinstated if she is subsequently divorced or widowed.
Death grant: Six months' earnings or pension, plus 300 dinars
for funeral expenses; 400 dinars if the insured died abroad or is buried abroad.
Administrative Organization Minister of Labor and Social Affairs provides general supervision.
General Organization for Social Insurance, managed by a board of directors, administers the program.
46 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
Bangladesh Medical benefits: Medical facilities provided by some
Bangladesh Exchange rate: U.S.$1.00 equals 58 takas.
employers in the public and private sectors through dispensaries in their establishments; workers can also use general hospital facilities run by the government.
Source of Funds
Old Age, Disability, and Survivors Regulatory Framework First and current law: 1998.
Type of program: Targeted social assistance system.
Insured person: None.
Employer: Total cost.
Government: Provides hospital facilities.
Special system for public-sector employees.
Note: Unless otherwise noted, this information is more than 8 years old.
Qualifying Conditions Cash maternity benefits: Nine months' service with the
employer by the expected date of childbirth.
Coverage Low-income citizens aged 57 and older.
Sickness and Maternity Benefits Sickness benefit: 50% of wages for factory workers and
Source of Funds Insured person: None.
Employer: None.
Government: Total cost.
100% of wages for workers in shops, establishments, and large factories, for up to 14 days a year.
Maternity benefit: Cash payment, depending on prior wages,
for 6 weeks before and 6 weeks after childbirth.
Workers' Medical Benefits Where medical facilities are not provided, a medical allowance of 100 takas a month is paid to workers.
Qualifying Conditions Aged 57, resident in Bangladesh, and selected for eligibility.
Administrative Organization Ministry of Labor and Manpower.
Public Health Service.
Old-Age Benefits Old-age pension: A monthly pension of 120 takas (July 2002),
equal to 10% of average income.
Work Injury Regulatory Framework First Law: 1923.
Current laws: 1980 and 1982.
Administrative Organization The government is responsible for administering the social assistance program.
Sickness and Maternity Regulatory Framework First Law: 1939.
Current Laws: 1950 and 1965.
Type of program: Social insurance system providing cash
Type of program: Employer-liability system for accidental
injuries and 34 listed occupational diseases.
Coverage Employees of railways, factories with 10 or more workers, and estate and dock employees.
Exclusions: Clerical staff, and workers earning 1,200 takas or more a month.
and medical benefits.
Coverage Cash sickness benefits: Employees of factories in
Source of Funds Insured person: None.
Employer: Total cost.
Government: None.
manufacturing industries employing 10 or more workers and employees of shops and establishments of 5 or more workers.
Exclusion: Clerical staff.
Cash maternity benefits: Employed women.
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 47
Bangladesh
Qualifying Conditions Work injury benefits: There is a 4-day waiting period.
Temporary Disability Benefits 100% of wages for the first 2 months, 2/3 of wages for the next 2 months, and half of wages for subsequent months of disability or for 1 year, whichever is shorter.
Permanent Disability Benefits Between 10,000 takas and 30,000 takas a month, depending on the insured's monthly wage, payable for up to a year of disability.
Survivor Benefits Between 8,000 takas and 21,000 takas depending on the insured's monthly wage.
Administrative Organization Ministry of Labor and Manpower.
Commissioner of Workmen's Compensation.
Unemployment Regulatory Framework First and current law: 1965.
Labor Employment Act (1965) provides a termination benefit, a retrenchment and layoff benefit, and a benefit for discharge from service on the grounds of ill health.
Coverage Workers in shops and commercial and industrial establishments.
Source of Funds Insured person: None.
Employer: Total cost.
Government: None.
Unemployment Benefits Monthly rated permanent employees receive half of the average basic wage for 120 days (plus 1 month's salary for each year of service); casual workers, for 60 days (plus a lumpsum payment of 14 days' wages for each year of service); and temporary workers, for 30 days.
Administrative Organization Ministry of Labor and Manpower.
48 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
Brunei
Brunei Exchange rate: U.S.$1.00 equals 1.78 Brunei dollars (B$).
Old-Age Benefits Provident fund: A lump sum equal to the total employee and
employer contributions, plus compound interest.
Early withdrawal: Insured persons may draw down 25% of accumulated assets.
Drawdown payment: The fund member may draw down up to 45% of accumulated assets in the individual account before age 50 for building or purchasing a house.
The full withdrawal of accumulated assets in the individual account is allowed if emigrating permanently.
Interest rate adjustment: Set by the government annually.
Universal old-age pension: A flat-rate amount.
Old Age, Disability, and Survivors Regulatory Framework First law: 1955.
Current law: 1992 (employees' trust fund).
Type of program: Dual provident fund and universal old-age
pension system.
Coverage Provident fund: Citizens and permanent residents employed
Permanent Disability Benefits Disability benefit (provident fund): A lump sum equal to total
under a service contract.
Exclusions: Security personnel, foreign workers, and employees older than age 55.
Universal old-age pension: Residents.
employee and employer contributions plus compound interest.
Interest rate adjustment: Set by the government annually.
Survivor Benefits Survivor benefit (provident fund): A lump sum equal to total
Prior to 1993, a special system for pensionable government employees.
employee and employer contributions plus compound interest.
Interest rate adjustment: Set by the government annually.
Source of Funds Insured person
Administrative Organization Employees' Trust Fund Board supervises the program.
Ministry of Finance is responsible for administration and financial matters.
Social Welfare Unit of the Ministry of Culture, Youth, and Sports administers welfare assistance benefits.
Provident fund: 5% of monthly salary if the monthly salary
exceeds B$80.
Universal old-age pension: None.
Employer
Provident fund: 5% of monthly payroll.
Universal old-age pension: None.
Government
Sickness and Maternity Regulatory Framework The government provides health care free of charge.
Provident fund: None.
Universal old-age pension: Total cost.
Qualifying Conditions Old-age benefit
Provident fund: Age 55.
Early withdrawal: Age 50.
Drawdown payment: Fund members can draw down funds from their individual account for building or purchasing a house.
Universal old-age pension: 30 years of residence.
Disability benefit (provident fund): The fund member must be certified by a recognized physician as being physically or mentally incapacitated for employment.
Survivor benefit (provident fund): Paid to the next of kin.
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 49
Burma (Myanmar)
Sickness and Maternity Benefits
Burma (Myanmar) Exchange rate: U.S.$1.00 equals 450 kyats.
Sickness benefit: 50% of earnings, according to 10 wage
classes.
The benefit is payable from the first day of incapacity for up to 26 weeks for one illness.
The minimum benefit is 2.55 kyats a day.
Maternity benefit: 2/3 of earnings, according to 10 wage classes.
The benefit is payable for 6 weeks before and 6 weeks after childbirth.
The minimum benefit is 2.55 kyats a day.
Old Age, Disability, and Survivors Regulatory Framework Special pension system for public-sector employees only.
Survivor Benefits Funeral grant: 1,000 kyats, payable under the sickness and
Workers' Medical Benefits Medical services are provided directly to patients through the Social Security Board's dispensaries and hospital, the dispensaries of large employers, and public hospitals.
Benefits include medical care at the dispensary, emergency domiciliary care, specialist and laboratory services at a diagnostic center, necessary hospitalization, maternity care, and medicines.
The duration of benefits is 26 weeks for one illness (may be extended in special cases).
maternity program.
Sickness and Maternity Regulatory Framework First and current law: 1954.
Type of program: Social insurance system providing cash
and medical benefits.
Administrative Organization Ministry of Labor provides general supervision.
Social Security Board administers the program.
Coverage Employees of firms in industry and commerce with five or more workers and employees of specified industries and services.
Coverage is being extended gradually to different regions.
Coverage is provided in Yangon, Mandalay, Mawlamyaing, Pathein, Bago, and 92 townships.
Work Injury Regulatory Framework First law: 1923.
Current law: 1954 (social insurance).
The first law is still in
Source of Funds Insured person: 0.5% to 1% of earnings, according to 10
force for nonagricultural employees not yet covered by the current law.
Type of program: Social insurance system.
wage classes.
Employer: 0.5% to 1% of payroll, according to 10 wage
classes.
Government: Subsidies if necessary.
Coverage Employees of firms in industry and commerce with five or more workers and employees of specified industries and services.
Coverage is being extended gradually to different regions.
Coverage is provided in Yangon, Mandalay, Mawlamyaing, and 92 other districts.
Maximum monthly earnings for contribution and benefit purposes are 1,000 kyats.
Qualifying Conditions Cash sickness benefits: Seventeen weeks of contributions in the last 26 weeks (or registered as unemployed for not more than 26 weeks).
Cash maternity benefit: Twenty-six weeks of contributions in
Source of Funds Insured person: None.
Employer: 1% of payroll, according to 10 wage classes.
Government: None.
the 52 weeks before the expected date of childbirth.
Medical benefits: In insured employment (or registered as
unemployed for not more than 26 weeks).
Maximum monthly earnings for contribution and benefit purposes are 1,000 kyats.
50 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
Burma (Myanmar)
Qualifying Conditions Work injury benefits: There is no minimum qualifying period.
Temporary Disability Benefits 2/3 of earnings, according to 10 wage classes.
The benefit is payable from the first day of incapacity for up to 52 weeks.
Permanent Disability Benefits Permanent disability pension: 2/3 of earnings, according to
10 wage classes, if totally disabled.
Constant-attendance supplement: 25% of the insured's pension.
Partial disability: A percentage of the full pension, calculated according to the percentage loss of capacity; if the loss of capacity is less than 20%, the benefit is converted to a lump sum equal to 5 years' pension.
Workers' Medical Benefits Same as for sickness benefit but with appliances also provided.
There is no limit on duration.
Survivor Benefits Survivor pension: Between 28 kyats and 267 kyats a month,
according to 10 wage classes.
The average benefit is about 27% of covered earnings.
Orphan's pension: Between 14 kyats and 133.50 kyats a month, according to 10 wage classes for each orphan under age 16.
The average pension is about 13% of covered earnings.
Full orphans: Between 21 kyats and 200 kyats each.
The average pension is about 20% of covered earnings.
Other eligible survivors (if no widow or orphan): Aged or disabled dependent relatives.
Maximum survivor pension: 2/3 of earnings.
Funeral grant: 1,000 kyats.
Administrative Organization Ministry of Labor provides general supervision.
Social Security Board administers contributions and benefits.
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 51
China
Qualifying Conditions
China Exchange rate: U.S.$1.00 equals 8.27 yuan.
Old-age pension (basic pension insurance and individual pension account): Age 60 (men) or age 60 (professional
women), age 55 (nonprofessional salaried women), or age 50 (other categories of women).
If employed in arduous or unhealthy work, age 55 (men) and age 45 (women) with at least 15 years of coverage.
Early retirement: Age 50 (men) or age 45 (women) with 10 years of coverage and if totally disabled.
Disability pension: Total incapacity for work and ineligible for
Old Age, Disability, and Survivors Regulatory Framework First law: 1951.
Current law and directives: 1953 (law) and 1978, 1995, 1997,
early retirement.
Survivor grant: Deceased was in covered employment or a
and 1999 (directives).
Type of program: Local government social insurance
pensioner.
(basic pension) and individual pension accounts systems.
(Provincial and city/county social insurance agencies and employers adapt central government guidelines to local conditions.)
Old-Age Benefits Basic pension (central government guidelines): 20% of the citywide or countywide average wage of the preceding year if the enterprise is participating in city/county retirement pension pools.
Coverage Employees in state-run enterprises.
Collective, private, and foreign-invested enterprises (Chinese nationals only) and/or the self-employed may provide similar or separate programs, depending on local government regulations.
Employees of government and communist party organizations and of cultural, educational, and scientific institutions (except for off-budget financed institutions) are covered under a government-funded employer-administered system.
None if less than 15 years of coverage.
Individual pension account (central government guidelines): Monthly benefits equal to 1/120 of total employer
Source of Funds Insured person
and employee contributions plus interest, applicable to workers employed after the establishment of individual pension accounts (transition arrangements are provided by local governments for workers whose employment began before the introduction of individual accounts and ended after).
Benefits paid beyond 120 months will be paid out of a reserve fund from balances of employer contributions to individual accounts closed upon the death of the account holders (see individual pension accounts under survivor benefits, below).
Lump-sum pension: A lump sum equal to the account balance is paid for less than 15 years of contributions.
The minimum pension is set by provincial and city/county governments according to local standards of living.
Basic pension insurance: None, or as determined by local
government regulations.
Individual pension account: 8% of taxable wage.
Employer
Basic pension insurance: An average 20% of payroll, depending on local government regulations, if participating in city/county retirement pension pools.
Permanent Disability Benefits Basic pension (central government guidelines): 40% of
Nonparticipating enterprises: Total cost.
Individual pension account: 3% of taxable wage.
Government
wage.
The minimum pension is set by provincial and city/county governments according to local standards of living.
Individual pension account (central government guidelines): None.
Regulations by local governments vary.
Basic pension insurance: Central and local government
subsidies as needed.
Individual pension account: Central and local government
Survivor Benefits Basic pension (central government guidelines): A lump
subsidies as needed.
sum of between 6 and 12 months of the insured's wage, according to the number of surviving dependents.
52 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
China Funeral grant Government: Central and local government subsidies as
Death of the insured: A lump sum equal to 2 months' average
needed.
earnings of all the employees in the same enterprise.
Death of dependent immediate family members: From 1/3 to
Qualifying Conditions Sickness, maternity, and medical benefits: There is no
1/2 of the monthly average wage, depending on the age of the deceased.
Individual pension account (central government guidelines): A lump sum equal to the balance of the insured's total
minimum qualifying period.
contributions to the account plus interest, payable to the insured's legal heir.
Sickness and Maternity Benefits Sickness benefit (central government guidelines for permanent workers): 60% to 100% of wage, according to the
Administrative Organization Ministry of Labor and Social Security, Department of Pensions, provides general guidance.
Provincial or city/county social insurance agencies administer their respective retirement pension pools and individual pension accounts.
length of service, payable by the employer for up to 6 months each year; thereafter, 40% to 60% is payable by the employer until recovery or the determination of permanent disability.
Contract workers receive the same benefits as permanent workers.
Maternity benefit (central government guidelines for permanent workers): 100% of earnings, payable by the
Sickness and Maternity Regulatory Framework First law: 1951.
Current law and directives: 1953 (law) and 1978 (directives
employer for up to 90 days for childbirth; 100% of earnings is payable for up to 42 days in cases of abortion.
Contract workers receive the same benefits as permanent workers.
Workers' Medical Benefits Medical benefits (central government guidelines for permanent workers): Medical services are provided by an
for permanent employees), 1986 (directives for contract workers), 1988 and 1994 (directives for women employees), and 1998 (law).
Type of program: Local government social insurance (medical
fund pools) and/or employer-provided (medical savings accounts) programs.
Local governments and employers adapt central government guidelines to local conditions.
employer 's clinic or hospital or paid for directly by the employer.
Benefits include treatment by a doctor, maternity care, hospitalization, and the full cost of surgery and ordinary medicines.
Employees pay a registration fee for outpatient and inpatient care, house calls, and boarding costs if hospitalized.
Additional employee copayments may also apply, varying according to individual enterprises or local government regulations (for participating enterprises in local government medical care insurance pools).
Contract workers receive the same benefits as permanent workers.
Coverage Permanent and contract employees in state-run enterprises and some collective enterprises.
Employees of government and communist party organizations; employees of cultural, educational, and scientific institutions (except for off-budget financed institutions); and university students are covered under government-funded and employeradministered programs.
Dependents' Medical Benefits Medical benefits for dependents (central government guidelines for permanent workers): Treatment by a doctor
Source of Funds Insured person: Up to 2% of wages.
Employer: An average 6% of total payroll (may or may not
include nonwage subsidies), depending on funding needs or local government regulations (if local government fundpooling is available and if enterprises are participating).
Nonparticipating enterprises: Total cost.
in an employer 's clinic, and 50% of the cost of surgery and ordinary medicines, if dependents are not otherwise covered.
Additional patient copayments may also apply, varying according to individual enterprises or local government regulations (for participating enterprises in local government medical care insurance pools).
Dependents of contract workers receive the same benefits.
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 53
China
Administrative Organization Ministry of Labor and Social Security, Department of Medical Care Insurance, provides general guidance to local governments' experimental medical insurance programs.
Local government social insurance agencies and participating enterprises administer medical care insurance with pooled funds.
Ministry of Public Health provides general guidance to medical care providers.
Individual state-run enterprises administer cash benefit programs.
Permanent Disability Benefits Permanent disability pension (central government guidelines): 75% to 90% of wage if totally disabled.
Disability allowance: A lump sum of between 6 and 24 months' wage.
Minimum pension: Provincial and city/county governments set the minimum pension according to the local standard of living.
Partial disability: 10% to 30% of wage, according to earnings loss.
Workers' Medical Benefits
Work Injury Regulatory Framework First law: 1951.
Current law and directives: 1953 (law) and 1978 (permanent
Medical treatment, surgery, nursing, medicine, appliances, transportation, and hospitalization.
Employee copayments may also apply, varying according to the individual enterprises or local government regulations (if enterprises participating in local government work injury disability and medical care insurance pools).
employees directive) and 1986 (contract workers directive) .
Type of program: Local government social insurance (work
injury fund pools) and/or employer-provided (medical savings accounts) programs.
Local governments and employers adapt central government guidelines to local conditions.
Survivor Benefits Survivor pension (central government guidelines): 40% of insured's wage for the spouse; 30% each for other dependents.
Lump-sum death allowance: 48 to 60 months' wages.
Funeral grant: Six months' wages.
Coverage Employees in state-run enterprises and some collective enterprises.
Employees of government and communist party organizations; employees of cultural, educational, and scientific institutions (except for off-budget financed institutions); and university students are covered under government-funded and employeradministered programs.
Administrative Organization Participating enterprises: Ministry of Labor and Social Security, Department of Medical Care Insurance, provides general guidance.
Local government social insurance agencies and participating enterprises administer programs under local government medical care fund pools.
Nonparticipating enterprises: Individual state-run
Source of Funds Insured person: None.
Employer: Enterprises participating in local government work
enterprises administer the programs.
injury fund pooling, average 1% of payroll.
Nonparticipating enterprises: Total cost.
Government: Central and local government subsidies as
Unemployment Regulatory Framework First law and current directive: 1986 (law) and 1999
needed.
(directive).
Type of program: Local government social insurance
Qualifying Conditions Work injury benefits: There is no minimum qualifying period.
programs.
Local governments and employers adapt central government guidelines to local conditions.
Temporary Disability Benefits Temporary disability benefit (central government guidelines): 100% of wage until recovery or the determination
Coverage Permanent and contract workers in state-run enterprises and some collective enterprises.
of permanent disability.
54 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
China
Source of Funds Insured person: 1% of earnings.
Employer: 2% of payroll.
Government: Local government subsidies.
Qualifying Conditions Unemployment benefit: At least 1 year in covered
employment; involuntary termination of employment; registration at, and regularly reporting to, a local employmentservice agency; and actively seeking employment.
Unemployment Benefits The benefit amount is determined by local governments at a level higher than the local public assistance benefit but lower than the local minimum wage.
The benefit is payable for 1 year with less than 5 years of coverage, for 1.5 years with 5 or more but less than 10 years, and for 2 years with 10 or more years of coverage.
Administrative Organization Ministry of Labor and Social Security, Department of Unemployment, provides general guidance.
Local social insurance agencies administer the program.
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 55
Fiji
Permanent Disability Benefits
Fiji Exchange rate: U.S.$1.00 equals 2.12 Fiji dollars (F$).
Old Age, Disability, and Survivors Regulatory Framework First law: 1966.
Current law: 1995, with amendments.
Type of program: Provident fund system.
A lump sum equal to total employee and employer contributions plus accumulated interest or, optionally, a monthly pension based on 22% of total employee and employer contributions plus accumulated interest.
A couple may elect to receive a monthly pension of 2/3 of 22% of total employee and employer contributions plus accumulated interest for as long as either spouse lives.
Survivor Benefits Survivor benefit: A lump sum equal to total employee and
Coverage Employed workers, except for public employees and military and police force personnel appointed before November 1971 who have elected to continue under the Civil Service Act's old scheme; members of equivalent private plans approved by the Fiji National Provident Fund Board.
Voluntary coverage for death benefit for nonemployed persons aged 16 to 50, domestic workers, and the self-employed.
employer contributions plus accumulated interest is payable to named survivors.
A monthly pension equal to 22% of total benefit may be paid in lieu of the lump sum to a spouse who is a sole dependent survivor.
Death benefit: A lump sum of F$5,000.
Administrative Organization Fiji National Provident Fund Board provides general supervision and enforces the law.
Permanent Secretary for Labor and Industrial Relations acts as chair of the Board.
Source of Funds Insured person: 8% of wages; for death benefit, a single F$15
Work Injury Regulatory Framework First and current law: 1965.
Type of program: Employer-liability system.
contribution is deducted annually from each eligible member 's provident fund account.
Employer: 8% of payroll.
Government: None.
Coverage Qualifying Conditions Old-age benefit: Age 55; a lump sum is payable to provident
Employed persons and apprentices.
Exclusions: Casual labor, those engaged in family labor, and some public employees and other workers designated by the government.
fund members of any age on their permanent departure from the country.
Provident fund members with at least 10 years of contributions may elect to receive a monthly pension.
The monthly pension is reduced for contributions of less than 10 years.
Disability grant: Incapacity for work in covered employment.
Source of Funds Insured person: None.
Employer: Total cost, met through the direct provision of
The disabled person may elect to receive a monthly pension.
Survivor grant: Death of the insured person before retirement
benefits.
Government: None.
age.
A sole survivor may elect to receive a monthly pension.
Old-Age Benefits A lump sum equal to total employee and employer contributions plus accumulated interest or, optionally, a monthly pension based on 22% of total employee and employer contributions plus accumulated interest.
A couple may elect to receive a monthly pension of 2/3 of 22% of total employee and employer contributions plus accumulated interest for as long as either spouse lives.
Qualifying Conditions Work injury benefits: The insured person must be totally
incapacitated for work for at least 3 days.
56 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
Fiji
Temporary Disability Benefits 66% of weekly earnings.
Maximum total benefit is F$16,000.
The benefit may be converted to a lump-sum payment in certain cases.
Benefit is payable after a 2-day waiting period for up to 260 weeks.
Permanent Disability Benefits A lump sum of 260 weeks' earnings if totally disabled.
Constant-attendance supplement: Equal to 25% of the lumpsum payment.
Partial disability: A percentage of the full lump-sum benefit proportionate to the degree of disability.
Workers' Medical Benefits Medical and hospital care, surgery, medicines, appliances, and transportation.
Survivor Benefits A lump sum of 208 weeks' earnings.
The minimum benefit is F$9,000.
The maximum total benefit is F$24,000.
Administrative Organization Permanent Secretary for Labor and Industrial Relations enforces work injury law.
Individual employers must pay compensation directly to their own employees in all cases except for lump-sum payments and for survivor benefits.
Local courts administer lump-sum payments and survivor benefits.
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 57
Georgia from relatives outside the immediate household.
Local departments of labor and social protection determine eligibility.
Georgia Exchange rate: U.S.$1.00 equals 2.22 lari.
Old-Age Benefits Old-age pension: Fourteen lari a month, regardless of the
Old Age, Disability, and Survivors Regulatory Framework First law: 1956.
Current law: 1990, with amendment.
Type of program: Dual social insurance and social assistance
duration of covered employment.
Social pension: Eighteen lari a month for a single person; 29
lari for a family of two or more.
The benefit amount is offset by 14 lari if one family member is eligible for the old-age pension.
Benefit adjustment: Ad hoc adjustments.
system.
Local authorities and employers may provide supplementary benefits out of their own budgets.
Note: This information is more than 4 years old.
Permanent Disability Benefits Disability pension: There are no cash benefits; there are
certain reductions on hospital and medical charges if the disability is certified by local medical and health departments.
Social pension: A pension of 18 lari a month is payable to an
Coverage Social insurance: All employed persons residing in Georgia.
Social assistance: Special social pension for elderly persons,
eligible single disabled person; 29 lari a month if the disabled person lives in a family of two or more.
Benefit adjustment: Ad hoc adjustments.
disabled persons, and survivors is based on need as determined by local government authorities.
Survivor Benefits Survivor pension: There are no cash benefits.
Social pension: A pension of 18 lari a month for a single
Source of Funds Insured person
survivor; 29 lari a month for a family of two or more survivors.
Benefit adjustment: Ad hoc adjustments.
Social insurance: 1% of earnings.
Social assistance: None.
Employer
Administrative Organization Republic Ministry of Labor and Social Protection provides general supervision and coordination.
Local departments of labor and social protection administer the program.
Social insurance: 27% of payroll for state-owned and private-
sector enterprises.
Social assistance: None.
Government
Sickness and Maternity Regulatory Framework First and current law: 1955, with amendment.
Type of program: Dual social insurance (employee maternity
Social insurance: Subsidies as needed.
Social assistance: Total cost.
The above contributions also finance benefits for maternity, work injury, and dependents' allowances.
benefits) and social assistance (medical care) system.
Qualifying Conditions Old-age pension: Age 65 (men) or age 60 (women).
Coverage Cash benefits for maternity: Employees.
Medical benefits: Needy residents.
Earnings test: There is an earnings test for pensioners in gainful employment.
Disability pension: See social pension, below.
Survivor pension: See social pension, below.
Social pension: Payable to an individual or to a family
Source of Funds Insured person: See Old Age, Disability, and Survivors,
without other means of support.
Other means of support include pension benefits (offset by the old-age pension, see below), earned income by any family member, or assistance
above.
Employer: See Old Age, Disability, and Survivors, above.
58 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
Georgia Government Type of program: Dual social insurance and social assistance
Cash benefits: See Old Age, Disability, and Survivors, above.
Medical care: Total cost for needy residents.
system.
Coverage Cash benefits: Employed persons.
There is no minimum
Qualifying Conditions Cash sickness benefits: There are no cash sickness
qualifying period.
Medical care: Employed persons.
There is no minimum
benefits.
Private employers may voluntarily offer benefits if an employee has an illness that is certified by a physician (the employee pays charges for physician certification).
Cash maternity benefits: There is no minimum qualifying
qualifying period.
Source of Funds Insured person: See Old Age, Disability, and Survivors,
period.
above.
Employer: See Old Age, Disability, and Survivors, above.
Government: See Old Age, Disability, and Survivors, above;
Sickness and Maternity Benefits Sickness benefit: There are no cash sickness benefits.
Maternity benefit: 100% of wages.
The benefit is payable for
the cost of medical care for the needy.
4 months before the expected date of childbirth.
Maternity leave: A mother is entitled to leave without pay for up to 8 weeks after childbirth; may be extended to up to 3 years without pay to care for an infant.
Qualifying Conditions Work injury benefits: There is no minimum qualifying period.
Temporary Disability Benefits The benefit is payable if the employer is at fault.
A special local commission, consisting of local health and medical officials, the employee, and the employer, determines culpability and the degree of disability.
Workers' Medical Benefits Medical services are provided directly by government health providers to needy disabled and socially unprotected residents.
Local departments of public health and local departments of labor and social protection determine eligibility.
Permanent Disability Benefits Permanent disability pension: The benefit is payable if the employer is at fault.
A special local commission, consisting of local health and medical officials, the employee, and the employer, determines culpability and the degree of disability.
Dependents' Medical Benefits Same as for the head of the household.
If the employer is not at fault, see permanent disability benefits under Old Age, Disability, and Survivors, above.
Administrative Organization Cash benefits for maternity: Ministry of Labor and Social
Workers' Medical Benefits Medical services are provided directly by government health providers to needy disabled and socially unprotected residents unless the employer is proven to have been at fault.
Local departments of public health and local departments of labor and social protection determine eligibility.
Protection provides general supervision.
Cash benefits are provided directly by the place of employment as well as by local departments of labor and social protection.
Medical care: Ministry of Public Health and health
departments of local governments provide general supervision and coordination.
Medical services are provided through government clinics, hospitals, maternity homes, and other facilities administered by the Ministry of Public Health and local health departments.
Survivor Benefits Survivor pension: See survivor benefits under Old Age,
Work Injury Regulatory Framework First and current laws: 1955 (short-term benefits) and 1991
Disability, and Survivors, above, unless the employer is proven to have been at fault.
Administrative Organization Temporary disability benefits: If the employer is proven to
(pensions), with amendment.
have been at fault, enterprises and employers pay benefits to their own employees.
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 59
Georgia Pensions: See Old Age, Disability, and Survivors, above.
If
Family Allowances Information is not available.
the employer is proven to have been at fault, enterprises and employers pay benefits to their own employees.
Medical care: Ministry of Health and health departments of
local governments provide general supervision and coordination.
Medical services are provided through clinics, hospitals, and other facilities administered by the Ministry of Health and local health departments.
Unemployment Regulatory Framework First and current law: 1991, implemented in 1993 with
amendment.
Type of program: Social insurance system.
Coverage Citizens between ages 16 and 65 (men) or 16 and 60 (women).
Source of Funds Insured person: None.
Employer: 1% of payroll.
Government: Subsidies as needed from republic and local
governments.
Qualifying Conditions Unemployment benefit: Registered at an employment office and able and willing to work.
The benefit may be reduced, suspended, or terminated if the insured is discharged for violating work discipline, leaving employment without good cause, violating the conditions for job placement or vocational training, or filing a fraudulent claim.
Unemployment Benefits Unemployment benefits are paid for 6 months at the decreasing rate of 14 lari a month for the first 2 months, 12 lari a month for the third and fourth month, and 11 lari a month for the fifth and sixth month.
Benefit adjustments: Ad hoc adjustments.
Administrative Organization Republic Ministry of Labor and Social Protection provides general supervision.
Unified State Fund of Employment and its regional and local branches are responsible for financing and administering the program.
60 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
Hong Kong Government
Hong Kong Exchange rate: U.S.$1.00 equals 7.80 Hong Kong dollars (HK$).
Universal old-age pension and means-tested social assistance system: Total cost.
Mandatory occupational scheme: None.
Old Age, Disability, and Survivors Regulatory Framework First and current laws: 1971 (social assistance); 1973
Qualifying Conditions Old-age allowance
Lower-rate allowance: Residents aged 65 to 69 with 5 years of
continuous residence.
Income-tested and asset-tested.
Higher-rate allowance: Residents aged 70 and older with 5
(universal old-age and disability allowance); 1978 (meanstested old-age supplement); 1980 (means-tested disability supplement); 1988 (means-tested old-age allowance, universal higher-rate disability allowance); 1993 (comprehensive social security assistance, social security allowance); and 1995 (mandatory provident fund schemes), implemented in 2000 with 2002 amendment.
Type of program: Universal old-age pension and means-
years of continuous residence.
Old-age benefit (mandatory occupational scheme): Age 65
(men and women).
Early retirement: Age 60 (men and women) if ceasing employment permanently.
Disability allowance
tested social assistance system with mandatory occupational individual accounts (mandatory provident fund schemes).
Note: Although the mandatory occupational individual accounts operate under the name of mandatory provident fund schemes, the schemes are privately run and should not be confused with the publicly run national provident fund institutions found in other countries in the Asia and Pacific region.
Lower-rate allowance: Residents with 1 year of continuous
residence and a 100% loss of earning capacity or profoundly deaf.
Higher-rate allowance: Residents with 1 year of continuous
residence and a 100% loss of earning capacity or profoundly deaf, certified to be in need of constant attendance, and not residing in a government-owned (or government-subsidized) residential institution.
Disability benefit (mandatory occupational scheme):
Coverage Universal old-age pension and means-tested social assistance system: Residents.
Mandatory occupational scheme: All employees and the
Totally incapable of work.
Comprehensive social security assistance: Residents
aged 60 and older or disabled with at least 1 year of residence.
Income-tested and asset-tested.
Funeral grant: For recipients of comprehensive social security
self-employed between ages 18 and 65.
Exclusions: Self-employed hawkers, persons covered by statutory pension or provident fund schemes such as civil servants, members of occupational retirement schemes who are granted exemption certificates, and people from overseas working in Hong Kong for less than 13 months or who are covered by overseas retirement schemes.
assistance.
Survivor benefit (mandatory occupational scheme): The
death of the scheme member before retirement.
Old-Age Benefits Old-age allowance: HK$625 a month (lower rate) or HK$705 a
Source of Funds Insured person
month (higher rate).
Comprehensive social security assistance: From HK$2,160 to HK$4,670 a month for a single person or from HK$1,965 to HK$4,315 a month per person in a family, depending on the category of the recipient; plus special grants to meet the specific individual needs of recipients.
Old-age benefit (mandatory occupational scheme): Total
Universal old-age pension and means-tested social assistance system: None.
Mandatory occupational scheme: A minimum of 5% of
earnings between lower (HK$4,000) and upper (HK$20,000) limits, plus any voluntary contributions.
Employer
employee and employer contributions plus accrued interest paid as a lump sum.
Universal old-age pension and means-tested social assistance system: None.
Mandatory occupational scheme: A minimum of 5% of
Permanent Disability Benefits Disability allowance: HK$1,260 a month (lower rate) or
earnings up to an upper limit (HK$20,000), plus any voluntary contributions.
HK$2,520 a month (higher rate).
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 61
Hong Kong Comprehensive social security assistance: From HK$2,160 to HK$4,670 a month for a single person or from HK$1,965 to HK$4,315 a month for each dependent family member, depending on the category of the recipient; plus special grants to meet the specific individual needs of recipients.
Disability benefit (mandatory occupational scheme): Total employee and employer contributions plus accrued interest paid as a lump sum.
Cash maternity benefit: Forty weeks of continuous
employment.
Comprehensive social security assistance: Residents
aged 15 to 59 with at least 1 year of residence and medically certified to have limited working capacity.
Income-tested and asset-tested.
Sickness and Maternity Benefits Sickness benefit: 80% of the insured's wage for up to 120
Survivor Benefits Funeral grant (comprehensive social security assistance):
days.
Benefit is payable after a 3-day waiting period.
Maternity benefit: 80% of the insured's wage payable for 10
A lump sum of HK$10,880.
Survivor benefit (mandatory occupational scheme): The
named survivor receives the total employee and employer contributions plus accrued interest paid as a lump sum.
weeks.
Benefit is payable from 2 to 4 weeks before the expected date of childbirth; for a premature birth, benefit is payable from the date of childbirth.
Comprehensive social security assistance: From HK$2,160
Administrative Organization Universal and means-tested social assistance system:
Social Welfare Department administers the program.
Mandatory occupational scheme: Under the direction of an
to HK$4,670 a month for a single person or from HK$1,965 to HK$4,315 a month per person in a family, depending on the category of the recipient; plus special grants to meet the specific individual needs of recipients.
executive director and an advisory committee, the Mandatory Provident Fund Schemes Authority (MPFSA) supervises mandatory provident fund schemes.
The MPFSA is responsible for ensuring that approved trustees administer the mandatory provident fund schemes in a prudent manner.
Workers' Medical Benefits Medical benefits: None.
(Low-cost medical care is available
in public hospitals.)
Comprehensive social security assistance: Free medical
care in public hospitals.
Sickness and Maternity Regulatory Framework First laws: 1968 (employer liability) and 1971 (social
Administrative Organization Labor Department administers the employer-liability program.
Social Welfare Department administers the social assistance program.
assistance).
Current law: 1997.
Type of program: Dual employer-liability (cash benefits only)
Work Injury Regulatory Framework First laws: 1953 (employer liability) and 1971 (social
and social assistance system.
Coverage Employees (employer-liability program); residents (comprehensive social security assistance).
assistance).
Current law: 2000.
Type of program: Dual employer-liability and social
Source of Funds Insured person: None.
Employer: Total cost of the employer-liability program.
Government: Total cost of the comprehensive social security
assistance system.
Coverage Employees (employer-liability program); residents (comprehensive social security assistance).
assistance program.
Source of Funds Qualifying Conditions Cash sickness benefit: One month of continuous Insured person: None.
Employer: Total cost of the employer-liability program.
employment.
62 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
Hong Kong Government: Total cost of the comprehensive social security
Administrative Organization Labor Department administers the employer-liability program.
Social Welfare Department administers the social assistance program.
assistance program.
Qualifying Conditions Work injury benefits: There is no minimum qualifying period.
Comprehensive social security assistance: Resident for at
Unemployment Regulatory Framework First and current law: 1977.
Type of program: Social assistance system.
least 1 year and medically certified to have limited working capacity.
Income-tested and asset-tested.
Temporary Disability Benefits Temporary disability benefit: 80% of the difference between
earnings before and after the onset of disability.
Benefit is payable for up to 36 months.
Comprehensive social security assistance: From HK$1,805
Coverage Residents.
to HK$3,955 for a single person or from HK$1,290 to HK$3,590 a month per person in a family, depending on the category of the recipient; plus special grants to meet the specific individual needs of recipients.
Source of Funds Insured person: None.
Employer: None.
Permanent Disability Benefits Permanent disability grant: For total disability, a lump sum of between 48 and 96 months' earnings, according to the age of the employee.
Government: Total cost.
Qualifying Conditions Comprehensive social security assistance: Residents
The minimum lump sum is HK$344,000.
The maximum lump sum is HK$2,016,000.
Constant-attendance supplement: A lump sum or periodic payments for up to 2 years.
The maximum supplement is HK$412,000.
Partial disability: A percentage of the full benefit proportionate to the degree of incapacity, according to the schedule.
Comprehensive social security assistance: From HK$1,805
between ages 15 and 59 with at least 1 year of residence, who are actively seeking paid employment and who have joined the Support for Self Reliance scheme of the Social Welfare Department.
Income-tested and asset-tested.
Unemployment Benefits Comprehensive social security assistance: HK$1,805 a
to HK$3,955 for a single person or from HK$1,290 to HK$3,590 for each dependent family member, depending on the category of the recipient; plus special grants to meet the specific individual needs of recipients.
month for a single person or from HK$1,290 to HK$1,610 a month per person in a family, depending on the category of the recipient; plus special grants to meet the specific individual needs of recipients.
Administrative Organization Social Welfare Department administers the program.
Workers' Medical Benefits Medical examination, treatment, and appliances.
Family Allowances Regulatory Framework First and current law: 1971.
Type of program: Social assistance system.
Survivor Benefits Survivor grant: A lump sum of between 36 and 84 months of
the insured's earnings, according to the insured's age at the time of death.
The minimum lump sum is HK$303,000.
The maximum lump sum is HK$1,764,000.
Funeral grant: A lump sum of HK$35,000.
Coverage Residents.
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 63
Hong Kong
Source of Funds Insured person: None.
Employer: None.
Government: Total cost.
Qualifying Conditions Comprehensive social security assistance: One year of
residence.
Benefit is payable for children younger than age 15; ages 15 to 21 if in full-time education.
Income-tested and asset-tested.
Family Allowance Benefits Comprehensive social security assistance: From HK$1,435
to HK$4,315 a month, depending on the category of the recipient; plus special grants to meet the specific individual needs of recipients.
Administrative Organization Social Welfare Department administers the program.
64 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
India Pension scheme: 1.16% of basic wages.
India Exchange rate: U.S.$1.00 equals 48.80 rupees.
Gratuity scheme: None.
Qualifying Conditions Old-age benefit
Old Age, Disability, and Survivors Regulatory Framework First and current laws: 1952 (provident fund), 1972 (gratuity
Provident fund: Age 55 and retired from covered employment;
scheme), 1976 (deposit-linked insurance scheme), and 1995 (pension scheme).
Type of program: Provident fund with deposit-linked
benefit is payable at any age if leaving the country permanently, being involuntarily removed from covered employment, on the termination of service under a voluntary retirement scheme, on changing employment from an establishment covered by the scheme to one that is not, or on the termination of a job and remaining unemployed for over 2 months.
Drawdown payment: Partial drawdown advances are permitted before retirement for special purposes, including the purchase of life insurance, the purchase or construction of a home, loan repayment, and paying children's education fees.
Pension scheme: Age 58 or retired with a minimum of 10
insurance, pension, and gratuity schemes for industrial workers.
Coverage Provident fund, deposit-linked insurance, and pension scheme: Employees with monthly earnings of 6,500 rupees
years' coverage.
Reduced pension: A reduced pension is available at age 50 with a minimum of 10 years' coverage and on ceasing employment.
Gratuity scheme: Five years' continuous employment (old-age
or less working in establishments with a minimum of 20 employees in one of the 180 categories of covered employment.
Employees covered by equivalent private plans may be contracted out.
Special systems for miners, railway employees, and public employees.
Gratuity scheme: Employees of factories, mines, and firms
benefit only).
Disability pension
Provident fund: Incapacity for normal work.
Pension scheme: The insured person is permanently and totally disabled by an occupational injury.
Survivor pension
with at least 10 workers.
Source of Funds Insured person
Provident fund: Death of the provident fund member before
Provident fund: 12% of basic wages in 175 specified categories
retirement (survivor benefit only).
Deposit-linked insurance scheme: Death of the provident
of covered industry or 10% of basic wages in five specified categories of covered industry.
Deposit-linked insurance scheme: None.
Pension scheme: None.
Gratuity scheme: None.
Employer
fund member before retirement.
Pension scheme: The insured was a member of the scheme with at least 1 month of contributions (payable regardless of whether the insured was employed or retired at the time of death).
Provident fund: 3.67% of payroll in 175 specified categories of
Old-Age Benefits Provident fund: A lump sum equal to total employee and
covered industry or 1.67% of payroll in five specified categories of covered industry.
Employers pay an additional 1.1% of payroll for administrative costs.
Deposit-linked insurance scheme: 0.5% of payroll, plus 0.01%
employer contributions plus interest.
Drawdown payment: The value of drawdown payments depends on the value of employee and employer contributions, plus accumulated interest, in the individual account and on the discretion of the individual fund member.
Pension scheme: For 10 years of employment or more, a
of payroll for administrative costs.
Pension scheme: 8.33% of payroll.
Gratuity scheme: Average 4% of payroll.
Government
monthly pension based on a member 's pensionable service and salary subject to a minimum pension.
Provident fund: None.
Deposit-linked insurance scheme: None.
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 65
India Reduced pension: The basic pension is reduced by 3% for each year for which retirement is taken before age 58.
Gratuity scheme: A lump sum equal to 15 days' wages for Type of program: Social insurance system.
Cash and medical
benefits.
each year of continuous service.
The maximum award is 350,000 rupees.
Coverage Employees of power-using manufacturing establishments with 10 workers or more and employees of non-power-using establishments with 20 workers or more.
Exclusions: Employees in seasonal, agricultural, and certain other sectors as well as other employees earning over 6,500 rupees a month.
Workers and their spouses and retired insured workers are covered for medical benefits in case of permanent disability.
Coverage is being extended gradually to different districts, and now about 677 industrial centers are covered.
Permanent Disability Benefits Provident fund: A lump sum equal to total employee and
employer contributions plus interest.
Pension scheme: A monthly pension based on the member 's
pensionable salary subject to a minimum of 250 rupees or, optionally, a lump-sum benefit equal to total employee and employer contributions plus interest.
Survivor Benefits Provident fund: A lump sum equal to total employee and
Source of Funds Insured person: 1.75% of earnings for employees whose
employer contributions plus interest.
The lump sum is payable to named family members or, if none, to other named beneficiaries.
Death grant: Up to 2,000 rupees.
Deposit-linked insurance scheme: A lump sum equal to the
average daily wage is at least 40 rupees.
Ten rupees a month for medical benefits in case of permanent disability.
Employer: 4.75% of payroll of covered employees.
Government: State governments pay 12.5% of the cost of
average balance in the provident fund account of the insured over the 12 months preceding death.
The maximum award is 60,000 rupees.
medical benefits.
Qualifying Conditions Cash sickness benefits: Must be in insured employment for 78 days during a designated 6-month period.
Cash maternity benefits: Must be in insured employment for
Pension scheme Widow's pension: 50% of the member 's pension, subject to a minimum of 450 rupees a month.
Orphan's pension: 25% of the widow's pension, subject to a minimum of 150 rupees a month; full orphan's, 75% of the widow's pension, subject to a minimum of 250 rupees a month.
70 days during two designated 6-month periods.
Medical benefits: Currently in insured employment or
qualified for cash sickness benefit.
Medical benefits for dependents are the same as for the insured person.
Administrative Organization Ministry of Labor provides general supervision for all schemes.
Employees' Provident Fund is organized and administered through regional, subregional, inspectorate, and subaccounts offices.
Central Board of Trustees of the Employees' Provident Fund administers the funds through a tripartite body representing government, employers, and employees.
Gratuity scheme is administered by central and state authorities.
Sickness and Maternity Benefits Sickness benefit: From 14 rupees to 125 rupees a day
depending on wage class (benefit is increased by 40% for certain specified diseases).
Benefit is payable after a 2-day waiting period for up to 91 days in any two consecutive designated 6-month periods; benefit may be extended for certain chronic illnesses for up to 2 years.
Family planning: Seven or 14 days of cash sickness benefit paid at double rate, plus additional days for complications, depending on the nature of the sterilization operation.
Maternity benefit: 100% of average earnings according to
Sickness and Maternity Regulatory Framework First and current law: 1948.
(Under a separate 1961 law,
maternity benefits are provided to employees of factories and establishments not covered by the social insurance law of 1948.)
66 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
wage class; payable for up to 12 weeks (including no more than 6 weeks before the expected date of childbirth), 6 weeks in the case of a miscarriage.
(The 1961 law requires noncovered employers to pay the same benefit to a woman employed for 80 days in the previous year.)
Benefit may be extended by 4 weeks for medical reasons.
India
Workers' Medical Benefits State governments arrange for the provision of medical care on behalf of the Employees' State Insurance Corporation, except in Delhi and the Nioda area of Utter Pradesh where the Corporation administers medical care directly.
Services are variously provided in different states through social insurance dispensaries and hospitals, state government services, or private doctors under capitation contract.
Benefits include medical treatment, surgery, specialist services, hospitalization, medicines, obstetric care, transportation, and appliances (spectacles and dentures are provided for insured persons only).
The scale of services provided varies among states.
The duration of benefits is from 3 months to 1 year according to the insured's contribution record; duration may be extended for an additional 3 years for certain chronic diseases.
Source of Funds Insured person: See Sickness and Maternity, above.
Employer: See Sickness and Maternity, above.
Government: See Sickness and Maternity, above.
Qualifying Conditions Work injury benefits: There is no minimum qualifying period.
Temporary Disability Benefits The level of benefit varies, but the average is about 70% of earnings, according to 28 wage classes.
Benefit is payable after the third day for the entire duration of the disability.
Dependents' Medical Benefits Medical benefits for dependents: Currently provided in most
Permanent Disability Benefits Permanent disability pension: For total disability, the benefit
states and districts.
In most states, benefits include general practitioner care, medicines, specialist examinations, and hospitalization.
Funeral grant: A lump sum equal to the funeral cost, up to a
is 19.60 rupees up to maximum of 175 rupees a day, according to 28 wage classes.
Partial disability: A percentage of the full pension proportionate to the loss of earning capacity; small pensions may be paid in a lump sum.
maximum of 2,500 rupees.
The grant is payable to the eldest member of the family or to the person incurring the funeral cost.
Workers' Medical Benefits State governments arrange for the provision of medical care on behalf of the Employees' State Insurance Corporation, except in Delhi and the Nioda area of Utter Pradesh where the Corporation administers medical care directly.
Services are variously provided in different states through social insurance dispensaries and hospitals, state government services, or private doctors under capitation contract.
Benefits include medical treatment, surgery, specialist services, hospitalization, medicines, obstetric care, transportation, artificial limbs, spectacles, dentures, and other appliances.
The scale of services provided varies among states.
The duration of benefits is from 3 months to 1 year according to the insured's contribution record; duration may be extended for an additional 3 years for certain chronic diseases.
Administrative Organization Ministry of Labor provides general supervision.
Employees' State Insurance Corporation, which is managed by a tripartite board and a director general, administers the program through regional and local offices.
State governments administer the provision of medical benefits through agreement with, and reimbursement by, the Employees' State Insurance Corporation.
Employees' State Insurance Corporation administers the provision of medical benefits in some cases.
Work Injury Regulatory Framework First law: 1923 (workmen's compensation).
Current law: 1948 (social insurance).
Type of program: Social insurance system.
Survivor Benefits Survivor pension
Widow's pension: 60% of the insured's total disability pension
(the average benefit is equal to 70% of the deceased's earnings).
Orphan's pension: 40% of the insured's pension (the average
Coverage Employees of power-using manufacturing establishments with 10 workers or more, and employees of non-power-using establishments with 20 workers or more.
Exclusions: Employees in seasonal, agricultural, and certain other sectors as well as other employees earning over 6,500 rupees a month.
benefit is equal to 70% of the deceased's earnings) for an orphan under age 18 (no age limit if disabled) or until an orphaned daughter marries.
Maximum widow's and orphan's pensions: 100% of the insured's pension; the average benefit is equal to 70% of the deceased's earnings.
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 67
India Other eligible survivors (in the absence of the above):
Parents, grandparents, and other dependents under age 18; the maximum total pension for these other eligible survivors is 50% of the insured's pension.
Funeral grant: A lump sum equal to the funeral cost, up to a
maximum of 2,500 rupees.
The grant is payable to the oldest member of the family or to the person incurring the funeral cost.
Administrative Organization Ministry of Labor provides general supervision.
Employees' State Insurance Corporation, which is managed by a tripartite board and a director general, administers the program through regional and local offices.
State governments administer the provision of medical benefits through agreement with, and reimbursement by, the Employees' State Insurance Corporation.
Employees' State Insurance Corporation administers the provision of medical benefits in some cases.
Unemployment Regulatory Framework Labor law requires employers to provide a severance payment equal to 15 days' average pay for each year of employment.
Eleven states have instituted temporary unemployment programs funded by the government.
68 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
Indonesia
Permanent Disability Benefits
Indonesia Exchange rate: U.S.$1.00 equals 8,820 Rupiah (Rp).
Old Age, Disability, and Survivors Regulatory Framework First law: 1977 (provident fund).
Current law: 1992 (provident fund).
Type of program: Dual provident fund and social insurance
Disability benefit (provident fund): A lump sum equal to total employee and employer provident fund contributions plus interest or, for fund members holding more than Rp 50 million in their provident fund account, an optional periodic pension of up to 24 monthly payments.
Survivor Benefits Survivor benefit (provident fund): A lump sum equal to total
system.
employee and employer provident fund contributions plus interest or, for fund members holding more than Rp 50 million in their provident fund account, an optional periodic pension of up to 24 monthly payments.
Survivor benefit (social insurance): A lump sum of Rp 5
Coverage Establishments with 10 or more employees and/or a monthly payroll of Rp 1 million or more.
Coverage is being extended gradually to employees of smaller establishments and to organized informal-sector workers, including persons in family employment, fishermen, and those employed in rural cooperatives.
Special systems for public-sector employees and military personnel.
million.
Funeral grant (social insurance): A lump sum of Rp 1 million.
Benefit adjustment: The social insurance lump-sum benefits are adjusted every 2 years.
Administrative Organization Minister of Manpower provides general supervision.
Employees Social Security System (Jamostek) manages and administers the program.
Source of Funds Insured person: 2% of earnings.
Employer: 3.7% of payroll; plus 0.3% of payroll for survivor
Sickness and Maternity Regulatory Framework First law: 1957 (sickness and maternity).
Current law: 1992 (health care).
Type of Program: Social insurance system (medical benefits).
benefit (social insurance).
Government: None.
Qualifying Conditions Old-age benefit (provident fund): Age 55; a lump sum is
Coverage Coverage is compulsory for private-sector employees.
Exclusions: Employers providing benefits that are more comprehensive than those provided by the Jamostek program are exempt.
Special health care system (medical benefits) operates for civil servants, civil service pensioners, military and police pensioners, veterans, national independence pioneers, and their dependents up to age 25.
payable to provident fund members of any age if they change their citizenship status.
Disability benefit (provident fund): Total incapacity for work
because of a work-related disability and under age 55.
Survivor benefit (provident fund): The provident fund member was under age 55 at the time of death.
Survivor benefit (social insurance): Payable to a named
survivor of the insured person.
Old-Age Benefits Old-age benefit (provident fund): A lump sum equal to total employee and employer contributions plus accrued interest; a periodic pension is optional for fund members holding more than Rp 50 million in their provident fund account.
Source of Funds Insured person: None.
Employer: 3% of payroll for single employees; 6% for married
employees.
Government: None.
Drawdown payments: For certain categories of laid-off fund members with at least 66 months of coverage.
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 69
Indonesia
Qualifying Conditions Medical benefits: Currently covered.
Permanent Disability Benefits Disability benefit (lump sum): A lump sum equal to 49
months' wages.
Workers' Medical Benefits Benefits include primary and specialist outpatient care, hospitalization, medicines, maternity care, emergency care, dental care, and eye care.
Disability pension: Rp 50,000 a month for 24 months.
Partial disability: Lump-sum benefit rates vary from 2% to 40% of 70 months of earnings according to the assessed degree of disability.
Dependents' Medical Benefits Same as for the insured worker.
Workers' Medical Benefits Benefits include medical treatment, hospital care, dental and ophthalmic care, and prostheses.
Transport costs from the place of the accident to the hospital are also provided up to a maximum of Rp 400,000 depending on the method of transport used.
Administrative Organization Minister of Manpower provides general supervision.
Employees Social Security System (Jamostek) manages and administers the program.
Survivor Benefits Survivor benefit (lump sum): A lump-sum payment equal to
Work Injury Regulatory Framework First law: 1939.
Current law: 1992 (work injury).
Type of program: Social insurance system.
42 months of the insured's earnings.
Survivor pension: Rp 50,000 a month for 24 months.
Funeral grant: Rp 1 million.
Administrative Organization Minister of Manpower provides general supervision.
Employees Social Security System (Jamostek) manages and administers the program.
Coverage Establishments with 10 or more employees and/or a monthly payroll of Rp 1 million or more.
Coverage is being extended gradually to employees of smaller establishments and to organized informal-sector workers, including persons in family employment, fishermen, and those employed in rural cooperatives.
Special system for public-sector employees.
Source of Funds Insured person: None.
Employer: Total cost; contributions vary between 0.24% and
1.74% of payroll.
Government: None.
Qualifying Conditions Work injury benefits: Partial or total disability before age 55.
There is no minimum qualifying period.
Temporary Disability Benefits 100% of earnings for the first 4 months, 75% of earnings for the next 4 months, and 50% of earnings thereafter.
70 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
Iran
Iran Exchange rate: U.S.$1.00 equals 1.74 rials.
accident, the survivor pension is paid without any qualifying conditions.
Old-Age Benefits Old-age pension: 1/35th of average earnings during the last
Old Age, Disability, and Survivors Regulatory Framework First law: 1953.
Current law: 1975.
Type of program: Social insurance system.
24 months times the number of years of contributions.
The minimum pension is 50% of earnings but not less than 696,460 rials a month (the minimum wage of an unskilled laborer), plus food coupons.
Spouse allowance: A married male pensioner receives 81,200 rials for his spouse.
The maximum pension is 100% of earnings up to 1,970,000 rials a month.
Coverage Employed persons in specified occupations and geographic areas.
Special pension systems for public employees and the armed forces.
Self-employed persons may contribute voluntarily.
Permanent Disability Benefits Disability pension: If totally disabled, 3.3% of average
earnings during last 2 years times the number of years of contributions.
The minimum pension is 50% of earnings (60% with dependents), but not less than 696,460 rials a month (the minimum wage of an unskilled laborer).
Spouse allowance: A married male pensioner receives 81,200 rials for his spouse.
The maximum pension is 100% of earnings up to 1,970,000 rials a month.
Partial disability: If between 33% and 66% disabled, a percentage of the full pension proportionate to the degree of incapacity.
Source of Funds Insured person: 7% of earnings.
Employer: 20% of payroll, plus 3% for unemployment
insurance.
(The first five employees in small industrial and technical workshops are exempted.)
Government: 3% of payroll.
(Also pays employers'
contribution for the first five employees in small industrial and technical workshops.)
Maximum and minimum monthly earnings for contribution and benefit purposes for salaried employees are 2,507,400 rials and 696,460 rials, respectively.
The above contributions also finance medical care, cash sickness, maternity, and work injury benefits.
Survivor Benefits Survivor pension: 50% of the insured's pension is payable to
a widow of any age or to a dependent widower.
The minimum widow(er) pension is 20% of the insured's pension.
Orphan's pension: 25% of the insured's pension (50% if a full
Qualifying Conditions Old-age pension: Age 60 (men) or age 55 (women); age 50
orphan) is payable for each orphan under age 18 (no limit if student or disabled).
Parent's pension: 20% of the insured's pension for each
(men) or age 45 (women) with between 20 and 25 years of work in an unhealthy working environment or in a physically demanding natural environment; at any age (men and women) with 30 years of work.
The minimum qualifying period is 10 years of contributions.
Retirement from insured employment is necessary.
Disability pension: Total disability (2/3 loss of earning
dependent aged parent.
Maximum survivor pension: 100% of the insured's pension.
Minimum survivor pension: 696,460 rials a month (the minimum wage of an unskilled laborer).
Funeral grant: Varies according to municipality.
capacity) or partial disability (1/3 loss of earning capacity).
One year of contributions in the last 10 years, including 90 days in the year prior to the onset of disability.
Survivor pension: Deceased was a pensioner at the time of
Administrative Organization Ministry of Hygiene, Health, and Medical Education provides general supervision.
Social Security Organization, managed by a council and a board of directors, administers the program through provincial branches and local agencies.
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 71
death or had 1 year 's contributions in the last 10 years, including 90 days of contributions in the year prior to death; if the death of the insured was caused by a work-related
Iran
Sickness and Maternity Regulatory Framework First law: 1949.
Current law: 1975.
Type of program: Social insurance system.
Cash and medical
university hospitals and contracted-out physicians.
The cost of inpatient and outpatient care varies among medical care providers, as does the degree of cost-sharing and the rate of reimbursement.
Dependents' Medical Benefits Same as for the insured person.
Coverage is provided for a wife and for children under age 18 (age 20 if a student, disabled, or an unmarried daughter) or for a disabled dependent husband over age 60, and for aged dependent parents.
benefits.
Coverage Employed persons in urban areas and persons receiving old age, disability, or survivor pensions.
Seasonal workers are covered for medical services during the working season.
Administrative Organization Social Security Organization administers the program.
Medical services are provided directly through 70 hospitals and 260 medical clinics owned by the Social Security Organization.
Source of Funds Insured person: See Old Age, Disability, and Survivors,
above; seasonal workers contribute 9% of the minimum monthly wage.
Employer: See Old Age, Disability, and Survivors, above.
Government: See Old Age, Disability, and Survivors, above.
Work Injury Regulatory Framework First law: 1936.
Current law: 1975.
Type of program: Social insurance system.
Qualifying Conditions Cash sickness and medical benefits: Currently employed.
There is no minimum qualifying period, except for 60 days of contributions for prostheses.
Cash maternity benefits: Sixty days of contributions in the
Coverage Employed persons in urban areas.
year prior to the expected date of childbirth.
Sickness and Maternity Benefits Sickness benefit: 75% of average earnings in the previous 3
Source of Funds Insured person: See Old Age, Disability, and Survivors,
months for a worker with dependents; 66.6% of average earnings for a single worker.
Benefit is reduced to 50% for an unmarried insured person hospitalized in a Social Security Organization hospital; there is no reduction for an insured person with dependents.
Benefit is payable after a 3-day waiting period (unless hospitalized) until recovery.
Maternity benefit: 66.6% of average earnings in the previous
above.
Employer: See Old Age, Disability, and Survivors, above.
Government: See Old Age, Disability, and Survivors, above.
Qualifying Conditions Work injury benefits: There is no minimum qualifying period.
3 months, payable for up to 4 months before the expected date of childbirth or 4 months after giving birth.
Temporary Disability Benefits 75% of average earnings in the previous 3 months for a worker with dependents; 66.6% for a worker without dependents.
Benefit is reduced to 50% of average earnings if the insured person is hospitalized.
Benefit is payable from the first day of incapacity until recovery or certification of permanent disability.
Workers' Medical Benefits Direct system: Medical care and medicines are provided
directly to patients through medical facilities belonging to the Social Security Organization.
Dental grant: 180,000 rials for a half set of dentures or 300,000 rials for a full set.
Other medical expenses are payable according to set tariffs.
Indirect system: Medical services are provided through
Permanent Disability Benefits Permanent disability pension: If totally disabled, 3.3% of
public and private hospitals and clinics, as well as through
average earnings in the last 720 days times the number of years
72 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
Iran of contributions.
The pension should not be less than the minimum wage.
The minimum pension is 50% of earnings for a single worker; 60% for a married worker.
The maximum pension is 100% of earnings but not more than the wage ceiling.
Partial disability: If between 33% and 66% disabled, a percentage of the full pension proportionate to the degree of incapacity.
The minimum pension is 301,530 rials a month.
The maximum pension varies according to the insured's wage, contribution record, and degree of incapacity.
Disability grant: If between 10% and 33% disabled, a lump
Coverage Employed persons in specified occupations and geographic areas.
Exclusions: Self-employed persons, voluntarily insured persons, retired persons, the totally disabled, and those covered under construction workers' insurance.
Source of Funds Insured person: None.
Employer: 3% of payroll.
Government: Any deficit.
sum of 36 times the amount of total disability pension times the degree of disability.
Qualifying Conditions Unemployment benefit: Six months of insurance before the
Workers' Medical Benefits Same as for cash medical benefits, above (see Sickness and Maternity), but with no qualifying period for prostheses.
date of unemployment.
Registered at an employment office and capable of, and available for, work.
Unemployment is not due to voluntarily leaving, misconduct, or the refusal of a suitable job offer.
Survivor Benefits Survivor pension: 50% of the insured's pension is payable to
Unemployment Benefits The maximum duration of benefits depends on the length of coverage and marital status.
If a married individual has between 6 months and 24 months of coverage, benefit is payable for up to 12 months (6 months if single); for between 25 months and 120 months of coverage, benefit is payable for 18 months (12 months if single); for between 121 months and 180 months, benefit is payable for up to 26 months (18 months if single); for between 181 months and 240 months, benefit is payable for up to 36 months (24 months if single); for 241 months and longer, benefit is payable for up to 50 months (36 months if single).
The minimum benefit is 55% of average earnings, increased by 10% for each of the first four dependents.
The maximum benefit should not exceed 80% of average earnings.
Insured persons aged 55 or older receive unemployment benefit up to retirement age.
the widow.
Orphan's pension: 25% of the insured's pension (50% if a full orphan) is payable for each orphan under age 18 (age 20 if a student or disabled), and to an unmarried daughter until she marries or becomes unemployed.
Parent's pension: 20% of the insured's pension for each
dependent aged parent.
The maximum survivor pension is 100% of the insured's pension.
Funeral grant: Varies according to municipality.
Administrative Organization Ministry of Hygiene, Health, and Medical Education provides general supervision.
Social Security Organization administers the program through branch offices and local agencies.
Administrative Organization Ministry of Labor provides general supervision.
Unemployment Regulatory Framework First law: 1987.
Current law: 1990.
Type of program: Social insurance system.
Family Allowances Regulatory Framework First law: 1953.
Current law: 1975.
Type of program: Employment-related system.
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 73
Iran
Coverage Employed persons.
Source of Funds Insured person: None.
Employer: Total cost.
Government: None.
Qualifying Conditions Family allowances: The child must be under age 18 (no limit
if student or disabled).
The parent must have 720 working days of contributions.
Marriage grant: 720 days of contributions in the 5 years
before the date of marriage.
Family Allowance Benefits Family allowances: Three times the lowest daily wage of an
unskilled laborer.
(The lowest daily wage is based on the minimum wage of an unskilled laborer (696,460 rials a month) and is adjusted according to region.)
The allowance is payable for each of the first two children.
Marriage grant: One month's average wage or salary.
If both
spouses are insured, the grant is paid to the husband and wife separately.
Administrative Organization Ministry of Labor enforces the law.
Individual employers pay allowances with wages or salaries.
74 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
Iraq Old-age settlement: If ineligible for an old-age pension, a
Iraq Exchange rate: U.S.$1.00 equals 0.31 dinars.
lump sum equal to 1 month's pension for each year of contributions.
Permanent Disability Benefits
Old Age, Disability, and Survivors Regulatory Framework First law: 1956 (provident fund).
Current law: 1971 (social insurance).
Type of program: Social insurance system.
Disability pension: 2.5% of the average wage during the last
3 years times the number of months of contributions divided by 12.
The minimum monthly pension is 54 dinars.
The maximum monthly pension is 140 dinars.
Partial disability: A percentage of the full pension proportionate to the assessed degree of incapacity.
Note: This information is more than 10 years old.
Survivor Benefits Coverage Employees of enterprises with five or more workers.
Exclusions: Agricultural employees, temporary employees, domestic servants, and family labor.
Special pension systems for public-sector employees, employees of semigovernmental agencies including nationalized industries, lawyers, and journalists.
Survivor pension: 60% of the insured's pension, payable to the surviving spouse at any age.
Orphan's pension: 40% of the insured's pension (60% if a full
orphan), payable for each son under age 17 (age 27 if a student; no limit if disabled) and each unmarried daughter under age 17.
Other eligible survivors: 40% of the insured's pension for a dependent mother, father, sister, or brother.
The maximum survivor pension is 100% of the insured's pension.
Source of Funds Insured person: 5% of wage.
Employer: 12% of payroll (25% for firms operating in the oil
sector).
Government: None.
Administrative Organization Ministry of Labor and Social Affairs provides general supervision.
Under the direction of a tripartite board and a director general, the Labor and Social Security Institute administers the program.
The minimum wage for contribution and benefit purposes is based on the minimum wage in the insured's profession.
The above contributions also finance sickness, maternity, and work injury benefits.
Qualifying Conditions Old-age pension: Age 60 (men) or 55 (women) with 20 years
Sickness and Maternity Regulatory Framework First law: 1956 (provident fund).
Current law: 1971 (social insurance).
Type of program: Social insurance system providing cash
of contributions or at any age with 30 years (men) or 25 years (women) of contributions.
Retirement from regular employment is necessary.
The pension is payable abroad in certain cases.
Disability pension: The permanent or long-term loss of at
and medical benefits.
least 35% of working capacity.
Survivor pension: The deceased was a pensioner or met the
Coverage Employees of enterprises with five or more workers.
Exclusions: Agricultural employees, domestic servants, temporary employees, and family labor.
contribution conditions for the old-age pension.
Old-Age Benefits Old-age pension: 2.5% of the average wage during the last
3 years times the number of months of contributions divided by 12.
The minimum monthly pension is 54 dinars.
The maximum monthly pension is 140 dinars.
Source of Funds Insured person: See Old Age, Disability, and Survivors,
above.
Employer: See Old Age, Disability, and Survivors, above.
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 75
Iraq Government: See Old Age, Disability, and Survivors, above.
Coverage Employees of enterprises with five or more workers; all enterprises for survivor pensions.
Exclusions: Agricultural employees, domestic servants, family labor, and temporary employees.
(Some employees are covered under the 1936 legislation.)
Qualifying Conditions Cash and medical benefits: No minimum qualifying period.
Sickness and Maternity Benefits Sickness benefit: 75% of the average wage during the 3
months preceding the onset of illness.
The benefit is payable after an 8-day waiting period (during which the employer must pay full wages) for up to 6 months (may be extended to 2 years at 100% of wage for incurable or malignant diseases).
Maternity benefit: 100% of wage.
The benefit is payable for
Source of Funds Insured person: See Old Age, Disability, and Survivors,
above.
Employer: See Old Age, Disability, and Survivors, above.
Government: See Old Age, Disability, and Survivors, above.
at least 10 weeks, including at least 4 weeks before the expected date of childbirth.
The benefit may be extended to 9 months if there are complications.
For extended leave periods, the benefit is paid at 75% of wage.
Maternity leave: Payable for up to 6 months at 50% of wage at any time during the first 4 years of the child's life (up to the fourth child).
Maternity grant: If leaving employment because of the pregnancy, a lump sum of 1 month's benefit for each year of contributions.
Qualifying Conditions Work injury benefits: There is no minimum qualifying period.
Temporary Disability Benefits 100% of the wage on which contributions were last paid.
Benefit is payable after an 8-day waiting period (during which the employer must pay full wages) until recovery or certification of permanent disability.
Workers' Medical Benefits Health services are provided through government centers and hospitals financially supported by the Social Security Institute.
Benefits include general specialist care, hospitalization, surgery, medicines, appliances, laboratory services, and rehabilitation.
health Labor and and X-rays,
Permanent Disability Benefits Permanent disability pension: 80% of the average wage if
totally disabled.
The minimum pension is equal to the minimum wage in the insured's profession.
Partial disability: For an incapacity of at least 32%, a percentage of the full pension proportionate to the assessed degree of incapacity; for an incapacity of less than 32%, a lump sum equal to 4 years' partial pension.
Dependents' Medical Benefits Same as for the insured person.
Administrative Organization Ministry of Labor and Social Affairs provides general supervision.
Under the direction of a tripartite board and a director general, the Labor and Social Security Institute administers the program.
Workers' Medical Benefits General medical care, home visits, surgery, specialist care, hospitalization, and prescribed medicines.
Benefits are provided by arrangement with the Ministry of Health, local authorities, or private clinics.
Survivor Benefits
Work Injury Regulatory Framework First law: 1936.
Current law: 1971.
Type of program: Social insurance system.
Survivor pension: 60% of the insured's permanent total
disability pension or a lump sum equal to 4 years of the inured's partial disability pension, payable to the widow or to a dependent disabled widower.
Orphan's pension: 40% of the insured's pension (60% if a full
orphan), payable for each son under age 17 (age 27 if a student; no limit if disabled) and each unmarried daughter under age 17.
Other eligible survivors: 40% of the insured's pension each for a dependent mother, father, unmarried sister, or brother under age 16.
76 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
Iraq The maximum survivor pension is 100% of the insured's pension.
Administrative Organization Ministry of Labor and Social Affairs provides general supervision.
Labor and Social Security Institute administers contributions and benefits.
Unemployment Regulatory Framework First and current law: 1964.
Type of program: Social assistance.
Health and welfare fund is authorized under the 1964 law to provide employment assistance.
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 77
Israel
Israel Exchange rate: U.S.$1.00 equals 4.91 new shekels (NS).
Government also pays the total cost of pensions to uninsured new immigrants, as well as 50% of the cost of pensions for persons disabled before the enactment of 1970 law.
Maximum earnings for contribution purposes: Five times the national average wage as of January 1 each year for all insured persons; employers pay contributions on behalf of employees at the lower rate of four times the national average wage.
Minimum earnings for contribution purposes: 25% of the national average wage.
National average wage: NS6,964 in March 2002.
Old Age, Disability, and Survivors Regulatory Framework First and current laws: 1953 (old-age and survivor pensions),
1970 (disability), 1980 (long-term care), and 1982 (income support).
Type of program: Dual social insurance and social assistance
Qualifying Conditions Old-age pension (social insurance): Age 65 (men) or age 60
system.
Coverage Social insurance: All residents (including housewives) aged
18 or older, except persons who immigrated after age 60.
Social assistance (income support programs, meanstested): Residents aged 20 or older.
(women); age 65 for housewives.
Five years of insurance coverage in the last 10 years, or a total of 12 years of insurance coverage; there is no qualifying period for insured women who are widowed, divorced, deserted, married to an uninsured husband, or unmarried and aged 55 or older at the time of immigration.
Reduced pension: The pension is reduced if income from work exceeds between 57% and 76% of the national average wage (according to the number of dependents), until age 70 (men) or age 65 (women).
Old-age pension (social assistance)
Source of Funds Insured person
Employee: 1.46% of earnings below, and 2.7% of earnings
above, one-half of the national average wage for survivor pensions; 0.71% of earnings below, and earnings above, one-half of the national average disability benefits; and 0.05% of earnings below, earnings above, one-half of the national average long-term care.
old-age and 1.3% of wage for and 0.1% of wage for
Income support benefit (income-tested): Twenty-four months
of continuous residence, subject to a means test (12 months for new immigrants); incapable of providing self with earned income and not eligible for benefit payments from any other source.
Income supplement (income-tested): Partial benefit is payable
Self-employed person: 2.63% of earnings below, and 4.55% of
earnings above, one-half of the national average wage for oldage and survivor pensions; 0.95% of earnings below, and 1.68% of earnings above, one-half of the national average wage for disability benefits; and 0.10% of earnings below, and 0.16% of earnings above, one-half of the national average wage for long-term care.
Employer: 1.85% of payroll for old-age and survivor
to individuals whose combined earned and benefit income falls short of the minimum income level for subsistence.
Disability pension: Israeli resident aged 18 to 65 (men) or 18 to 60 (women).
No qualifying period.
Medical disability of at least 40% (at least 50% for a disabled housewife) and a functional loss of capacity of at least 50% .
pensions, 0.38% for disability benefits, and 0.06% for long-term care.
Government: 0.87% on earnings above one-half of the national average wage for old-age and survivor pensions; 0.27% on earnings above one-half of the national average wage for disability benefits; and 0.04% on earnings above onehalf of the national average wage for long-term care (government also subsidizes the cost of long-term care benefits to new immigrants).
Reduced contributions are paid on earnings below one-half of the national average wage, both for employees and the self-employed.
Government pays the total cost of social assistance income support programs.
Attendance allowance: At least 60% disabled, receiving the disability pension, and dependent on the help of others; if not receiving the disability pension, at least 75% disabled and means-tested.
Disabled child benefit: Residing in Israel, not institution-
alized or living with a foster family, and not receiving mobility allowance.
Conditions may be waived if the parent has two disabled children or under other permitted exceptional circumstances.
Long-term care benefit (means-tested): Age 65 (men) or
age 60 (women), not institutionalized, but dependent on the help of others for performing everyday functions or in need of supervision.
Survivor pension (social insurance): Deceased had 12
Additional government subsidies are equal to 15% of the employee and employer contributions paid for old-age and survivor pensions.
months of coverage prior to death, 24 months of coverage in the last 5 years, 60 months in the last 10 years, or met the qualifying period for the old-age pension.
78 SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002
Israel Survivor pension income supplement (social assistance):
Partial income-tested benefit payable to individuals whose combined earned and benefit income falls short of the minimum income level for subsistence.
Survivor pension increment: The pension is increased by 2% for each year of coverage of the deceased beyond 10 years.
Reduced survivor pension: For a widow(er) between ages 40 and 49 with no children, the pension is 12% of the national average wage.
Lump-sum award: For a widow(er) under age 40 who has no children, a lump sum of 3 years' full pension.
If the survivor also receives the old-age pension, the survivor pension is reduced by one-half.
Orphan's pension: 7.5% of the national average wage for
Old-Age Benefits Old-age pension: 16% of the national average wage; 24% for
a couple.
Dependent supplement: 5% of the national average wage for each of the first two children.
Old-age pension with income supplement (income-tested): 25% of the national average wage, 37.5% for a couple, 47.5% for a couple with one child, 57.5% for a couple with two children or more.
The resulting amounts are increased by a further 7%.
Old-age pension increments: The pension is increased by 2% per year of coverage beyond 10 years and by 5% of the value of the pension for each year of deferred retirement.
The maximum increments are 50% and 25%, respectively.
Income support benefit (income-tested): 20% to 25% of the
each half orphan; 10% for each full orphan.
Benefit adjustment: Benefits are adjusted automatically for changes in the national average wage.
Survivor pension with income supplement (income-tested)
Widow(er)'s pension: A widow(er) with no children receives
national average wage; 30% to 37.5% for a couple.
The benefit varies with age and the duration of benefit.
Benefit adjustment: Benefits are adjusted automatically for changes in the national average wage.
25% of the national average wage; a widow(er) with one child, 42.5% (less NS171); or 52.5% (less NS171) with two or more children.
The resulting pensions are increased by an additional 7%.
Orphans and abandoned children: For one child, the pension
is 25% of the national average wage (less NS171); for two children, 37.5% (less NS342).
Death grant: A lump sum equal to 100% of the national
Permanent Disability Benefits Disability pension: If at least 75% disabled, the full single
average wage; 150% if receiving income support.
Funeral grant: The cost of the burial up to a fixed amount.
disability pension equals 25% of the national average wage plus 7% of this amount (no income test).
Partial disability: The pension is proportionally reduced.
Dependent supplement (income-tested): Up to 12.5% of the national average wage for a spouse; 10% each for the first two children.
The supplement is increased by 7%.
Attendance allowance: 50%, 100%, or 150% of the full single disability pension according to the level of dependence.
Disabled child benefit: Between 30% and 120% of the full
Administrative Organization Ministry of Labor and Social Affairs provides general supervision.
National Insurance Institute administers the program, collects contributions, and pays benefits through its branch offices.
Sickness and Maternity Regulatory Framework First and current laws: 1953, 1976 (sickness), and 1995
single disability pension.
Long-term care benefit: 25% of the national average wage if
largely dependent on the help of others; 37.5% if completely dependent.
Benefits are payable directly to the organization providing the long-term care services, not to the entitled person (who receives the benefit at 80% of the rate indicated above only if services are not available and the beneficiary is cared for by a family member).
Benefit adjustment: Benefits are adjusted automatically for changes in the national average wage.
(medical care).
Type of program: Social insurance system.
Coverage Sickness benefits: All employees.
Medical care: All residents.
Maternity benefits: Employed persons and self-employed
Survivor Benefits Survivor pension: For a surviving spouse aged 50 or over or
persons aged 18 or older.
Benefits are also payable to parents who adopt a child under age 10.
Maternity grant: Insured woman or the wife of the insured; nonresidents including employed and self-employed women and the wives of employed and self-employed men.
if caring for a child, the pension is 16% of the average wage.
SSPTW: Asia and the Pacific, 2002 79
Israel The nonresident woman or her husband must have been working in Israel for at least 6 months immediately preceding childbirth.
The birth must occur in Israel.
Multiple birth allowance: An allowance payable for 20
months, calculated as a percentage of the national average wage and gradually reduced throughout the period of entitlement.
Hospital transportation costs: In certain cases, a fixed
Source of Funds Insured person
payment for the cost of transportation to hospital.
Employee: Medical care, 3.1% of earnings below, and 4.8% of
earnings above, one-half of the national average wage.
Maternity benefits, 0.33% of earnings below, and 0.60% of earnings above, one-half of the national average wage.
Self-employed person: 3.1% of earnings below, and 4.8% of
Workers' Medical Benefits Services provided by doctors and hospitals owned and operated by, or under contract to, the sickness fund.
Benefits include general and specialist care, medicines, laboratory services, hospitalization, and rehabilitation.
Patients pay a part of the cost of drugs and appliances.
earnings above, one-half of the national average wage for medical care; 0.48% of earnings below, and 0.75% of earnings above, one-half of the national average wage for maternity benefits.
Employer: None for medical care; 0.15% of payroll for
Dependents' Medical Benefits Medical benefits for dependents: Same as for the insured
maternity benefits.
Government: None for medical care; 0.10% of earnings for
person.
Special allowance and special benefit: If an insured woman
maternity benefits (and a reduced contribution for earnings below one-half of the national average wage).
Maximum earnings for contribution and benefit purposes: Four times the national average wage.
National average wage: NS6,964 in March 2002.
Qualifying Conditions Cash maternity benefits: Ten months of insurance in the last
dies within 1 year of childbirth, the spouse receives 30% of the average wage for a period of 24 months for each child of the last childbirth.
The entitlement period is reduced to 12 months if the spouse is also receiving survivor or dependent benefits for the child(ren).
If the spouse stops working to care for the child(ren), he may receive 75% of earnings, up to a ceiling, for up to 12 weeks.
Administrative Organization Ministry of Labor and Social Affairs provides general supervision.
National Insurance Institute administers the maternity program.
Sickness insurance and medical care are administered by four sickness funds under the supervision of the Ministry of Health.
14 months, or 15 months in the last 22 months; for women with only 6 months of insurance in the last
